http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/AIP.html
AIP 197. Academic Internship Program (4, 8, 12)
Individual placements for traditional field learning. Must be integrated with an academic discipline. A written contract involving all parties will include learning objectives, a paper/project outline, and means of supervision and progress evaluation. Consent of faculty adviser and program chair required. <strong class="italic">Prerequisites: </strong>ninety units completed; 2.5 minimum cumulative GPA; departmental stamp.


AIP 197F. Academic Internship Program—Foreign (4, 8, 12)   
Individual placements for field learning opportunities abroad. Must be integrated with an academic discipline. A written contract involving all parties will include learning objectives, a paper/project outline, and means of supervision and progress evaluation. Consent of faculty adviser and program chair required. <strong class="italic">Prerequisites: </strong>ninety units completed; 2.5 minimum cumulative GPA; departmental stamp.


AIP 197P. Public Service Minor Internship (4)   
Individual placements for field learning in nonprofit organizations dedicated to providing services in the areas of education, government, social research, and health. Three quarter sequence integrated with academic programs. A written contract involving all parties will include learning objectives, a paper/project outline, and means of supervision and progress evaluation. Consent of faculty adviser and program chair required. <strong class="italic">Prerequisites: </strong>ninety units completed; 2.5 minimum cumulative GPA; departmental stamp.


AIP 197T. Academic Internship Program—Special Programs
Individual placements for field learning associated with UC San Diego partnerships and special programs. A written contract involving all parties will include learning objectives, a paper/project outline, and means of supervision and progress evaluation. Consent of faculty adviser and program chair required. <strong class="italic">Prerequisites: </strong>ninety units minimum completed; 2.5 minimum cumulative GPA; departmental stamp.



http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/AAS.html
AAS 10. Introduction to African American Studies (4)
This course will cover the experiences of peoples of African descent in the U.S. and broader African Diaspora from the vantage points of cultural production, political practice, socioeconomic conditions, and the overall struggle for social justice along intersecting lines of race, gender, and class. Topics reviewed include: slavery (and slave rebellion), Reconstruction, Jim Crow apartheid, the Great Migration and Harlem Renaissance, and the Civil Rights and Black Power Movements.


AAS 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to 15-20 students. Enrollment priority will be given to freshmen. Seminars are open to sophomores, juniors and seniors on a space available basis. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit four times.


AAS 198. Directed Group Study in African American Studies (2 or 4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in the regular curriculum by special arrangement with a faculty member. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit two times. <strong class="italic">Prerequisites: </strong>upper-division standing unless otherwise authorized. Completion of 90 units of undergraduate study, completion and approval of the Special Studies Form. 


AAS 199. Independent Study in African American Studies (2 or 4)
Individual research and study on a particular subject related to African American studies by special arrangement with and under the direction of a faculty member. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit two times. <strong class="italic">Prerequisites: </strong>upper-division standing. Enrollment via the faculty director of the African American Studies Minor only.



http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/ANTH.html
ANTH 1. Introduction to Culture (4)
An introduction to the anthropological approach to understanding human behavior, with an examination of data from a selection of societies and cultures.  


ANTH 2. Human Origins (4)
An introduction to human evolution from the perspective of physical anthropology, including evolutionary theory and the evolution of the primates, hominids, and modern humans. Emphasis is placed on evidence from fossil remains and behavioral studies of living primates. Prerequisite for upper-division biological anthropology courses.


ANTH 3. World Prehistory (4)
This course examines theories and methods used by archaeologists to investigate the origins of human culture. A variety of case studies from around the world are examined. <span class="emphasis">Recommended for many upper-division archaeology courses.</span>


ANTH 4. Words and Worlds: Introduction to the Anthropology of Language (4)
How does one&rsquo;s language mutually interact with the social, cultural, and conceptual worlds one inhabits and mutually constructs with others? This course will introduce the comparative study of social life through the lens of the uniquely human capacity for language.


ANTH 5. Introduction to the Human Skeleton (4)
Introduction to the bones of your body. Learn how the skeleton supports our mode of locomotion, the differences between men and women and across populations, and how nutrition and disease can affect bones. Course examines each bone and functional area.


ANTH 20. Professional Talk: An Anthropological Approach to Language (4)
The practices of law, medicine, education, and others throughout the cultures of the world are mediated by talk: between disputants, between the healthy and the sick, or between learners and teachers. This course introduces the comparative study of language in such professional contexts.


ANTH 21. Race and Racisms (4)
Why does racism still matter? How is racism experienced in the U.S. and across the globe? With insights from the biology of human variation, archaeology, colonial history, and sociocultural anthropology, we examine how notions of race and ethnicity structure contemporary societies. 


ANTH 23. Debating Multiculturalism: Race, Ethnicity, and Class in American Societies (4)
This course focuses on the debate about multiculturalism in American society. It examines the interaction of race, ethnicity, and class, historically and comparatively, and considers the problem of citizenship in relation to the growing polarization of multiple social identities. 


ANTH 42. Primates in a Human-Dominated World (4)
Major primate field studies will be studied to illustrate common features of primate behavior and behavioral </a>diversity. Topics will include communication, female hierarchies, protocultural behavior, social learning and tool use, play, cognition, and self-awareness.


ANTH 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges. Topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen.<strong> </strong>


ANTH 101. Foundations of Social Complexity (4)
 required. 


ANTH 196A. Honors Studies in Anthropology (4)
  Department approval required. (P/NP grades only.)


ANTH 196B. Honors Studies in Anthropology (4)
The Senior Seminar Program is designed to allow senior undergraduates to meet with faculty members in a small group setting to explore an intellectual topic in anthropology (at the upper-division level). Senior Seminars may be offered in all campus departments. Topics will vary from quarter to quarter. Senior Seminars may be taken for credit up to four times, with a change in topic, and consent of the department. Enrollment is limited to twenty students, with preference given to seniors. 


ANTH 196C. Thesis Research (4)
 upper-division standing; department stamp and/or consent of instructor.


ANTH 197. Field Studies (4)
Course gives students experience in teaching of anthropology at the lower-division level. Students, under direction of instructor, lead discussion sections, attend lectures, review course readings, and meet regularly to prepare course materials and to evaluate examinations and papers. Course not counted toward minor or major. P/NP grades only. 


ANTH 198. Directed Group Study (2–4)
 Student will need to apply for the Undergraduate Instructional Apprentice position through ASES, fulfill the Academic Senate Regulations, and receive the approval of the department, instructor, department chair, and Academic Senate.


ANTH 199. Independent Study (2–4)
Seminar to explore student research interests and methodologies needed to complete Honors Thesis in ANTH 196B. Students will be admitted to the Honors Program by invitation of the department in the spring of their sophomore year. Completion of this course with a grade of at least B+ is a prerequisite to ANTH 196B. 


ANAR 100. Special Topics in Anthropological Archaeology (4)
 department approval required. 


ANAR 103. Archaeology in the Holy Land (4)
Independent preparation of a senior thesis under the supervision of a faculty member. Students begin two-quarter sequence in fall quarter. 


ANAR 111. Foundations of Archaeology (4)
A weekly research seminar where students share, read, and discuss in-depth research findings resulting from ANTH 196A and 196B along with selected background literature used in each individual thesis. Students are also taught how to turn their theses into brief presentations for both specialized and broader audiences. Students will be offered opportunities to present their findings at campus events and outreach events during the quarter. 


ANAR 112. Ancient Urbanism (4)
ANTH 196A-B.


ANAR 118. Archaeology of the UC San Diego Campus (4)
Individually arranged field studies giving practical experience outside the university. Student may take this course twice for credit. Please note: Majors may only apply eight units of approved P/NP credit toward the major, and minors may only apply four units of P/NP credit toward the minor. Please contact the department for a list of courses you may take on a P/NP basis and apply toward the major or minor. 


ANAR 119S. Archaeological Field and Lab Class (8)
 consent of instructor and upper-division standing with minimum GPA of 2.5, and completed and approved Special Studies form. Department approval required. (Formerly known as ANPR 197.) 


ANAR 121A. Digital Archaeology/GIS Foundations (4)
Directed group study on a topic or in a field not included in the regular departmental curriculum by special arrangement with a faculty member. Student may take this course twice for credit. Please note: Majors may only apply eight units of approved P/NP credit toward the major, and minors may only apply four units of P/NP credit toward the minor. Please contact the department for a list of courses you may take on a P/NP basis and apply toward the major or minor. 


ANAR 125. Weapons and Warfare in the Ancient Near East (4)
 consent of instructor and upper-division standing with minimum GPA of 2.5, and completed and approved Special Studies form. Department approval required. (Formerly known as ANPR 198.)


ANAR 138. Mesopotamia: The Emergence of Civilization (4)
Independent study and research under the direction of a member of the faculty. Student may take this course twice for credit. Please note: majors may only apply eight units of approved P/NP credit toward the major, and minors may only apply four units of P/NP credit toward the minor. Please contact the department for a list of courses you may take on a P/NP basis and apply toward the major or minor. 


ANAR 140: The Foundation for Social Complexity in the Near East (4)
 consent of instructor and upper-division standing with minimum GPA of 2.5, and completed and approved Special Studies form. Department approval required. (Formerly known as ANPR 199.)		


ANAR 141. Prehistory of the Holy Land (4)
Course will vary in title and content. When offered, the current description and title is found in the current Schedule of Classes and the Department of Anthropology website. May be taken for credit four times.  


ANAR 142. The Rise and Fall of Ancient Israel (4)
The Holy Land (Israel, Jordan, Palestinian territories) represents a land bridge between Africa and Southwest Asia. Here we explore human foundations from the Paleolithic (ca. 2 million years BP) to the rise of Early Bronze Age cities (ca. 3000 BCE). 


ANAR 143. Archaeology, Anthropology, and the Bible (4)
 


ANAR 144. Pharaohs, Mummies, and Pyramids: Introduction to Egyptology (4)
As part of the broad discipline of anthropology, archaeology provides the long chronological record needed for investigating human and social evolution. The theories and methods used in this field are examined. (Archaeology core sequence course.) Recommended preparation: ANTH 3. 


ANAR 145S. Study Abroad: Egypt of the Pharaohs (4)
The origins and development of early cities in the Old and New Worlds are compared and contrasted from an archaeological anthropological perspective. 


ANAR 153. The Mysterious Maya (4)
Our campus houses some of the earliest human settlements in North America. This course reviews the archaeology, climate, and environment of the sites and outlines research aimed at understanding the lives of these early peoples. 


ANAR 154. The Aztecs and their Ancestors (4)
The archaeological field and laboratory class will take place at Moquegua, Peru. It is an introduction to the research design of interdisciplinary projects, the technique of data collections, the methods of excavation and postexcavation lab work. Course materials fee may apply. 


ANAR 155S. Study Abroad: Ancient Mesoamerica (4)
Concerns modern archaeological data with Geographic Information Systems (GIS) and performing spatial analysis. Lectures and lab exercises—learn spatio-temporal analysis techniques with interactive online computer mapping. Hands-on skills with ArcView, GIS, and several ArcView extensions. 


ANAR 156. The Archaeology of South America (4)
Warfare has been a central part of human culture and society from earliest times, and the ample archaeological and textual materials from the ancient Near East enable us to understand the development of sociocultural and technological aspects related to warfare from late prehistoric cultures and onward. Here we present relevant issues on weapons, warfare, and related facets from the late Prehistoric, Bronze, and Iron Ages of the ancient Near East, including Egypt, the Levant, Mesopotamia, and beyond. 


ANAR 157. Early Empires of the Andes: The Middle Horizon (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANAR 157S. Early Empires of the Andes: The Middle Horizon (4)
This course explores in detail the rise of the world's earliest cities and states in Mesopotamia and the ancient Near East during the fourth millennium B.C. 


ANAR 158. The Inca: Empire of the Andes (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANAR 160. Ancient Maya: Archaeological Problems and Perspectives (4)
This course critically examines the theoretical models and archaeological evidence of nascent social complexity and inequality in the Near East. The time period under consideration encompasses the shift from generalized hunting and gathering through complex hunter-gatherers to large-scale agricultural communities. 


ANAR 163. Evolution of Technology (4)
Israel is a land-bridge between Africa and Asia. Course highlights the prehistory of the Levant and its interconnections from the Paleolithic to the rise of the earliest cities in anthropological perspective. 


ANAR 170. Research Design in Anthropological Archaeology (4)
 


ANAR 180. Archaeology Workshop (4)
The emergence and consolidation of the state in ancient Israel is explored by using archaeological data, biblical texts, and anthropological theories. The social and economic processes responsible for the rise and collapse of ancient Israel are investigated. Recommended preparation: ANTH 3. 


ANAR 181. The Archaeology of Hunters-Gatherers (4)
The relationship between archaeological data, historical research, the Hebrew Bible, and anthropological theory are explored along with new methods and current debates in Levantine archaeology. 


ANAR 182. Origins of Agriculture and Sedentism (4)
An introductory survey of the archaeology, history, art, and architecture of ancient Egypt that focuses on the men and women who shaped Western civilization. 


ANAR 183. Chiefdoms, States, and the Emergence of Civilizations (4)
Introduction to the archaeology, history, art, architecture, and hieroglyphs of ancient Egypt. Taught in the field through visits to important temples, pyramids, palaces, and museums in Egypt. Complementary to ANAR 144. Course/program fee may apply. 


ANAR 184. The Political Economy of Early Empires (4)
 consent of instructor only. 


ANAR 185. Middle East Desert Cultural Ecology (4)
The archaeology, anthropology, and history of the Maya civilization, which thrived in Mexico and Central America from 1000 BC, until the Spanish conquest. 


ANAR 186. The Human Era: The Archaeology of the Anthropocene (4)
Introduction to the archaeology of the ancient culture of Mexico from the early Olmec culture through the Postclassic Aztec, Tarascan, Zapotec, and Mixtec states. Agriculture; trade and exchange; political and social organization; kinship networks; religious system, ideology, and worldviews. 


ANAR 190. Middle East Archaeological Field School (12)
Introduction to archaeology of Mesoamerica, taught through visits to important ancient cities and museums of Mexico and Central America. Complementary to ANAR 154. Itinerary and subject will vary, so course may be taken more than once. Course/program fee may apply. 


ANAR 191. Advanced Cyber-Archaeology Field School (12)
(Formerly known as ANRG 106.) Credit not allowed for both ANRG 106 and ANAR 155S. 


ANBI 100. Special Topics in Biological Anthropology (4)
This course will examine archaeological evidence for the development of societies in the South American continent. From the initial arrival of populations through to the Inca period and the arrival of the Spaniards. 


ANBI 109. Brain Mind Workshop (2)
The civilizations of Wari and Tiwanaku built the first empires of Andean South America long before the Inca. Middle Horizon (AD 500–1000) mythohistory, urbanism, state origins, art, technology, agriculture, colonization, trade, and conquest are explored using ethnohistory and archaeological sources.


ANBI 111. Advanced Principles of Human Evolution (4)
The civilizations of Wari and Tiwanaku built the first empires of Andean South America long before the Inca. Middle Horizon (AD 500–1000) mythohistory, urbanism, state origins, art, technology, agriculture, colonization, trade, and conquest are explored using ethnohistory and archaeological sources. 


ANBI 112. Methods in Human Comparative Neuroscience (4)
upper-division standing or consent of instructor.   


ANBI 114. Methods in Primate Conservation (4)
The history and culture of the Inca Empire of South America and its fatal encounter with the West. Archaeological excavations, accounts from the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, and ethnographies of present-day peoples of the Andes are explored. 


ANBI 116. Human Sexuality in an Evolutionary Perspective (4)
This course considers in detail a particular region or archaeological site within the Maya area. Content will cover primary literature on Maya archaeology, epigraphy, and art history. Course content will vary based on the specific region/site. May be taken for credit three times. 


ANBI 120. The Immortal Life of Henrietta Lacks and Other Ethical Dilemmas (4)
upper-division standing and ANAR 153. Graduate students wishing to enroll should have already taken ANTH 202.


ANBI 130. Biology of Inequality (4)
While not really existing outside the social order, technological systems are basic to civilization. This course examines their growth across six millennia—complex, largely indeterminate, and marked by irregular spurts of acceleration. While comparative, it concentrates on England and America. 


ANBI 131. Biology and Culture of Race (4)
This course trains students to design, implement, and conduct research in anthropological archaeology. Writing and presenting work in progress will take place in a seminar-like forum. 


ANBI 132. Conservation and the Human Predicament (4)
This course examines the ways in which archaeologists study ancient artifacts, contexts, and their distribution in time and space to interpret ancient cultures. It will cover basic techniques of collections and field research with particular concentration on the quantitative contextual, spatial, stylistic, and technological analyses of artifacts and ecofacts from ongoing UC San Diego field projects in archaeology. 


ANBI 133.  Planet of the Apes: Evolution and Ecology of the Great Ape (4)
department approval required.


ANBI 140. The Evolution of the Human Brain (4)
Course examines current theoretical issues in the field of hunter-gatherer archaeology. Considerable emphasis is given to ethnographic and ethno-archaeological sources for understanding such topics as prehistoric hunter-gatherer adaptations, culture change, social organization, and intergroup interaction.  Recommended preparation: ANTH 3. 


ANBI 141. The Evolution of Human Diet (4)
Varying theoretical models and available archaeological evidence are examined to illuminate the socio-evolutionary transition from nomadic hunter-gathering groups to fully sedentary agricultural societies in the Old and New Worlds. Archaeology concentration course. Recommended preparation: ANTH 3. 


ANBI 142. The Primate Skeleton (4)
The course focuses on theoretical models for the evolution of complex societies and on archaeological evidence for the development of various pre- and protohistoric states in selected areas of the Old and New Worlds. Archaeology concentration course. Recommended preparation: ANTH 3.  


ANBI 143. The Human Skeleton (4)
Archaeological and textual evidence for selected early empires of pre-Columbian America and the ancient Near East will be used to illuminate cross-cultural similarities and differences in the ways complex precapitalistic societies acquired, produced, exchanged, and distributed wealth. Recommended preparation: ANTH 3. 


ANBI 144. Human Anatomy (4)
The course uses a comparative perspective to examine changes in how human societies organized themselves after the end of the last Ice Age across the world and the impact that those changes had on the planet’s natural environment.


ANBI 145. Bioarchaeology (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANBI 146. Stable Isotopes in Ecology (4)
The archaeological field school will take place in Jordan. It is an introduction to the design of research projects, the techniques of data collection, and the methods of excavation. Includes post-excavation lab work, study trips, and field journal. Program fee may apply. 


ANBI 148. Not by Genes Alone: Evolution, Behavior, and Ecology (4)
 


ANBI 150. The Human Machine: The Skeleton Within (4)
upper-division standing or consent of instructor. (Formerly known as ANPR 190.) Credit not allowed for both ANPR 190 and ANAR 190. 


ANBI 159. Biological and Cultural Perspectives on Intelligence (4)
Students learn advanced field methods in cyber-archaeology and excavation. Includes 3-D data capture tools and processing, digital photography, construction of research designs, cyber-infrastructure. Takes place in Jordan and/or Israel. Program fee may apply. 


ANBI 173. How Monkeys See the World (4)
 upper-division standing, for advanced students who have taken ANAR 190 or consent of instructor.		


ANBI 175. Paleofantasy: The Evidence for Our Early Ancestors (4)
Course usually taught by visiting faculty in biological anthropology. Course will vary in title and content. When offered, the current description and title is found in the current Schedule
of Classes and the Department of Anthropology website. May be taken for credit four times as topics vary.


ANBI 187A. Intern Seminar in Physical Anthropology (2)
 upper-division standing.


ANBI 187C. Intern Seminar in Ethology (2)
A weekly forum for presentation and discussion of work in anthropology and cognitive neuroscience by faculty, students, and guest speakers. P/NP only. Please note: Majors may only apply eight units of approved P/NP credit toward the major, and minors may only apply four units of P/NP credit toward the minor. 


ANSC 100. Special Topics in Sociocultural Anthropology (4)
 upper-division standing. 


ANSC 101. Aging: Culture and Health in Late Life Human Development (4)
Major stages of human evolution including the fossil evidence for biological and cultural changes through time. 


ANSC 102. The Anthropology of Work (4)
 


ANSC 103. Photography and Visual Culture (4)
Cytoarchitecture reveals the fundamental structural organization of the human brain and stereology extracts quantitative information in a three dimensional space. Students will learn the principles of both fields and their applications. 


ANSC 105. Global Health and Inequality (4)
upper-division standing, ANBI 140, and consent of instructor.


ANSC 105S. Global Health and Inequality–Study Abroad (4)
Primate (and other vertebrate) conservation involves a variety of methods: field (e.g., population and habitat assessment), computer (e.g. population genetic models), and increasingly the web (e.g. interactive GIS and databases). Course takes problem-solving approach to learning some of these methods. Recommended preparation: ANBI 132/BIEB 176. 


ANSC 106. Global Health: Indigenous Medicines in Latin America (4)
ANTH 42 or equivalent; upper-division standing. 


ANSC 106S. Global Health: Indigenous Medicines in Latin America—Study Abroad (4)
This course examines how human sexuality evolved and how it is similar/dissimilar to that of other primates. The topics include the evolution of mating strategies and parenting strategies including the role of sexual selection and how hormones control these behaviors. 


ANSC 107. Meaning and Symbols in Social Life (4)
All human endeavors are subject to human biases. We’ll cover several issues that are subject to such biases: “race” concept; transfer of human remains to Native American tribal members; nonhuman primate testing; and use of human materials, including cell lines. 


ANSC 108. Tourism and Global Culture (4)
 upper-division standing and ANTH 2.


ANSC 109. Jokes, Monsters, and Strangers: Otherness within Cultures (4)
Biological and health consequences of racial and social inequalities. Psychosocial stress and measurement of health impact. Effects on disease and precursors to disease, including measures of molecular biology (e.g., epigenetics, gene expression), and biomarkers of inflammation, cardiometabolic health, and immune function. 


ANSC 111. The Chinese Heritage in Taiwan (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANSC 112. Linguistic Anthropology Workshop (2)
This course examines conceptions of race from both evolutionary and sociocultural perspectives. We will examine current patterns of human genetic variation and critically determine how these patterns map onto current and historic conceptions of race in the United States, and abroad. We will also explore the social construction of race throughout US history, the use of racial categories in biomedicine today, and consequences of racism and discrimination on health.


ANSC 113. Language, Style, and Youth Identities (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANSC 116. Languages of the Americas: Mayan (4)
Same as BIEB 176.) Interdisciplinary discussion of the human predicament, biodiversity crisis, and importance of biological conservation. Examines issues from biological, cultural, historical, economic, social, political, and ethical perspectives emphasizing new approaches and new techniques for safeguarding the future of humans and other biosphere inhabitants. 


ANSC 117GS. Language and (Multi)Culture (4)
The great apes are our closest living relatives and their ecology and evolution provide insights for human evolutionary history and perhaps ideas about how to coexist with them. The course examines the natural history, behavior, ecology, and life history of each of the great apes including: orangutans, gorillas, bonobos, and chimpanzees. We will also consider conservation issues facing wild great apes, the welfare of apes in captivity, and ethical debates on ape “personhood.” 


ANSC 118. Language and Culture (4)
upper-division standing.


ANSC 119. Gesture, Communication, and the Body (4)
Introduction to the organization of the brain of humans and apes. Overview of the theoretical perspectives on the evolution of the primate cortex and limbic system. Exposure to contemporary techniques applied to the comparative study of the hominoid brain. 


ANSC 119GS. Gesture, Communication, and the Body (4)
The genotype of our ancestors had no agriculture or animal domestication, or rudimentary technology. Our modern diet contributes to heart disease, cancers, and diabetes. This course will outline the natural diet of primates and compare it with early human diets


ANSC 120. Anthropology of Religion (4)
This course will compare long bones, head, and torso shape in tree-living and ground-living primates. The emphasis is on correlating locomotion with bone shapes. 


ANSC 121. Psychological Anthropology (4)
Learn the bones of your body; how bone pairs differ even within the body, between men, women, ethnic groups; and how nutrition and disease affect them. Course examines each bone and its relation with other bones and muscles that allow your movements. 


ANSC 122. Language in Society (4)
This course will introduce students to the internal structure of the human body through dissection tutorials on CD-ROM. 


ANSC 123. Political Anthropology (4)
How are skeletal remains used to reconstruct human livelihoods throughout prehistory? The effects of growth, use, and pathology on morphology and the ways that skeletal remains are understood and interpreted by contemporary schools of thought. Recommend related course in human anatomy. 


ANSC 124. Cultural Anthropology (4)
The stable isotopes of carbon, nitrogen, oxygen, and hydrogen in animal tissues, plant tissues, and soils indicate aspects of diet and ecology. The course will introduce students to this approach for reconstructing paleo-diet, paleo-ecology, and paleo-climate. 


ANSC 125. Gender, Sexuality, and Society (4)
The course examines various behaviors (e.g., group formation, dispersal, parenting, coalition formation) from a comparative and evolutionary perspective. Observational methodology and analytical methods will also be discussed. Attendance in lab sections is required. 


ANSC 126. Childhood and Adolescence (4)
The course will provide an introduction to bones as a tissue, to different bones in the body, and the ligaments and muscles surrounding major joints. You will learn how the skeleton, ligaments, and muscles support our mode of locomotion; the differences between male and female skeletons; and the differences across human populations. You will see how nutrition and disease can affect bones. Course examines functional areas within the body. 


ANSC 127. Discourse, Interaction, and Social Life (4)
upper-division standing.


ANSC 128. Culture and Emotion (4)
Attitudes toward other individuals (and species) are often shaped by their apparent “intelligence.” This course discusses the significance of brain size/complexity, I.Q. tests, communication in marine mammals and apes, complex behavioral tactics, and the evolution of intelligence


ANSC 129. Meaning and Healing (4)
The last divide between humans and other animals is in the area of cognition. A comparative perspective to explore recent radical reinterpretations of the cognitive abilities of different primate species, including humans and their implications for the construction of evolutionary scenarios. 


ANSC 130. Hinduism (4)
 


ANSC 131. Language, Law, and Social Justice (4)
Models of human evolution combine science and myth. This course examines methods used in reconstructions of human evolution. Models such as “man the hunter” and “woman the gatherer” are examined in light of underlying assumptions, and cultural ideals. 


ANSC 133. Peoples and Cultures of the Middle East (4)
Seminar complements students’ research in the Academic Internship Program in physical anthropology at the Museum of Man. Readings and discussions focus on anatomy, pathology, and classification and X-ray analysis of skeletal remains. Research paper required. 


ANSC 134. Global Islam (4)
ANTH 2 (or equivalent) and 3.3 GPA, simultaneous enrollment in AIP 197, Physical Anthropology-Museum of Man. Department approval required. (P/NP grades only.)


ANSC 135. Indigenous Peoples of Latin America (4)
Seminar complements students’ research in the Academic Internship Program at the San Diego Zoo Safari Park and/or Zoo. Focus on problems of analysis in observational study of animal behavior and conservation in relation to ethological studies. Research paper required. 


ANSC 136. Traditional Chinese Society (4)
 


ANSC 137. Chinese Popular Religion (4)
Examines aging as process of human development, from local and global perspectives. Focuses on the interrelationships of social, cultural, psychological, and health factors that shape the experience and well-being of aging populations. Students explore the challenges and wisdom of aging. 


ANSC 138. The Cultural Design Practicum: Using Anthropology to Solve Human Problems (4)
upper-division standing.


ANSC 140. Human Rights II: Contemporary Issues (4)
This course examines how work gives shape to our lives: how having a job relates to our sense of self, how it organizes our time and space, and how it affects our relationships with family and friends.


ANSC 141. Language, Politics, and Identity (4)
upper-division standing.


ANSC 142. Anthropology of Latin America (4)
This course considers how people in different cultures define and practice sight. We give special attention to photography, and we ask how different definitions of social relations are reflected and created in ways humans organize their visual worlds. 


ANSC 143. Mental Health as Global Health Priority (4)
 upper-division standing. 


ANSC 144. Immigrant and Refugee Health (4)
Why is there variation of health outcomes across the world? We will discuss health and illness in context of culture and address concerns in cross-national health variations by comparing healthcare systems in developed, underdeveloped, and developing countries. Study the role of socioeconomic and political change in determining health outcomes and examine social health determinants in contemporary global health problems: multidrug resistance to antibiotics, gender violence, human trafficking, etc. 


ANSC 145. Indigenous Peoples of North America (4)
 Freshmen and sophomores cannot enroll without consent of the instructor.


ANSC 146. A Global Health Perspective on HIV (4)
Why is there variation of health outcomes across the world? We will discuss health and illness in context of culture and address concerns in cross-national health variations by comparing healthcare systems in developed, underdeveloped, and developing countries. Study the role of socioeconomic and political change in determining health outcomes and examine social health determinants in contemporary global health problems: multidrug resistance to antibiotics, gender violence, and human trafficking, etc.


ANSC 147. Global Health and the Environment (4)
 ANTH 21 or ANTH 23. Students must apply to the Study Abroad Program online at anthro.ucsd.edu.


ANSC 148. Global Health and Cultural Diversity (4)
Drawing on medical anthropology ethnography, students will explore a variety of forms of healing among rural and urban indigenous communities. A particular focus on intercultural health will allow the students to analyze contemporary medical landscapes where patients encounter indigenous and Western medicine. Students will learn about the complexities of urban and rural indigenous healing settings and their sociopolitical significance in contexts of state biomedical interventions. 


ANSC 150. Culture and Mental Health (4)
ANTH 21 or ANTH 23. Freshmen and sophomores cannot enroll without consent of the instructor.


ANSC 151. U.S.-Mexico Border Ethnographies (4)
Drawing on medical anthropology ethnography, students will explore a variety of forms of healing among rural and urban indigenous communities. A particular focus on intercultural health will allow the students to analyze contemporary medical landscapes where patients encounter indigenous and Western medicine. Students will learn about the complexities of urban and rural indigenous healing settings and their sociopolitical significance in contexts of state biomedical interventions. 


ANSC 152. Political Correctness (4)
ANTH 21 or ANTH 23. Students must apply to the Study Abroad Program online at 


ANSC 154. Gender and Religion (4)
.


ANSC 155. Humanitarian Aid: What Is It Good For? (4)
This course examines anthropological work that understands human individual and collective life to consist centrally of processes of signification, or the making and shaping of meanings. Traditions considered include structuralism, symbolic anthropology, and linguistic/semiotic anthropology (applied beyond language alone). 


ANSC 156. Mad Films: Cultural Studies of Mental Illness in Cinema (4)
upper-division standing. 


ANSC 157. Imagining City and Community in Modern Europe (4)
This course examines structures of interaction between tourists and communities they visit. Topics addressed include authenticity, commodification, primitivism, photography, travel writing, television, stereotypes that tourists and visited peoples hold about each other, and tourism’s links to sociocultural conditions of modernity. 


ANSC 158. Comparative Anthropology of Crisis (4)
upper-division standing or consent of instructor.


ANSC 159. The Anthropology of Marriage (4)
This course looks cross-culturally at jokes, monsters, and other actions or relations in which people make otherness central to their lives. We ask how these phenomena relate to anthropological understandings of culture as collective norms of communication and evaluation. 


ANSC 160. Nature, Culture, and Environmentalism (4)
 upper-division standing. 


ANSC 162. Language, Identity, and Community (4)
This course will provide an anthropological perspective on Chinese culture in Taiwan from its earliest settlement to the present, including distinctive Taiwanese variants of traditional Chinese marriage and family life, institutions, festivals, agricultural practices, etc. 


ANSC 163. Culture and Communication in Education (4)
upper-division standing.


ANSC 164. Introduction to Medical Anthropology (4)
A weekly forum for presentation and discussion of work in linguistic anthropology by faculty, students, and guest speakers. P/NP grades only. May be taken for credit three times. Note: Majors may only apply eight units of approved P/NP credit toward the major, and minors may only apply four units of P/NP credit toward the minor. 


ANSC 165. Contemporary South Asia (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANSC 166. Film and Culture in Asia (4)
Young people draw on language as well as clothing and music to display identities in contemporary societies. We examine the relation of language to race, class, gender, and ethnicity in youth identity construction, especially in multilingual and multiracial societies. 


ANSC 167. Rituals and Celebrations (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANSC 168. The Human Condition (4)
An introduction to the languages and cultures of speakers of the Mayan family of languages, with emphasis on linguistic structures, ethnography, and the social history of the region. The course will concentrate on linguistic and ethnographic literature of a single language or sub-branch, emphasizing commonalities with the family and region as a whole. 


ANSC 169. Culture and Environment: Research Seminar and Practicum (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANSC 170. Modernity and Human Experience (4)
A critical introduction to the study of cultural patterns of thought, action, and expression, in relation to language. Topics include semiotics and structuralism, cognition and categorization, universal vs. particulars, and ethnopoetics. 


ANSC 171. Multimodal Methods in Ethnography (4)
 upper-division standing or consent of instructor.


ANSC 172. Life-History Seminar and Practicum (4)
An introduction to the study of cultural patterns of thought, action, and expression, in relation to language. We consider comparatively semiotics and structuralism, cognition and categorization, universals versus particulars, ideologies of stasis and change, cultural reconstruction, and ethnopoetics. 


ANSC 173. Ethnography in Practice (4)
 


ANSC 174. Sex and Money: The Anthropology of Sex Work (4)
The course is an introduction to a flourishing area of research that connects linguistic communication to alternate and complementary modalities—manual gesticulation, the face, the body, and aspects of the “lived environment” (spaces, tools, artifacts). 


ANSC 175. Money, Work, and Nature: The Anthropology of Capitalism (4)
 upper-division standing. (Credit not allowed for both ANSC 119GS and ANSC 119.) 


ANSC 176. Critical Military Studies (4)
A critical examination of research connecting language to alternate complementary modalities—the hands, face, body, and aspects of "lived environments" (spaces, tools, artifacts). Program or material fee may apply. 


ANSC 177. Step Into Anthrohistory: The Past and Its Hold on the Future (4)
 upper-division standing or consent of instructor. Students must apply and be accepted to the Global Seminar Program.


ANSC 178. Brain, Mind, Culture, and History (4)
Explores religious life in various cultures. Topics addressed include the problem of religious meaning, psychocultural aspects of religious experience, religious conversion and revitalization, contrasts between traditional and world religions, religion and social change. 


ANSC 179. The New Economic Anthropology: Producing, Consuming, and Exchanging Stuff Worldwide (4)
Interrelationships of aspects of individual personality and various aspects of sociocultural systems are considered. Relations of sociocultural contexts to motives, values, cognition, personal adjustment, stress and pathology, and qualities of personal experience are emphasized. 


ANSC 180. Labor’s Relations (4)
After a brief introduction to linguistic concepts, the course covers the relations between culture and language, how languages reflect culture, how languages change, language and social life, language and political policy. 


ANSC 181. Animal Affairs (4)
Humans are goal seekers, some with public goals. Course considers ways goals are pursued, which are desirable, and how this pursuit is carried out at the local level with attention to the parts played by legitimacy and coercion. 


ANSC 189. The Anthropology of the End of the World: Millenarian Movements Across Cultures (4)
This course introduces the concept of culture and the debates surrounding it. Cultural anthropology asks how people create meaning and order in society, how culture intersects with power, and how national and global forces impact local meanings and practices. 


ANTH 201. Special Topics in Anthropological Archaeology (4)
How are gender and sexuality shaped by cultural ideologies, social institutions, and social change? We explore their connections to such dimensions of society as kinship and family, the state, religion, and popular culture. We also examine alternative genders/sexualities cross-culturally. 


ANTH 202. Olmec and Maya Archaeology (4)
This course examines the diversity of practices of child-rearing, socialization, and enculturation across cultures, and the role of culture in the development of personality, morality, spirituality, sexuality, emotion, and cognition. 


ANTH 204. Contemporary Anthropology (4)
 


ANTH 206. Race, Ethnicity, and Citizenship (4)
The course considers how social life is constituted and negotiated through language and interaction. How do people establish, maintain, and alter social relationships through face-to-face talk, and how do different modalities of interaction (including discourse and gesture) affect social life? 


ANTH 207. Eastern Mediterranean Archaeology—New Perspectives (4)
 


ANTH 210. Religion and Globalization (4)
This course examines the diversity of emotional experience in human societies and the contribution of the study of emotion to understanding culture and human nature. 


ANTH 211. Psychoanalysis and Religion (4)
 


ANTH 212. Advanced Topics in Biological Anthropology (4)
This course examines the nature of healing across cultures, with special emphasis on religious and ritual healing. 


ANTH 213. Anthropology and Mental Health (4)
 


ANTH 214. Kin, Land, and Labor-Cultivating Relations (4)
An anthropological introduction to Hinduism, focusing on basic religious concepts and practices. Topics include myth, ritual, and symbolism; forms of worship; gods and goddesses; the roles of priest and renouncer; pilgrimages and festivals; the life cycle; popular Hinduism, Tantrism. 


ANTH 215. Advanced Topics in Sociocultural Anthropology (4)
Legal systems are central in (re)organizing social institutions, international arrangements, (in)equalities, and are an arena where linguistic practices predominate and define outcomes. With an anthropological approach to language, examine languages of the law, legal conceptions of language, and most importantly, the nature and structure of talk in a range of legal institutions and activities. Students will engage in direct anthropological fieldwork in local contexts involving the legal bureaucracy. 


ANTH 216. Global Pentecostalism (4)
 upper-division standing. 


ANTH 217. Materiality (4)
This course explores the living structures, family and gender relations, economy, and religion in the Middle East. We will especially focus on how people come to terms with recent transformations such as nationalism, literacy, globalism, and Islamism. 


ANTH 218. Anthropology of the State and Governance (4)
Course aims to understand the diverse ways in which Muslims give meaning to their religion and use it as a framework to understand the world. 


ANTH 219. Seminar in Political Anthropology (4)
Indigenous peoples in the Americas have long been dominated and exploited. They have also resisted and reworked the powerful forces affecting them. This course will trace this centuries-long contestation, focusing on ways anthropological representations have affected those struggles. 


ANTH 220. The Human Body in Discourse and Experience (4)
Course examines major institutions and culture patterns of traditional China, especially as studied through ethnographic sources. Topics include familism, religion, agriculture, social mobility, and personality. 


ANTH 221. Phenomenology of Perception (4)
The religious world of ordinary precommunist times, with some reference to major Chinese religious traditions. Recommended preparation: background in premodern Chinese history. 


ANTH 222. Anthropological Studies of Subjectivity (4)
Explores anthropological approaches to finding solutions to human problems. Using cultural analysis and ethnographic approaches, students conduct supervised field projects to assess real-world problems and then design, evaluate, and communicate possible solutions. 


ANTH 223. Anthropological Interviewing (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANTH 224. Advanced Topics in the Anthropology of Gender (4)
(Same as HMNR 101.) Interdisciplinary discussion that outlines the structure and functioning of the contemporary human rights regime, and then delves into the relationship between selected human rights protections—against genocide, torture, enslavement, political persecution, etc.—and their violation, from the early Cold War to the present. 


ANTH 226. Ethnography of Christianity (4)
 CAT1 or CAT2 or CAT3 or CAT125 or DOC1 or DOC2 or DOC3 or HUM1 or HUM2 or HUM3 or HUM4 or HUM5 or MCWP40 or MCWP41 or MCWP50 or MCWP125 or MMW11 or MMW12 or MMW13 or MMW14 or MMW15 or MMW21 or MMW22 or WCWP10A or WCWP10B. 


ANTH 229. Religion and Healing (4)
This course explores the interrelationships of language, politics, and identity in the United States: the ways that language mediates politics and identity, the ways that the connection between identity and language is inherently political, and the ways that political language inevitably draws on identity in both subtle and explicit ways. 


ANTH 230. Department Colloquium (1)
upper-division standing or consent of instructor.


ANTH 232. Labor and Semiotics (4)
This course will examine the overarching legacies of colonialism, the persistence of indigenous peoples and cultures, the importance of class and land reform, the effects of neoliberalism, and citizens’ efforts to promote social change in contemporary democracies. 


ANTH 233. Critical Studies of Capitalism (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANTH 234. Dynamics of Culture (4)
Why is mental health a global concern? This anthropological course reviews globalization, culture, and mental health. We examine issues of social suffering, stigma, and economic burden associated with mental illness, gender inequality, political violence, "global security," pharmaceutical and illegal drugs. 


ANTH 239. Contemporary Religious Movements (4)
upper-division standing.


ANTH 240. Culture and Politics in Southeast Asia (4)
Examines physical and mental health sequaelae of internal and transnational movement of individuals and populations due to warfare, political violence, natural disaster, religious persecution, poverty and struggle for economic survival, and social suffering of communities abandoned by migrants and refugees. 


ANTH 242. Anthropology of Latin America (4)
 upper-division standing. 


ANTH 243. Mental Health as Global Health Priority (4)
This course addresses: 1) Diversity among traditional Native American cultures with respect to social organization, religion, environmental adaptation, subsistence, and reaction to colonial conquest and domination; and, 2) Contemporary social issues including tribal sovereignty, religious freedom, health, education, gambling, and repatriation of artifacts/remains. 


ANTH 244. Andean Prehistory: Origins of Chiefdoms and States (4)
 upper-division standing. 


ANTH 245. The Middle Horizon (4)
An introductory course on HIV taught through a medical student format, with emphasis on research and experiential learning, including observation of physicians providing care for patients from diverse socioeconomic and cultural backgrounds, some of whom may be underinsured/uninsured, homeless, and/or immigrants. 


ANTH 246. The Inca and the Late Horizon (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANTH 247. Multimodal Interaction (4)
Examines interactions of culture, health, and environment. Rural and urban human ecologies, their energy foundations, sociocultural systems, and characteristic health and environmental problems are explored. The role of culture and human values in designing solutions will be investigated. 


ANTH 248. Global Health and Cultural Diversity (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANTH 249. Gender and Mental Health (4)
Introduction to global health from the perspective of medical anthropology on disease and illness, cultural conceptions of health, doctor-patient interaction, illness experience, medical science and technology, mental health, infectious disease, and health-care inequalities by ethnicity, gender, and socioeconomic status. 


ANTH 250. The Anthropology of Human Rights (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANTH 251. The Ethnography of Modernity (4)
This course reviews mental health cross-culturally and transnationally. Issues examined are cultural shaping of the interpretation, experience, symptoms, treatment, course, and recovery of mental illness. World Health Organization findings of better outcome in non-European and North American countries are explored. 


ANTH 252. Interrogating Neoliberalism (4)
 upper-division standing. 


ANTH 253. Who Cares? Sympathy and the Conduct of Liberalism (4)
This course examines ethnographies of the US-Mexican borderlands to understand how the binational relationship shapes social life on both sides of the border. Topics discussed will include the maquiladora industry, drug trafficking, militarization, migration, tourism, missionary work, feminicide, and prostitution. 


ANTH 254. Dissertation Practicum (4)
upper-division standing or consent of instructor.


ANTH 255. Understanding the Human Social Order (4)
This course will focus on the way subjective experience is transformed in situations related to rapid social change and how cultural creativity is reconfigured in a way that generates a family of phenomena of which political correctness is a prime example. 


ANTH 256. Seminar on Brain Evolution (4)
upper-division standing.


ANTH 257. Mind, Self, and Identity (4)
How and why is gender important to religious practices, doctrines, and ideologies? Focusing on modern Islam, Christianity, and Judaism, we will look at women's involvement in religious movements as well as religious debates over issues of gender, sexuality, and marriage. 


ANTH 258. Analytical Methods in Archaeology (4)
upper-division standing.


ANTH 259. Gender and Mental Health (4)
This course examines the intended and unintended consequences of humanitarian aid. How do organizations negotiate principles of equality with the reality of limited resources? What role does medicine play in aid efforts? In spaces where multiple vulnerabilities coexist, how do we decide whom we should help first? While the need for aid, charity, and giving in the face of suffering is often taken as a commonsensical good, this course reveals the complexities underpinning humanitarian aid. 


ANTH 260. Seminar in Medical and Psychological Anthropology (4)
 ANTH 101, ANSC 123, ANSC 148, and upper-division standing. 


ANTH 261. Audio and Video Methods in Ethnography (4)
This course examines historical and cultural dimensions of madness as depicted in iconic and popular films such as “One Flew Over the Cuckoo’s Nest,” “Girl Interrupted,” “Silver Linings Playbook,” along with ethnographic and artistic films that utilize anthropological approaches. 


ANTH 262. New Directions in Culture, Politics, and History (4)
upper-division standing.


ANTH 274. Debates in Anthropology (4)
The peoples of Europe are in a process of social and political integration with global implications. This course will introduce students to the anthropological study of Europe by considering the social experience, and the built environment, of the European city. 


ANTH 279. Special Topics in Language and Society (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANTH 280A. Core Seminar in Social Anthropology (4)
Starting at the crisis of 2008, but with beginnings in the early 1980s, the theme of this course is the dynamic mechanisms that lead to crisis, systemic and otherwise. It will deal with historical and archaeological discussions of particular cases of breakdowns, collapses, and transformations. It also deals extensively with crisis misrecognition and its causes from moral dramas, witchcraft epidemics, intimate violence, overt conflict, ethnicity, etc.


ANTH 280B. Core Seminar in Cultural Anthropology (4)
 upper-division standing.


ANTH 280C. Core Seminar in Psychological Anthropology (4)
What can we learn by looking at a society's ideas about marriage, intimate relationships, and family? Why do these “private” institutions draw so much public scrutiny and debate? How are they linked to concepts of national progress, individualism, religion, status, or morality? We will explore these questions in Western and non-Western contexts through such topics as polygamy, same-sex marriage, transnational marriage, and the global impact of Western ideas of love and companionate marriage. 


ANTH 280D. Core Seminar in Anthropological Archaeology (4)
 upper-division standing. 


ANTH 280E. Core Seminar in Biological Anthropology (4)
Course examines theories concerning the relation of nature and culture. Particular attention is paid to explanations of differing ways cultures conceptualize nature. Along with examples from non-Western societies, the course examines the Western environmental ideas embedded in contemporary environmentalism. 


ANTH 280F. Core Seminar in Linguistic Anthropology (4)
This course examines the use of language difference in negotiating identity in bilingual and bidialectal communities, and in structuring interethnic relations. It addresses social tensions around language variation and the social significance of language choices in several societies. 


ANTH 281A. Introductory Seminar (1)
The ways in which language and culture influence educational goals and processes. Cultural and sociolinguistic explanations of school successes and failures are examined. 


ANTH 281B. Introductory Seminar (1)
This course explores contemporary cultural life in South Asia by examining selected works of literature, film, and ethnography. 


ANTH 283A. Fieldwork Seminar (4)
 


ANTH 284. Master Writing Practicum (4)
Explores films from China, India, Japan and other Asian countries. Popular, documentary, and ethnographic films are examined for what they reveal about family life, gender, politics, religion, social change and everyday experience in South Asia. 


ANTH 285. Grants Writing Practicum (4)
upper-division standing.


ANTH 286. Topics in Anthropological Archaeology (4)
Explores the nature and significance of ritual. The course will examine religious rituals, civic festivals, and popular celebrations. Topics include ritual symbolism, social and psychological aspects of ritual, life cycle rites, urban festivals, ritual theory. 


ANTH 288. Archaeology Practicum (12)
This course explores experiences of the human life cycle—birth, death, love, family relations, coming of age, suffering, the quest for identity, the need for meaning—from diverse cultural perspectives. Examines anthropological thought concerning what it means to be human. 


ANTH 289S. Tanzania Anthropogeny Study Tour (1–4)
upper-division standing. 


ANTH 291. Archaeology of Highland Mexico (4)
Examines the role of culture in the way people perceive and interact with the natural environment. Combines reading of select anthropological studies with training in ethnographic research methods. Students develop a research project and analyze data. Limit: fifteen students. 


ANTH 292. Social Evolution/Iron Age Levant (4)
upper-division standing or consent of instructor.


ANTH 293. Primate Socioecology (4)
What is modernity? How does it shape human experience? Using selected works of art, film, literature, anthropology, philosophy and social theory, the course explores conceptions of self, identity, and culture that characterize modernity. 


ANTH 295. Master’s Thesis Preparation (1–12)
upper-division standing. 


ANTH 296. Dissertation Fieldwork Proposal Preparation (4)
Examines methods for employing iconic recording techniques into ethnographic field research, with an emphasis on digital audio and video recording technologies and analysis. 


ANTH 297. Research Practicum (1–4)
 upper-division standing.


ANTH 298. Independent Study (1–4)
Examines life-history research as a method for understanding the cultural and psychological experience of people. Combines reading of life-histories with training in life-history research methods. Students develop a life-history project, conduct interviews, and analyze data.  


ANTH 299. Dissertation Research (1–12)
 upper-division standing or consent of instructor.


ANTH 500. Apprentice Teaching (4)
This practicum course will explore anthropology's traditional methodology, ethnography, through texts, films, and literature, and give students practical experience through a quarter-long case study.



http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/AUDL.html
AUD 236. Preceptorship in Neuro-Otology (2)
Observations in UC San Diego Otology clinic. Learn about procedures for taking histories and performing clinical examinations, patient treatment, and patient education from otologists. 


AUD 255. Anatomy and Physiology of the Auditory and Vestibular Systems (4)
 second-year AuD student or consent of instructor.


AUD 256. Pathophysiology of the Auditory and Vestibular Systems (4)
Detailed anatomy of the auditory and vestibular systems, including the ultra-structure, histology, and neuronal connections of the systems. In addition, physiological responses that underlie the actions of each system are described, from the cellular to the systems levels. 


AUD 257. Ear Diseases and Treatment (3)
 second-year AuD student or consent of instructor.


AUD 263. Physiological and Behavioral Tests of Vestibular Function (4)
Physiological and anatomical substrates of auditory and vestibular disorders including influences of neurological disorders. Topics include peripheral and central disorders, congenital disorders due to infections, as well as acquired ototoxic, noise-induced, infective, autoimmune, age-associated disorders, and traumatic disorders. 


AUD 264. Auditory and Vestibular Development and Genetics (3)
 AUD 255 or consent of instructor.


AUD 270. Newborn Hearing Screening and Management (3)
Differential diagnosis and treatment of auditory and vestibular disorders, audiological components of neuro-otology, as well as interactions between the audiologist and neuro-otologist in a clinical setting. 


AUD 271. Temporal Bone Anatomy (3)
 second-year AuD student or consent of instructor.


AUD 272. Central Auditory Processing Assessment and Management (4)
Clinical evaluation of vestibular function, using techniques such as caloric and rotational electronystagmography and posturography. The interpretation of clinical findings and implications for rehabilitative strategies will be covered. The course will include observation of testing in otology clinic settings. 


AUD 274. Advanced Technical Aspects of Hearing Amplification (4)
 second-year AuD student or consent of instructor.


AUD 275. Intraoperative Monitoring (3)
Embryology and functional development of the auditory and vestibular systems, from their initial appearance to adult function. Inherited disorders of these two sensory systems are also addressed, including phenotypic description and genetic basis. Genetic counseling and the potential for gene therapy are also discussed. 


AUD 276. Cochlear Implants and Other Implantable Sensory Aids (3)
 second- or third-year AuD student or consent of instructor.


AUD 284. Clinical Practice in Audiology II (1-4)
This course describes procedures and requirements for newborn hearing screening, and the detection and clinical management of congenital auditory disorders. Observations of newborn screening in a neonatal ICU environment. 


AUD 291. Clinical Case Studies/Staffing (1)
 second- or third-year AuD student or consent of instructor.


AUD 296. Research Practicum (3)
Detailed anatomy of the temporal bone, cranial nerves and basic neurophysiology for audiologists. Radiographic and magnetic resonance imaging of the temporal bone will be discussed. 


AUD 298. Independent Research (3)
 second- or third-year AuD student or consent of instructor.


AUD 299. Doctoral Project (3)
Central auditory processing assessment and management for pediatrics and adults. Focus on behavioral tests assessing dichotic listening, temporal processes, pattern recognition, performance with competing and degraded signals. 



http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/BIOI.html
BNFO 281. Seminar in Bioinformatics and Systems Biology (1)
Weekly seminars by faculty and visiting bioinformaticists presenting their research. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit nine times.


BNFO 283. Bioinformatics Student Research Talks (1)
Weekly presentations by bioinformatics and systems biology students about research projects that are proposed or completed. Faculty mentors are present to contribute critiques and suggestions. S/U grades only. May be taken for credit nine times. 


BNFO 284. Nonlinear Dynamics in Quantitative Biology (4)
bioinformatics and systems biology program graduate students only. 


BNFO 285. Statistical Learning in Bioinformatics (4)
Qualitative, analytical and computational mathematical modeling techniques applied to regulatory networks and signaling networks. Stability, bifurcations, oscillations, multistability, hysteresis, multiple time-scales, and chaos. Introduction to experimental data analysis and control techniques. Applications to synthetic biology, cellular population dynamics, ad canonical signaling networks (inflammation, tumor suppression, metabolism). Letter grades only. 


BNFO 298. Research Rotation (4–8)
bioinformatics and systems biology graduate students only.


BNFO 299. Graduate Research (1–12)
A hallmark of bioinformatics is the computational analysis of complex data. The combination of statistics and algorithms produce statistical learning methods that automate the analysis of complex data. Such machine learning methods are widely used in systems biology and bioinformatics. This course provides an introduction to statistical learning and assumes familiarity with key statistical methods. Letter grades only. 


BNFO 500. Teaching Assistantship (2–4)
Math 283. 



http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/BIOL.html
BILD 1. The Cell (4)
An introduction to cellular structure and function, to biological molecules, bioenergetics, to the genetics of both prokaryotic and eukaryotic organisms, and to the elements of molecular biology. 


BILD 2. Multicellular Life (4)
 Chem 6A; Chem 6B may be taken concurrently. 


BILD 3. Organismic and Evolutionary Biology (4)
An introduction to the development and the physiological processes of plants and animals. Included are treatments of reproduction, nutrition, respiration, transport systems, regulation of the internal environment, the nervous system, and behavior. 


BILD 4. Introductory Biology Lab (2)
 BILD 1. 


BILD 7. The Beginning of Life (4)
The first principles of evolutionary theory, classification, ecology,
				  and behavior; a phylogenetic synopsis of the major groups of organisms
				  from viruses to primates. 


BILD 10. Fundamental Concepts of Modern Biology (4)
 none. (


BILD 12. Neurobiology and Behavior (4)
 EBE
				  majors should complete this course during their first year at UC San Diego.)


BILD 18. Human Impact on the Environment (4)
Students gain hands-on experience and learn the theoretical basis of lab techniques common to a variety of biological disciplines such as biochemistry, molecular biology, cell biology, and bioinformatics. Students will work in groups, learning how to collect, analyze, and present data while using the scientific method to conduct inquiry-based laboratory experiments. Material lab fee will apply.


BILD 20. Human Genetics in Modern Society (4)
An introduction to the basic principles of plant and animal development, emphasizing the similar strategies by which diverse organisms develop. Practical applications of developmental principles as well as ethical considerations arising from these technologies will be discussed. 


BILD 22. Human Nutrition (4)
 none. 


BILD 26. Human Physiology (4)
An introduction to the biochemistry and genetics of cells and organisms; illustrations are drawn from microbiology and human biology. This course is designed for nonbiology students and does not satisfy a lower-division requirement for any biology major. Open to nonbiology majors only. Exclude the following major codes: BI28, BI29, BI30, BI31, BI32, BI33, BI34, BI35, BI36. 


BILD 36. AIDS Science and Society (4)
 Students may not receive credit for BILD
				  10 after receiving credit for BILD 1. 


BILD 38. Dementia, Science, and Society (4)
Course will focus on issues such as global warming, species extinction, and human impact on the oceans and forests. History and scientific projections will be examined in relation to these events. Possible solutions to these worldwide processes and a critical assessment of their causes and consequences will be covered. 


BILD 40. Introduction to Biomedical Research (2)
 none.


BILD 51. Quantitative Biology Project Lab (4)
Fundamentals of human genetics and introduction to modern genetic technology
				  such as gene cloning and DNA finger printing. Applications of these techniques,
				  such as forensic genetics, genetic screening, and genetic engineering.
				  Social impacts and ethical implications of these applications. This course
				  is designed for nonbiology students and does not satisfy a lower-division
				  requirement for any biology major. Open to nonbiology majors only. Exclude the following major codes: BI28, BI29, BI30, BI31, BI32, BI33, BI34, BI35, BI36. 


BILD 60. Biology and Diversity: Use and Misuse of Science to Justify Bias, Inequity, Exclusion, and Prejudice (4)
 Students may
				  not receive credit for BILD 20 after receiving credit for BICD 100. 


BILD 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
A survey of our understanding of the basic
				  chemistry and biology of human nutrition; discussions of all aspects of
				  food: nutritional value, diet, nutritional diseases, public health, and
				  public policy. This course is designed for nonbiology students and does
				  not satisfy a lower-division requirement for any biology major. Open to nonbiology majors only. Exclude the following major codes: BI28, BI29, BI30, BI31, BI32, BI33, BI34, BI35, BI36. 


BILD 91. Biology Freshmen: Strategies for Success (1)
 Students
  may not receive credit for BILD 22 after receiving credit for BIBC 120. 


BILD 92. Professional Development Topics in the Biological Sciences (1)
An introduction to all aspects of the AIDS epidemic. Topics will include the epidemiology, biology, and clinical aspects of HIV infection; HIV testing; education and approaches to therapy; and the social, political, and legal impacts of AIDS on the individual and society. This course is designed for nonbiology students and does not satisfy a lower-division requirement for any biology major. Open to nonbiology majors only. Exclude the following major codes: BI28, BI29, BI30, BI31, BI32, BI33, BI34, BI35, BI36. 


BILD 95. Undergraduate Workshops (1)
: Students may not receive credit for BILD 36 after receiving credit for BICD 136. 


BILD 96. Biology: Honors Seminar (2)
Introduction to basic human neuroscience leading to a discussion of brain diseases classified under the rubric Dementia. Topics include basic brain structure and function, diseases of the aging brain and their economic, social, political and ethical impacts on society.


BILD 99. Independent Research (2 or 4)
Course introduces students to some of the research approaches employed by physicians and scientists at the UC San Diego School of Medicine to investigate the etiology, biology, prevention and treatment of human diseases, including cancer, diabetes, and others. P/NP grades only.


BIBC 100. Structural Biochemistry (4)
Course covers two important aspects: (1) interdisciplinary and research-based education and (2) teaching fundamental experimental and computational skills in quantitative studies of living systems. Participation by application only. Material lab fee will apply.  


BIBC 102. Metabolic Biochemistry (4)
department approval required.    


BIBC 103. Biochemical Techniques (4)
This course will examine diversity, equity, and inclusion beginning with a biological framework. Focus will be on how underlying biological differences have been used to support bias and prejudice against particular groups such as women, African Americans, and Latinos. P/NP grades only. This course is approved to meet the campus Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion (DEI) requirement.


BIBC 120. Nutrition (4)
 BILD 1 and BILD 2 or 3.


BIBC 140. Our Energy Future—Sustainable Energy Solutions (4)
The Freshman Seminar Program is designed to provide new students with the opportunity to explore an intellectual topic with a faculty member in a small seminar setting. Freshman Seminars are offered in all campus departments and undergraduate colleges, and topics vary from quarter to quarter. Enrollment is limited to fifteen to twenty students, with preference given to entering freshmen. 
		


BIBC 194. Advanced Topics in Modern Biology: Biochemistry (2)
Course is designed to assist new freshmen in making a smooth and informed transition from high school. Lectures focus on study skills, academic planning and using divisional and campus resources to help achieve academic, personal and professional goals. Exercises and practicums will develop the problems solving skills needed to succeed in biology. Attention will be given to research possibilities. Intended for new freshmen.


BICD 100. Genetics (4)
The workshops will be restricted to lower-division undergraduates. The course will introduce students to the methods of scientific research and to a variety of research topics in the biological/biomedical sciences. Examples of topics are: Introduction to Scientific Research, AIDS, Medical and Social Aspects, Is the Mind the Same as the Brain, Wildlife Conservation. 


BICD 101. Eucaryotic Genetics Laboratory (4)
Weekly seminar providing Biological Sciences Scholars Program students with the opportunity to learn more about research and scholarly activities available to them, and acquaints them with UC San Diego faculty members. The course will promote student’s participation in research and other scholarly activities on campus. Departmental approval only (department will preauthorize students to enroll).


BICD 110. Cell Biology (4)
Independent research by special arrangement with a faculty member. (P/NP grades only.) Students must have an overall UC San Diego GPA of at least 3.0 and a minimum of thirty units complete. Students must complete a Special Studies form and a Division of Biological Sciences Research Plan. Credit may not be received for a course numbered 99 subsequent to receiving credit for a course numbered 199. 


BICD 112. Stem Cells and Regeneration (4)
The structure and function of biomolecules. Includes protein conformation, dynamics, and function; enzymatic catalysis, enzyme kinetics, and allosteric regulation; lipids and membranes; sugars and polysaccharides; and nucleic acids. 


BICD 120. Molecular Basis of Plant Development (4)
 Chem 140A and Chem 140B. (


BICD 123. Plant Molecular Genetics and Biotechnology Laboratory (4)
 Students may not receive credit for both BIBC 100 and Chem 114A.) 


BICD 124. Plant Innate Immunity (4)
Energy-producing pathways–glycolysis, the TCA cycle, oxidative phosphorylation, photosynthesis, and fatty acid oxidation; and biosynthetic pathways–gluconeogenesis, glycogen synthesis, and fatty acid biosynthesis. Nitrogen metabolism, urea cycle, amino acid metabolism, nucleotide metabolism, and metabolism of macromolecules. 


BICD 130. Embryos, Genes, and Development (4)
 Chem 140A and Chem 140B. (


BICD 136. AIDS Science and Society (4)
 Students may not receive credit for both BIBC 102 and Chem 114B.)


BICD 140. Immunology (4)
Introductory laboratory course in current principles and techniques applicable
				  to research problems in biochemistry and molecular biology. Techniques
				  include protein and nucleic acid purification; identification methods such
				  as centrifugation, chromatography, and electrophoresis; immunological,
				  spectrophotometric, and enzymatic methods. Material lab fee will apply. 


BICD 145. Laboratory in Molecular Medicine (4)
 BILD
				  1. Students may not receive credit for BIBC 103 after taking Chem 112A
				  (renumbered to Chem 108). Attendance at the first lecture/lab is required.
				  Nonattendance will result in the student’s being dropped from the course
				  roster. 


BICD 194. Advanced Topics in Modern Biology: Cellular Development (2)
Elaborates the relationship between diet and human metabolism, physiology, health, and disease. Covers the functions of carbohydrates, lipids, proteins, vitamins, and minerals, and discusses dietary influences on cardiovascular disease, diabetes, obesity, and cancer. 


BIEB 100. Biostatistics (4)
 BIBC 102. 


BIEB 102. Introductory Ecology-Organisms and Habitat (4)
Course will provide an overview of energy production and utilization and the consequences of this on the economy and environment. The course will introduce renewable energy technologies including biofuels, and explores the social, economic, and political aspects of energy use.  


BIEB 121. Ecology Laboratory (4)
 BILD 1.


BIEB 126. Plant Ecology (4)
An introduction to the principles of heredity emphasizing diploid organisms. Topics include Mendelian inheritance and deviations from classical Mendelian ratios, pedigree analysis, gene interactions, gene mutation, linkage and gene mapping, reverse genetics, population genetics, and quantitative genetics. 


BIEB 128. Insect Diversity (4)
 BILD 1.


BIEB 130. Marine Conservation Biology (4)
Course implements key concepts in genetics and genomics such as performing and interpreting results of genetic crosses, analyzing mutations and their phenotypic consequences, analyzing the genetic basis of quantitative traits, and analyzing genome sequences in relation to phenotypic variation. Attendance at the first lecture/lab is required. Nonattendance will result in the student being dropped from the course roster. Recommended preparation: BICD 100 is highly recommended and may be taken concurrently. 


BIEB 131. Marine Invertebrate Ecology Lab (4)
 BILD 1.  


BIEB 135. Aquatic Ecology Lab (4)
The structure and function of cells and cell organelles, cell growth and division, motility, cell differentiation and specialization. 


BIEB 140. Biodiversity (4)
 BIBC 100 or BIBC 102.


BIEB 143. Computer Modeling in Evolution and Ecology (4)
Stem cells maintain homeostasis of nearly all organ systems and the regenerative capacity of certain organisms. Course explores the paradigm of the tissue-specific stem cell, the cellular mechanisms of tissue regeneration, the evolution of stem cells and regenerative capacity over time, the basis of induced pluripotency, and how these basic processes can inform new approaches to human health. 


BIEB 150. Evolution (4)
 BIMM 100.


BIEB 152. Evolution of Infectious Diseases (4)
Introduction to the biology of plants with a particular focus on the underlying genetic and molecular mechanisms controlling plant development. Topics include the role of plant hormones and stem cells in the formation of embryos, roots, flowers, and fruit. 


BIEB 166. Animal Behavior and Communication (4)
 BILD 1.


BIEB 167. Animal Communication Lab (4)
Techniques in plant cell and tissue culture, plant transformation, genetic selection and screening of mutants, host pathogen interactions, gene regulation, organelle isolation, membrane transport. Attendance at the first lecture/lab is required. Nonattendance will result in the student being dropped from the course roster. Recommended preparation: BICD 120 is recommended. Material lab fee will apply. 


BIEB 174. Ecosystems and Global Change (4)
 upper-division standing.


BIEB 176. Conservation and the Human Predicament (4)
Plant immunity protects against pathogens and enables symbioses. This course explores the agents of plant disease, the genetics of inherited immunity, mechanisms of pathogenesis and defense, the coordination of plant immunity by plant hormones, and the regulation of symbioses. 


BIEB 194. Advanced Topics in Modern Biology: Ecology, Behavior, Evolution (2)
 BICD 100. 


BIMM 100. Molecular Biology (4)
Developmental biology of animals at the tissue,
				  cellular, and molecular levels. Basic processes of embryogenesis
				  in a variety of invertebrate and vertebrate organisms. Cellular and molecular
				  mechanisms that underlie cell fate determination and cell differentiation.
				  More advanced topics such as pattern formation and sex determination are
				  discussed. Open to upper-division students only. 


BIMM 101. Recombinant DNA Techniques (4)
 upper-division
				  standing; BICD 100; BIBC 100 or BIBC 102; BICD 110 strongly
				  recommended, BIMM 100 strongly recommended. 


BIMM 110. Molecular Basis of Human Disease (4)
An introduction to all aspects of the AIDS epidemic. Topics will include the epidemiology, biology, and clinical aspects of HIV infection, HIV testing, education and approaches to therapy, and the social, political, and legal impacts of AIDS on the individual and society. In order to count for their major, biology majors must take the upper-division course, BICD 136. 


BIMM 112.Regulation of Eukaryotic Gene Expressions (4)
 BILD 1, BILD 2 recommended. 


BIMM 114. Virology (4)
Formation and function of the mammalian immune system, molecular and cellular basis of the immune response, infectious diseases and autoimmunity. 


BIMM 116. Circadian Rhythms—Biological Clocks (4)
 BICD 100, BIMM 100. BIBC 100 recommended. 


BIMM 116B. BioClock Studio (4)
This course focuses upon a molecular and immunological approach to study problems in modern medical research. The emphasis will be on novel approaches in medicine, including lymphocyte biology, cancer biology, and gene transfer. Material lab fee will apply.  


BIMM 118. Pharmacology (4)
 BIMM 100. 


BIMM 120. Microbiology (4)
Course will vary in title and content. Students are expected to actively participate in course discussions, read, and analyze primary literature. Current descriptions and subtitles may be found on the 


BIMM 121. Laboratory in Microbiology (6)
and the 


BIMM 122. Microbial Genetics (4)
. Students may receive credit in 194 courses a total of four times as topics vary. Students may not receive credit for the same topic. 


BIMM 124. Medical Microbiology (4)
 BICD 110. 


BIMM 130. Microbial Physiology (4)
An interactive introduction to estimation, hypothesis testing, and statistical reasoning. Emphasis on the conceptual and logical basis of statistical ideas. Focus on randomization rather than parametric techniques. Topics include describing data, sampling, bootstrapping, and significance. Mandatory one-hour weekly section. Students may not receive credit for both BIEB 100 and SIO 187. 


BIMM 134. Biology of Cancer (4)
 BILD 3 and Math 10A or 20A and Math 10B or 20B. Students may not receive credit for both BIEB 100 and SIO 187.


BIMM 140. Quantitative Principles in Biology (4)
This course emphasizes principles shaping organisms, habitats, and ecosystems. Topics covered include population regulation, physiological ecology, competition, predation, and human exploitation. This will be an empirical look at general principles in ecology and conservation with emphasis on the unique organisms and habitats of California. 


BIMM 149. Computation for Biologists (4)
 BILD 3 or equivalent. 


BIMM 162. 3D Electron Microscopy of Macromolecules (4)
A laboratory course to familiarize students with ecological problem solving and methods. Students will perform outdoor fieldwork and use a computer for data exploration and analysis. Fieldwork can be expected in this course. Associated travel may be required and students are responsible for their own transportation. Students may need to provide and use their own laptop. Material lab fee will apply. 


BIMM 164. Structural Biology of Viruses (4)
 BIEB 100.


BIMM 171. Genomics Research Initiative (1)
This course begins with an introduction to plant population biology including whole-plant growth and physiology. We then focus on three classes of ecological interactions: plant-plant competition, plant-herbivore coevolution, and plant reproductive ecology including animal pollination and seed dispersal. 


BIMM 171A. Genomics Research Initiative Laboratory I (4)
 BILD 3. 


BIMM 171B. Genomics Research Initiative Laboratory II (4)
Course begins with a survey of insect diversity and phylogenetic relationships. Course then addresses issues such as population dynamics (including outbreaks), movement and migration, competition, predation, herbivory, parasitism, insect defense, mimicry complexes, and sociality. Course also includes discussions of pest management, evolution of insecticide resistance, insect-borne diseases, and how insects are responding to global change. 


BIMM 181. Molecular Sequence Analysis (4)
 BILD 3. 


BIMM 182. Biological Databases (4)
Course integrates principles of ecology and marine biology to examine marine biodiversity loss resulting from over-exploitation, habitat loss, invasion, climate change, and pollution. Course examines consequences of biodiversity loss to marine ecosystems and discusses the efficacy of various management regimes. Conservation problems facing the world’s oceans with an emphasis on issues important for coastal California will be discussed. 


BIMM 184. Computational Molecular Biology (4)
 BILD 3.


BIMM 185. Bioinformatics Laboratory (Advanced) (4)
A laboratory course introducing students to coastal marine ecology. Students will participate in outdoor fieldwork and work in the laboratory gathering and analyzing ecological data. We will focus on ecological communities from a variety of coastal habitats and use them to learn about basic ecological processes as well as issues related to sustainability and conservation of biodiversity. Fieldwork is expected in this course. Associated travel in the San Diego area is required and students are responsible for their own transportation. Material lab fee will apply. 


BIMM 194. Advanced Topics in Modern Biology: Molecular Biology (2)
 BILD 3 and BIEB 100. 


BIPN 100. Human Physiology I (4)
Course provides overview of physical, chemical, and biological processes that characterize inland waters (lakes and rivers), estuaries, and near-shore environments. Dominant biota of lakes, rivers, and streams, and how they are related to physical and chemical processes of the systems in which they reside will be covered. Methods will be introduced for assessing the chemical composition of water and detecting organisms that affect drinking water quality and coastal water quality management. Course requires field studies. Students should expect to fully participate in field trips; transportation not provided by the university. Students must comply with all risk management policies/procedures. Material lab fee will apply.  


BIPN 102. Human Physiology II (4)
BILD 3.


BIPN 105. Animal Physiology Lab (6)
An introduction to the patterns of geographic distribution and natural history of plants and animals living in terrestrial and marine ecosystems. We will explore: ecological and evolutionary processes responsible for generating and maintaining biological diversity; and the nature of extinction both in past and present ecosystem. 


BIPN 106. Comparative Physiology (4)
 BILD 3. 


BIPN 108. Biology and Medicine of Exercise (4)
An introduction to computer modeling in evolution and ecology. Students will use the computer language 'R' to write code to analyze ecological and evolutionary processes. Topics include natural selection, genetic drift, community ecology, game theory, and chaos.  Students will use their own laptop computers. 


BIPN 120. Endocrinology (4)
 BIEB 100 or BIEB 150.


BIPN 134. Human Reproduction (4)
Evolutionary processes are discussed in their genetic, historical, and
				  ecological contexts. Population genetics, agents of evolution, microevolution,
				  speciation, macroevolution. 


BIPN 140. Cellular Neurobiology (4)
 BILD 3 and
				  BILD 1 or BIEB 143.


BIPN 142. Systems Neurobiology (4)
Treating infectious diseases is a uniquely difficult problem since pathogens often evolve, rendering today's therapies useless tomorrow. This course will provide a review of concepts and methods in evolutionary medicine, with an emphasis on microbial genomics and molecular evolution. 


BIPN 144. Developmental Neurobiology (4)
BILD 3.


BIPN 146. Computational Neurobiology (4)
An integrated approach to animal behavior
				  focusing on mechanisms of acoustic, visual, and olfactory communication.
				  Course covers ethology and the genetics and neurobiology of behavior; orientation
				  and navigation; and signal origins, properties, design, and evolution. 


BIPN 148. Cellular Basis of Learning and Memory (4)
 BILD
			    3 and Physics 1A or 2A. 


BIPN 150. Diseases of the Nervous System (4)
Laboratory exercises will introduce students to quantitative methods of visual, auditory, and olfactory signal analysis and to lab and field studies of animal signaling. 


BIPN 152. The Healthy and Diseased Brain (4)
 BIEB 100 and BIEB 166. Attendance at the first lecture/lab is required. Nonattendance will result in the student’s being dropped from the course roster. Material fee will apply.


BIPN 194. Advanced Topics in Modern Biology: Physiology and Neuroscience (2)
Course will teach the principles of terrestrial ecosystem
                  ecology, and will use examples from recent research to help
                  students understand how global environmental changes are altering
                  processes from leaf-level ecophysiology to global cycling of
                  carbon, water, and nutrients. Fieldwork may be required. 


BISP 170. Bioscholars Seminar: From Bench to Bedside and Beyond (2)
BILD 3.


BISP 191. Biology Transfers: Strategies for Success (1)
Interdisciplinary discussion of the human predicament, the biodiversity crisis, and the importance of biological conservation. Examines issues from biological, cultural, historical, economic, social, political, and ethical perspectives emphasizing new approaches and new techniques for safeguarding the future of humans and other biosphere inhabitants. 


BISP 192. Senior Seminar in Biology (1)
 BILD 3 or ANTH 2 or consent of instructor. 


BISP 194. Advanced Topics in Modern Biology (2)
Course will vary in title and content. Students are expected to actively participate in course discussions, read, and analyze primary literature. Current descriptions and subtitles may be found on the 


BISP 195. Undergraduate Instructional Apprenticeship in Biological Sciences (4)
 and the 


BISP 196. Honors Thesis in Biological Sciences (4)
. Students may receive credit in 194 courses a total of four times as topics vary. Students may not receive credit for the same topic. 


BISP 197. Biology Internship Program (4)
 BIEB 102.


BISP 199. Individual Research for Undergraduates (2 or 4)
Molecular basis of biological processes, emphasizing gene action in context of entire genome. Chromosomes and DNA metabolism: chromatin, DNA replication, repair, mutation, recombination, transposition. Transcription, protein synthesis, regulation of gene activity. Procaryotes and eukaryotes. Students will not receive credit for both BIMM 100 and Chem 114C. 


BGGN 200. Graduate School Fundamentals: Introduction to Graduate Studies in the Division of Biological Sciences (2)
 BILD 1 and BIBC 100 or BIBC 102. 


BGGN 201. Methods in Computational Neuroscience (3)
Theory and practice of recombinant DNA and molecular biology techniques. Includes construction and screening of DNA libraries, DNA sequencing, PCR and its applications, bioinformatics, and RNA analysis. Nonattendance will result in the student’s being dropped from the course roster. Recommended preparation: BIMM 100. Students may not enroll in or receive credit for both BIMM 101 and BIEB 123, or BIMM 101 and Chem 109 (formerly Chem 112B). Material lab fee will apply. 


BGGN 202. Professional Development for Biologists (2)
BILD
				  1.  


BGGN 203. Topics in Ecology, Behavior, and Evolution (3)
An examination of the molecular basis of human diseases. Course emphasizes inherited human disorders, and some important diseases caused by viruses. Focus on the application of genetic, biochemical, and molecular biological principles to an understanding of the diseases. Course restricted to upper-division biology majors. 


BGGN 204. Topics in Community and Population Ecology (3)
 BICD 100; BIBC 100 or BIBC 102; BIMM 100.


BGGN 205. Communicating Science to the Public (2)
This course explores the mechanisms by which gene activity is regulated in eukaryotes, with an emphasis on transcriptional regulation and chromatin. Topics will include chromatin structure, histone modifications, chromatin dynamics, transcription factors, transcriptional elongation, enhancers, CpG methylation, heterochromatin, and epigenetics. 


BGGN 207. Scientific Ethics (1)
 BIMM 100. 


BGGN 208. Biological Sciences Graduate Boot Camp (4)
An introduction to eukaryotic virology, with emphasis on animal virus systems. Topics discussed include the molecular structure of viruses; the multiplication strategies of the major virus families; and viral latency, persistence, and oncology. 


BGGN 210. Neurobiology Boot Camp (4)
 BIMM 100. 


BGGN 211. Recent Advances and Experimental Approaches in Modern Biology (4)
(Cross-listed with Psych 133; however, biology majors must take the course as BIMM 116.) This interdisciplinary course provides an overview of the fundamental properties of daily biological clocks of diverse species, from humans to microbes. Emphasis is placed on the relevance of internal time keeping in wide-ranging contexts including human performance, health, and industry. 


BGGN 214. Introduction to Q-Biology (4)
 BILD 1 or PSYC 2 or PSYC 106.


BGGN 216. Graduate Biostatistics (4)
The BioClock Studio is an innovative course in which a team of undergraduate students, drawn from diverse disciplines, will work collaboratively to develop their scientific and communicative skills to produce creative educational materials that will enhance understanding of circadian biology. Students are expected to attend the annual Circadian Biology Symposium held each winter, to the extent course schedules allow, to conduct interviews with prominent scientists. BIMM 116 is not a prerequisite to enroll in BIMM 116B. May be taken for credit three times. 


BGGN 220. Graduate Molecular Biology (6)
department approval required. Students will be required to formally apply to participate via an online application form and selected students will work in small teams with intensive mentoring to execute projects.  


BGGN 220D. Chromatin Structure and Transcriptional Regulation (2)
Basics of pharmacology such as drug absorption, distribution, metabolism, and elimination. Concepts in toxicology and pharmacognosy are used to survey the major drug categories. 


BGGN 220E. Post-Transcriptional Gene Regulation (2)
 BIBC 100 or BIBC 102; BIPN 100.


BGGN 220F. Shaping Cellular Function through Post-Translational Regulation (2)
A discussion of the structure, growth, physiology, molecular genetics, genomics, and ecology of prokaryotic microorganisms, with emphasis on the genetic and metabolic diversity of bacteria and Archaea and their interactions with hosts and the environment. 


BGGN 222. Graduate Cell Biology (6)
 BILD 1 and BIBC 100 or BIBC 102. 


BGGN 223. Graduate Genetics (6)
Course emphasizes fundamental principles of microbiology, including comparative
				  bacterial morphology and physiology, pure culture techniques, and bacterial
				  growth. Additional studies include bacteriophage interactions, antibiotics,
				  the use of bio-assays, natural microbial communities through metagenomics
				  and enrichment, and bacteria in biotechnology. Attendance at the first lecture/lab is required. Nonattendance will result in the student being dropped from the course roster. Material lab fee will apply. 


BGGN 224. Graduate Neurobiology (4)
 BILD 1 and BIBC 100 or BIBC 102. 


BGGN 225. Graduate Immunology (4)
Course will consider the organization and function of prokaryotic genomes including content, DNA supercoiling, histone-like proteins, chromosomal dynamics (short-term and long-term), extrachromosomal elements, bacterial sex, transduction, transformation, mobile elements (transposon), epigenetic change, adaptive and directed mutation, transcription and its regulation, sensory transduction, bacterial differentiation, symbiosis, and pathogenesis. 


BGGN 226. Graduate Animal Virology (4)
 BIMM 100.


BGGN 227. Graduate Topics in Plant Biology (4)
Encompasses the increasingly important areas
				  of viral, bacterial, and parasitic diseases and understanding the complex
				  interaction between humans and infectious agents. Covers human-pathogen
				  interactions, mechanisms and molecular principles of infectious diseases,
				  immune responses, countermeasures by pathogens and hosts, epidemiology,
				  and cutting-edge approaches to therapy. 


BGGN 228. Graduate Developmental Biology (4)
 BIBC
			    100 or BIBC 102. 


BGGN 230. Graduate Signal Transduction (4)
Prokaryotic cell biology will be discussed primarily from physiological and biochemical standpoints with a focus on conceptual understanding, integration, and mechanism. Topics will vary from year to year but will include the following themes: bioenergetics, cell polarity, cell adhesion, the molecular basis of morphogenesis and differentiation, prokaryotic motility and behavior, rotary and linear molecular machines, bacterial organelles, pheromones and messengers, circadian rhythms, biological warfare, and bioremediation. 


BGGN 231. Current Concepts in Stem Cell Biology (4)
 BIBC 100 or BIBC 102.


BGGN 232. Innate Immunity (4)
This course covers basic processes of transformation and tumor formation in a two-part format. The first section is focused on molecular and cellular mechanisms of carcinogenesis. The second section discusses tumor pathology and metastasis. Open to upper-division students only. 


BGGN 234. Practical Histopathology and Mouse Models of Human Disease (2)
 BICD 110 and BIMM 100.


BGGN 236. Advanced Glycobiology (4)
Course considers problems in biology that were solved using quantitative biology approaches. Problems will range from the molecular to the population level. Students will learn about the scientific method and process, and how to apply it. 


BGGN 237. Quantitative Methods in Genetics (4)
 BILD 1.


BGGN 238A. Integrative Microbiology I (4)
Course will provide students with the computational tools and problem-solving skills that are increasingly important to the biosciences. Students learn to program in a modern general-purpose programming language and write their own programs to explore a variety of applications in biology including simulations, sequence analysis, phylogenetics, among others. Students will use their own laptop computers. 


BGGN 238B. Integrative Microbiology II (4)
 BILD 1 and BILD 2. 


BGGN 245. Advanced Topics in Cancer Research and Therapy (2)
Biological macromolecules and supramolecular complexes, organelles, and small cells are being examined in three-dimensions by modern electron cryomicroscopy and image reconstruction techniques. The basic principles of transmission electron microscopy and 3D image reconstruction are discussed. 


BGGN 246A. Computational Neurobiology (2)
Chem 114A or BIBC 100 or BIBC 110 and Physics 1C or 2C or 2D; upper-division standing.


BGGN 248. Molecular Mechanisms of Neural Development (4)
An introduction to virus structures, how they are determined,
                  and how they facilitate the various stages of the viral life
                  cycle from host recognition and entry to replication, assembly,
                  release, and transmission to uninfected host cells. 


BGGN 249A-B-C. Basic Neuroscience (4-4-4)
BIBC
                  100 or Chem 114A; upper-division standing.


BGGN 260. Neurodynamics (4)
This class will examine the theoretical and practical basis
                  of modern genomics research. Students will learn the theoretical
                  basis of genomics and tools used for the sequencing and annotation
                  of genomic DNA, and computational and molecular methods for
                  the study of evolution. 


BGGN 262. 3D Electron Microscopy Macromolecules (4)
 department approval
                  required (department will preauthorize students to enroll).
                  Restricted to students participating in the National Genomics
                  Research Initiative Program.


BGGN 264. Structural Biology of Viruses (4)
Students will isolate bacterial viruses or
				  other organisms from the environment and characterize them
				  by methods including electron microscopy and nucleic acid analysis. The
				  genomic DNA will be purified, and sent for sequencing. Material lab fee will apply. 


BGGN 266. Advanced Laboratory in Biophysical Techniques (6)
 department
				  approval required. Restricted to students participating in the National
			    Genomics Research Initiative Program. 


BGGN 271. Advanced Experimental Methods in Biology (4–12)
Students will characterize the genomic sequence
				  of the organisms isolated in BIMM 171A and use molecular and
				  computational tools to resolve ambiguities and close gaps.
				  They will then annotate the DNA sequence to identify protein and RNA coding
				  regions. 


BGGN 290. Advances in Cellular and Molecular Mechanisms
 BIMM
			    171 and BIMM 171A. 


BGGN 292. Professional Pathways in Biological Sciences (1)
This course covers the analysis of nucleic acid and protein sequences, with an emphasis on the application of algorithms to biological problems. Topics include sequence alignments, database searching, comparative genomics, and phylogenetic and clustering analyses. Pairwise alignment, multiple alignment, DNA sequencing, scoring functions, fast database search, comparative genomics, clustering, phylogenetic trees, gene finding/DNA statistics. This course open to bioinformatics majors only. 


BGGN 293. Scientific Writing in Biology (2)
 CSE 100 or Math 176, CSE 101 or Math 188, BIMM 100 or Chem 114C. 


BGGN 295. Scientific Presentation in Biology (2)
This course provides an introduction to the features of biological data, how that data are organized efficiently in databases, and how existing data resources can be utilized to solve a variety of biological problems. Object-oriented databases, data modeling and description, survey of current biological database with respect to above, implementation of database focused on a biological topic. This course open to bioinformatics majors only. 


BGGN 297. Research Conference (1–3)
 CSE 100 or Math 176. 


BGGN 298. Laboratory Projects in Biology (3–12)
This advanced course covers the application
				  of machine learning and modeling techniques to biological systems.
				  Topics include gene structure, recognition of DNA and protein
				  sequence patterns, classification, and protein structure prediction. Pattern
				  discovery, hidden Markov models/support vector machines/neural network/profiles,
				  protein structure prediction, functional characterization of
				  proteins, functional genomics/proteomics, metabolic pathways/gene networks.				  


BGGN 299. Thesis Research in Biology (1–12)
 BIMM
				  181 or BENG 181 or CSE 181, BIMM 182 or BENG 182 or CSE 182
		  or Chem 182. 


BGGN 500. Graduate Student Apprentice Teaching (4)
This course emphasizes the hands-on application
				  of bioinformatics methods to biological problems. Students
				  will gain experience in the application of existing software, as well as
				  in combining approaches to answer specific biological questions. Sequence
				  alignment, fast database search, profiles and motifs, comparative
				  genomics, gene finding, phylogenetic trees, protein structure, functional
				  characterization of proteins, expression analysis, computational proteomics.
				  This course open to bioinformatics majors only. 


BGJC 207. Journal Club in Neurobiology (1)
 two
				  courses out of BIMM 181 or BENG 181 or CSE 181, BIMM 182 or
				  BENG 182 or CSE 182, BENG 183, BIMM 184 or BENG 184 or CSE 184. Attendance
				  at the first lecture/lab is required. Nonattendance will result in the
				  student’s
				  being dropped from the course roster.


BGJC 208. Journal Club in Plant Molecular Biology (1)
Course will vary in title and content. Students are expected to actively participate in course discussions, read, and analyze primary literature. Current descriptions and subtitles may be found on the 


BGJC 213. Journal Club in Computational Neurobiology (1)
and the 


BGRD 205. Research Discussion in Plant Membrane Biology (1)
. Students may receive credit in 194 courses a total of four times as topics vary. Students may not receive credit for the same topic. 


BGRD 207. Research Discussion in Neuronal Pattern Generation (1)
 BIMM 100.


BGRD 210. Research Discussion in Virology (1)
Course introduces the concepts of physiological regulation, controlled and integrated by the nervous and endocrine systems. Course then examines the muscular, cardiovascular, and renal systems in detail and considers their control through the interaction of nervous activity and hormones. Students may not receive credit for both BIPN 100 and BENG 140A. 


BGRD 211. Research Discussion in Developmental Cellular Neurobiology (1)
 BILD 1 and BILD 2. 


BGRD 212. Research Discussion in Behavior and Development of Simple Nervous Systems (1)
Course completes a survey of organ systems begun in BIPN 100 by considering the respiratory and gastrointestinal systems. Consideration is given to interactions of these systems in weight and temperature regulation, exercise physiology, stress, and pregnancy and reproduction. Students may not receive credit for both BIPN 102 and BENG 140B. 


BGRD 213. Research Discussion in Golgi Structure and Function (1)
 BIPN 100. 


BGRD 216. Research Discussion in Molecular and Cell Biology (1)
This course examines the physiological adaptation
				  of animals, invertebrates and vertebrates, to their particular environmental
				  and behavioral niches. Structural, functional, and molecular adaptations
			    of the basic organ systems are discussed. 


BGRD 218. Research Discussion in Plant Molecular Genetics (1)
 BILD 2, Chem 6A-B-C. BILD 3 is recommended.


BGRD 221. Research Discussion in Behavioral Ecology (1)
Course addresses the human body’s response to exercise, addressing energy metabolism and the effects of both acute and chronic exercise on function in several important organ systems. Designing training regimes and the role of exercise in health will be considered. Recommended preparation: completion of BIPN 102 and BIBC 102 recommended. 


BGRD 222. Research Discussion in Evolutionary Molecular Ecology (1)
 BIPN
				  100. 


BGRD 230. Research Discussion in Cell Signaling Pathways (1)
Normal function and diseases of the major hormone systems of the body including the hypothalamus/pituitary axis, the thyroid gland, reproduction and sexual development, metabolism and the pancreas, bone and calcium metabolism, and the adrenal glands. Students may not receive credit for both BIPN 120 and BICD 150. 


BGRD 231. Research Discussion in Nuclear Transport and Function (1)
BIPN 100.  


BGRD 234. Research Discussion in Cell Signaling in Drosophila (3)
Course focuses on physiological aspects of the human reproductive systems. Emphasis will be on cellular and systems physiology. Topics will include: reproductive endocrinology, gametogenesis, fertilization and implantation, pregnancy and parturition, development of reproductive systems, and reproductive pathologies. Students may not receive credit for both BIPN 134 and BICD 134.


BGSE 200. Seminar in Biology (1)
 BIPN 100. 


BGSE 205. Graduate Research Seminar (1)
This course covers the biophysics of the resting and active membranes of nerve cells. It also covers the mechanisms of sensory transduction and neuromodulation, as well as the molecular basis of nerve cell function. Recommended preparation: completion of BIBC 100 or 102. 



http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/BIOM.html
BIOM 200A. Molecules to Organisms: Concepts (6)
This course provides a systematic approach to current biomedical research, using analysis of selected topics to focus on the process of research discovery and its critical evaluation. The course progresses through five thematic modules that cover genes, building a cell, cellular responses, organogenesis, and the processes that allow survival in the world. 


BIOM 200B. Molecules to Organisms: Approaches (2)
 limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.


BIOM 201. Seminars in Biomedical Research (4)
Students will critically evaluate classic and current research papers in biomedical research, in addition to being exposed to state-of-the-art technologies in research. 


BIOM 209. Lipid Cell Signaling Genomics, Proteomics, and Metabolomics (2)
 limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.


BIOM 218. Current Topics in Anthropogeny (1)
This course includes attendance at seminars in the biomedical sciences and is designed to provoke critical discussion of the presented findings and scientific approaches in a small-group setting. 


BIOM 219. Ethics in Scientific Research (1)
 limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.


BIOM 222. Essentials of Glycobiology (2)
Overview of new systems biology “omics” approaches to lipid metabolism and cell signaling including interrogating gene and lipid databases, techniques for lipidomics, and implications for profiling and biomarker discovery in blood and tissues relevant to inflammatory and other human diseases. Recommended: one quarter of undergraduate biochemistry. 


BIOM 224. Topics in Cancer Research (2)
 none.


BIOM 225. Introduction to Anthropogeny (2)
Participation in the symposia held by CARTA three times a year. Students shadow one of the speakers during public and private symposia. Students meet after each symposium and each writes a summary of the speaker’s presentation and ensuring discussion. 


BIOM 226. Hormone Action (3)
 graduate standing required.


BIOM 227. Mouse Models of Human Disease (2)
Overview of ethical issues in scientific research, conflicts of interest; national, statewide and campus issues and requirement; ethical issues in publications; authorship; retention of research records; tracing of research records; attribution; plagiarism; copyright considerations; primary, archival and meeting summary publications; ethical procedures and policies; NIH, NSF, California and UC San Diego; case studies and precedents in ethics. 


BIOM 228. Modern Drug Discovery Technologies (2)
 consent of instructor.


BIOM 229. Advanced Anthropogeny (2)
Advanced elective for graduate/medical students who have had core courses in cell biology or biochemistry. Expert faculty will present a coordinated overview of the field of glycobiology, which explores the structure, synthesis, and functions of sugar chains in biological systems.


BIOM 231. Contemporary Topics in Pharmacology (2)
Each quarter will focus on an important area of cancer research such as immunology (fall), growth regulation (winter), and cancer genetics (spring). One-hour lecture coordinated with a one-hour seminar with the opportunity to meet with the invited speaker. 


BIOM 232. In vivo Cellular and Molecular Imaging (1)
 limited to senior undergraduates, graduate students, and medical students. (W, S)


BIOM 233. Structural Biology in Cell Signaling and Drug Discovery (2)
An overview of the current state of research into human origins with illustration of the spatial and temporal scales: from million-year-old phylogenies to millisecond physiological processes, and from human societies dispersed across continents to cells and molecules. 


BIOM 234. Practical Histopathology and Mouse Models of Human Diseases (2)
 graduate standing required.


BIOM 235. Pharmacogenomics (3)
The course covers recent advances in research into hormone action, molecular endocrinology, lipid, lipoprotein, and carbohydrate metabolism, and reproductive medicine. 


BIOM 240. Critical Reading in Cell Biology (3)
 BIOM 200, 201. Limited to BMS graduate students, except by consent of instructor.


BIOM 242. Seminar in Genetics (1)
This course provides an overview of the use of mouse models in biomedical research. Sessions will cover general mouse biology, genetics, technologies for generating mutant mice and will focus on model selection, methodological approaches, data interpretation, experimental design, and ethics of animal research. Student participation and discussion will be encouraged. 


BIOM 246. Current Literature in Glycobiology (1)
 graduate standing or consent of instructor. 


BIOM 252. Genetics and Genomics (3)
Drug discovery is an emerging science available to academic investigators. This course provides an overview of these drug discovery techniques, including high through-put screening, cell-based screening, computational methods of lead compound discovery, and chemical methods of optimization. 


BIOM 253. Pathogens and Host Defense (3)
 graduate student status or consent of graduate program director.


BIOM 254. Molecular and Cell Biology (3)
A selection of short courses in the biomedical and pharmacological sciences offered by resident experts. Topics will vary annually. Each short course will last one to two weeks, meeting five hours a week. 


BIOM 255. Molecular Basis of Drug Action and Disease Therapy (3)
 consent of instructor. (F, W, S)


BIOM 256. Molecular Pathology of Cancer (3)
Strategies such as positron emission tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, and ultrasound for nondestructively imaging molecular and cell biological events inside living animals and eventually human patients. Emphasis on detecting angiogenesis, apoptosis, and expression of tumor-specific genes. 


BIOM 262. Quantitative Methods in Genetics (4)
 upper-division or graduate courses in molecular and cell biology.


BIOM 264. Molecular and Cellular Basis of Disease (2)
This class is taught by SBMRI program faculty, whose laboratories are actively involved in determining the three-dimensional structure of complex biological entities. The course covers basic principles of crystallization, cryo-electron microscopy, and NMR, and modern techniques for Ab-initio-structural analysis. 


BIOM 266. Environmental and Molecular Toxicology (4)
 graduate standing status or consent of graduate program director.


BIOM 267. Drug Discovery, Development, and Commercialization (3)
The course is designed to introduce or reintroduce histology and histopathology of the various organ systems to those who need to analyze mouse tissues as an essential part of their research. 


BIOM 272. Seminars in Genetics (2)
 standard undergraduate biology courses.


BIOM 273. Seminars in Microbiology (2)
This course provides an understanding of the evolving area of human genomics and correlation between an individual’s or subpopulation’s genetic makeup and their response to drugs. The information provides the student the basis for select prescribing and/or targeting drug development to improve drug therapy outcomes and reduce adverse drug responses. 


BIOM 274. Seminars in Molecular and Cell Biology (2)
 admission to Skaggs School of Pharmacy and Pharmaceutical Sciences or BMS Program (Major Code BS75) or consent of instructor.


BIOM 275. Seminars in Pharmacology (2)
This course will focus on critical reading and understanding current areas in cell and molecular biology. The exact topic will vary, but will include such topics as protein trafficking, cell division, intracellular movement, cell interaction, and cell cycle.


BIOM 276. Seminars in Physiology (2)
Intended for graduate students interested in principles of classical and molecular genetics. Will attend weekly genetics seminar and participate in didactic/discussion preparatory session. 


BIOM 277. Seminars in Molecular Pathology (2)
 consent of instructor.


BIOM 283. Supramolecular Structure Determination Laboratory (4)
Informal presentations on topics of current interest in glycobiology as represented in the current scientific literature. 


BIOM 285. Statistical Inference in the Medical Sciences (2)
 consent of instructor.


BIOM 287. Tissue Engineering Laboratory (4)
This course will examine the basic principles of genetics and genomics. We will focus on classic discoveries and examples of approaches to current experimental problems. Emphasis areas will vary but general topics include Mendelian inheritance, imprinting, cytogenetics, genome structure, genetic variation, linkage and recombination, complex traits, statistical genetics, population genetics, genomic tools and methodology, medical genetics, model organisms. 


BIOM 294. Pharmacology and Molecular Biology Journal Club (0–1)
 BIOM 200, 201. Limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.


BIOM 295. Pharmacology Research Discussions (0–1)
This course will examine the innate and adaptive immune responses of humans to microbial infection. In parallel, we will explore the virulence mechanisms through which certain medically important viruses, bacteria, fungi, and parasites subvert host defense to produce infectious disease. Emphasis will be placed on basic molecular genetic and cellular approaches to understanding microbial pathogenesis and host susceptibility, including progress toward novel antibiotic and immune stimulatory therapies. 


BIOM 296. Directed Reading (1–4)
 BIOM 200, 201.


BIOM 297. Progress in Signal Transduction (1)
This course will examine the basic principles of molecular and cellular biology and their impact on medicine focusing on classic discoveries and examples of approaches to current experimental problems. Emphasis areas will vary but will include genes and genomics, chromosome biology and nuclear structure, transcriptional regulation, RNA processing, cell cycle control, cell growth and death, cell differentiation and stem cell biology, molecular motors and motility, membrane trafficking and signaling. 


BIOM 298. Directed Study (1–12)
 BIOM 200, 201. Limited to BMS graduate students except by consent of instructor.


BIOM 299. Independent Study or Research (1–12)
This course outlines a current understanding of genetic mechanisms that underlie carcinogenesis and their impact on cell proliferation, differentiation, angiogenesis, metastasis, and survival. The topics of tumor histopathology, the tumor stem cell phenotype, and cancer drug design are also addressed. 



http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/CHEM.html
CHEM 4. Basic Chemistry (4)
Offers less-well prepared science majors the fundamental skills necessary to succeed in Chem 6. Emphasizes quantitative problems. Topics include nomenclature, stoichiometry, basic reactions, bonding, and the periodic table. May not receive credit for both Chem 4 and Chem 11. Includes a laboratory/discussion each week. Recommended: concurrent enrollment in Math 3C, 4C or 10A or higher.  (F)


CHEM 6A. General Chemistry I (4)
First quarter of a three-quarter sequence intended for science and engineering majors. Topics include: atomic theory, bonding, molecular geometry, stoichiometry, types of reactions, and thermochemistry. May not be taken for credit after Chem 6AH. Recommended: proficiency in high school chemistry and/or physics; concurrent or prior enrollment in Math 10A or 20A.  (F,W,S) 


CHEM 6AH. Honors General Chemistry I (4)
First quarter of a three-quarter honors sequence intended for well-prepared science and engineering majors. Topics include quantum mechanics, molecular orbital theory, and bonding. An understanding of nomenclature, stoichiometry, and other fundamentals is assumed. Students completing 6AH may not subsequently take 6A for credit. Recommended: completion of a high school physics course strongly recommended. Concurrent enrollment in Math 20A or higher.  (F) 


CHEM 6B. General Chemistry II (4)
Second quarter of a three-quarter sequence intended for science and engineering majors. Topics include: covalent bonding, gases, liquids, and solids, colligative properties, physical and chemical equilibria, acids and bases, solubility. May not be taken for credit after Chem 6BH. 


CHEM 6BH. Honors General Chemistry II (4)
 Chem 6A or 6AH and Math 10A or 20A. Recommended: concurrent or prior enrollment in Math 10B or 20B.  (F,W,S) 


CHEM 6C. General Chemistry III (4)
Second quarter of a three-quarter honors sequence intended for well-prepared science and engineering majors. Topics include: colligative properties, bulk material properties, chemical equilibrium, acids and bases, and thermodynamics.  Three hours lecture and one hour recitation.
				  Students completing 6BH may not subsequently take 6B for credit. 


CHEM 6CH. Honors General Chemistry III (4)
 Chem
				  6AH and Math 20A. 


CHEM 7L. General Chemistry Laboratory (4)
concurrent or prior enrollment in Math 20B. (W) 


CHEM 7LM. General Chemistry Laboratory for Majors (4)
Third quarter of a three-quarter sequence intended for science and engineering majors. Topics include: thermodynamics, kinetics, electrochemistry, coordination chemistry, and introductions to nuclear, main group organic, and biochemistry. May not be taken for credit after Chem 6CH. 


CHEM 11. The Periodic Table (4)
 Chem 6B or 6BH. Recommended: completion of Math 10B or 20B.   (F,W,S)


CHEM 12. Molecules and Reactions (4)
Third quarter of a three-quarter honors sequence intended for well-prepared
				  science and engineering majors. Topics are similar to those in 6C but are
				  taught at a higher level and faster pace. Students completing 6CH may not
				  subsequently take 6C for credit. 


CHEM 13. Chemistry of Life (4)
 Chem
				  6BH and Math 20B. (S) 


CHEM 15. Chemistry of the Universe (4)
Condenses a year of introductory
                  training in analytical, inorganic, physical, and synthetic
                  techniques into one intensive quarter. A materials fee is required.
                  A mandatory safety exam must be passed. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 7L and Chem 7LM. 


CHEM 87. Freshman Seminar in Chemistry and Biochemistry (1)
 Chem
                  6B or Chem 6BH. (F,W,S)


CHEM 92. Undergraduate Pharmacology Seminar (1)
Condenses a year of introductory training in analytical, inorganic, physical, and synthetic techniques into one intensive quarter. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 7L and Chem 7LM. A materials fee is required. A safety exam must be passed. Enrollment preference given to chemistry and biochemistry majors, followed by other science/engineering majors. 


CHEM 96. Introduction to Teaching Science (2)
 Chem 6B or Chem 6BH. Enrollment is limited to majors in the Department of Chemistry and Biochemistry, unless space is available. (F,W,S)
        


CHEM 99. Independent Study (2 or 4)
Introduction to the material world of atoms and small inorganic molecules. Intended for nonscience majors. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 4 and Chem 11. (F,S) 


CHEM 99R. Independent Study (1)
Introduction to molecular bonding and structure and chemical reactions, including organic molecules and synthetic polymers. Intended for nonscience majors. 


CHEM 100A. Analytical Chemistry Laboratory (4)
 Chem 11 or good knowledge of high school chemistry. Cannot be taken for credit after any organic chemistry course. (W) 


CHEM 100B. Instrumental Chemistry Laboratory (5)
Introduction to biochemistry for nonscience majors. Topics include carbohydrates, lipids, amino acids and proteins, with an introduction to metabolic pathways in human physiology. 


CHEM 105A. Physical Chemistry Laboratory (4)
 Chem 12. (S) 


CHEM 105B. Physical Chemistry Laboratory (4)
This is a one-quarter, nonmathematical chemistry course for nonscience majors covering the origin of the universe, the elements, and the formation of the solar system. The evolution of the Earth’s atmosphere, hydrosphere, geosphere, and biosphere will be covered, as well as contemporary problems in environmental chemistry. Cannot be taken for credit after any other chemistry course. 


CHEM 108. Protein Biochemistry Laboratory (6)
This seminar will present topics in chemistry at a level appropriate for first-year students. 


CHEM 109. Recombinant DNA Laboratory (6)
Selected topics in pharmacology and toxicology. (S)


CHEM 113. Physical Chemistry of Biological Macromolecules (4)
(Cross-listed with EDS 31.) Explores routine challenges and exceptional
				  difficulties students often have in learning science. Prepares students
				  to make meaningful observations of how K–12 teachers deal with difficulties. Explores
				  strategies that teachers may use to pose problems that stimulate students’
				  intellectual curiosity.


CHEM 114A. Biochemical Structure and Function (4)
Independent literature or laboratory research
				  by arrangement with and under the direction of a member of
				  the Department of Chemistry and Biochemistry faculty. Students
				  must register on a P/NP basis. 


CHEM 114B. Biochemical Energetics and Metabolism (4)
 lower-division
				  standing, 3.0 minimum UC San Diego GPA, consent of instructor and department,
				  completion of thirty units of undergraduate study at UC San Diego,
				  completed and approved Special Studies form. 


CHEM 114C. Biosynthesis of Macromolecules (4)
Independent study or research under the direction of a member
                  of the faculty. 


CHEM 114D. Molecular and Cellular Biochemistry (4)
 student must
                  be of first-year standing and a Regent’s Scholar; approved
                  Special Studies form.				


CHEM 116. Chemistry of Enzyme Catalyzed Reactions (4)
Laboratory course emphasizing classical quantitative chemical analysis techniques, including separation and gravimetric methods, as well as an introduction to instrumental analysis. 


CHEM 118. Pharmacology and Toxicology (4)
 Chem 6C or 6CH and Chem 6BL or 7L. Recommended: Phys 2CL or 2BL. Program or material fee may apply. (F,W,S) 


CHEM 120A. Inorganic Chemistry I (4)
Hands-on laboratory course focuses on development of correct laboratory work habits and methodologies for the operation of modern analytical instrumentation. Gas chromatography, mass spectrometry, high performance liquid chromatography, ion chromatography, atomic absorption spectroscopy, fluorescence spectrometry, infrared spectrometry. Lecture focuses on fundamental theoretical principles, applications, and limitations of instrumentation used for qualitative and quantitative analysis. A materials fee is required. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 100B and Chem 101. 


CHEM 120B. Inorganic Chemistry II (4)
 Chem 100A and Phys 2C or 2D and Phys 2CL or 2DL. (F,W,S)


CHEM 123. Advanced Inorganic Chemistry Laboratory (4)
Laboratory course in experimental physical chemistry. 


CHEM 125. Bioinorganic Chemistry (4)
one or more of Chem 126, 127, 131, 133 and Chem 100A, and Phys 2CL. A materials fee is required for this course. (F,W,S)


CHEM 126. Physical Chemistry: Quantum Mechanics (4)
Laboratory course in experimental physical chemistry. 


CHEM 127. Physical Chemistry: Thermodynamics (4)
 Chem 105A. A materials fee is required for this course. (F,W,S) 


CHEM 130. Chemical Physics: Quantum Mechanics (4)
The application of techniques to study protein
				  structure and function, including electrophoresis, protein purification,
				  column chromatography, enzyme kinetics, and immunochemistry. 


CHEM 131. Chemical Physics: Stat Thermo I (4)
 Chem
				  143A and Chem 114A. (


CHEM 132. Chemical Physics: Stat Thermo II (4)
 formerly Chem 112A. Students may not
				  receive credit for both Chem 108 and BIBC 103.) A materials fee may be
				  required for this course. (F,W)


CHEM 135. Molecular Spectroscopy (4)
This laboratory will introduce students to the tools of molecular biology
				  and will involve experiments with recombinant DNA techniques. 


CHEM 140A. Organic Chemistry I (4)
 Chem
				  143A and Chem 114A. (


CHEM 140B. Organic Chemistry II (4)
 formerly Chem 112B. Students
				  may not receive credit for both Chem 109 and BIMM 101.) A
				  materials fee may be required for this course. (S) 


CHEM 140AH. Honors Organic Chemistry I (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 213.) A discussion of the physical principles governing
				  biological macromolecular structure and function, and the physicochemical
				  experiments used to probe their structure and function. Chem
				  213 students will be required to complete an additional paper and/or exam
				  beyond that expected of students in Chem 113. 


CHEM 140BH. Honors Organic Chemistry (4)
 Chem
				  140C or 140CH; and Chem 127 or 131 (113); or graduate standing
				  (213). 


CHEM 140C. Organic Chemistry III (4)
Introduction to biochemistry from a structural
				  and functional viewpoint. 


CHEM 140CH. Honors Organic Chemistry (4)
 Chem
				  140A. (


CHEM 141. Organic Nanomaterials (4)
 Students may not receive credit for both Chem
				  114A and BIBC 100.) (F,W) 


CHEM 143A. Organic Chemistry Laboratory (4)
This course is an introduction to the metabolic reactions in the cell which produce and utilize energy. The course material will include energy-producing pathways: glycolysis, Krebs cycle, oxidative phosphorylation, fatty-acid oxidation. Biosynthesis of amino acids, lipids, carbohydrates, purines, pyrimidines, proteins, nucleic acids. 


CHEM 143AH. Honors Organic Chemistry Laboratory (4)
 Chem 114A or BIBC 100 and Chem 140B. (


CHEM 143B. Organic Chemistry Laboratory (4)
 Students may not receive credit for both Chem 114B and BIBC 102.) (W) 


CHEM 143C. Organic Chemistry Laboratory (5)
Mechanisms of biosynthesis of macromolecules—particularly
				  proteins and nucleic acids. Emphasis is on how these processes are controlled
				  and integrated with metabolism of the cell. 


CHEM 143D. Molecular Design and Synthesis (4)
 Chem
				  114A or BIBC 100. (


CHEM 145. Chemistry and Biochemistry of Biofuels (4)
 students may not receive credit for
				  both Chem 114C and BIMM 100.) (S) 


CHEM 146. Kinetics and Mechanism of Organic Reactions (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 214.) This course represents
				  a continuation of 114C, or an introductory course for first- and second-year
				  graduate students, and covers topics in molecular and cellular biochemistry.
				  Emphasis will be placed on contemporary approaches to the isolation and
				  characterization of mammalian genes and proteins, and molecular genetic
				  approaches to understanding eukaryotic development and human disease. Chem
				  214 students will be required to complete additional course work beyond
				  that expected of students in Chem 114D. 


CHEM 151. Molecules that Changed the World (4)
 Chem
				  114A-C or consent of instructor. (May not be offered every year.) 


CHEM 152. Synthetic Methods in Organic Chemistry (4)
A discussion of the chemistry of representative enzyme catalyzed reactions
				  is presented. Enzyme reaction mechanisms and their relation to enzyme structure
				  are emphasized. 


CHEM 154. Mechanisms of Organic Reactions (4)
 Chem 140C or 140CH, and
				  Chem 114A. (May not be offered every year.)


CHEM 155. Synthesis of Complex Molecules (4)
The chemistry of the main group elements in
				  terms of atomic structure, ionic and covalent bonding. Structural
				  theory involving s, p, and unfilled d orbitals. Thermodynamic and spectroscopic
				  criteria for structure and stability of compounds and chemical
				  reactions of main group elements in terms of molecular structure
				  and reactivity. 


CHEM 156. Structure and Properties of Organic Molecules (4)
 Chem
				  6C or 6CH and Chem 140A. (F,S) 


CHEM 157. Bioorganic and Natural Products Chemistry (4)
A continuation of the discussion of structure, bonding, and reactivity with emphasis on transition metals and other elements using filled d orbitals to form bonds. Coordination chemistry in terms of valence bond, crystal field, and molecular orbital theory. The properties and reactivities of transition metal complexes including organometallic compounds. 


CHEM 158. Applied Spectroscopy (4)
 Chem 120A. (W) 


CHEM 161. Supramolecular Coordination Chemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 225.) The roles of metal
				  ions in biological systems, with emphasis on transition metal ions in enzymes
				  that transfer electrons, bind oxygen, and fix nitrogen. Also included are
				  metal complexes in medicine, toxicity, and metal ion storage and transport.
				  Chem 225 students will be required to complete an additional paper and/or
				  exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 124. 


CHEM 164. Structural Biology of Viruses (4)
 Chem
			    114A or 120A or graduate standing. 


CHEM 165. 3D Electron Microscopy of Macromolecules (4)
 Chem 114A and/or 120A or, for graduate students, their equivalents. (May not be offered every year.) 


CHEM 167. Medicinal Chemistry (4)
With Chem 127, Chem 126 condenses Physical Chemistry into two quarters. They may be taken in either order. The emphasis is on biochemical and environmental applications. Quantum mechanics and molecular structure, spectroscopy. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 126 and Chem 133. 


CHEM 168. Drug Synthesis and Design (4)
 Chem 6B or 6AH, Phys 2C or 2D, and Math 20D. (F) 


CHEM 171. Environmental Chemistry I (4)
With Chem 126, Chem 127 condenses Physical Chemistry into two quarters. They may be taken in either order. The emphasis is on biochemical and environmental applications. Thermodynamics, first and second laws, thermochemistry, chemical equilibrium, solutions, kinetic theory, reaction kinetics. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 127 and Chem 131. 


CHEM 172. Environmental Chemistry II (4)
 Chem 6C or 6BH, Phys 2C or 2D, and Math 20C. (W) 


CHEM 173. Atmospheric Chemistry (4)
With Chem 131 and 132, Chem 130 is part of the Physical Chemistry sequence taught over three quarters. Recommended as the first course of the sequence. Key topics covered in this course include quantum mechanics, atomic and molecular spectroscopy, and molecular structure. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 130 and Chem 133, or for both Chem 130 and Chem 126. 


CHEM 174. Chemical Principles of Marine Systems (4)
 Chem 6C or 6CH, and Phys 2C or 2D, and Math 20D. (F)


CHEM 182. Biological Databases (4)
With Chem 130 and 132, Chem 131 is part of the Physical Chemistry sequence taught over three quarters. Recommended as the second course of the sequence. Key topics covered in this course include thermodynamics, chemical equilibrium, phase equilibrium, and chemistry of solutions. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 131 and Chem 127. 


CHEM 184. Computational Molecular Biology (4)
 Chem 6C or 6CH, Math 20C, and Phys 2C or 2D. (W) 


CHEM 185. Introduction to Computational Chemistry (4)
With Chem 130 and 131, Chem 132 is part of the Physical Chemistry sequence taught over three quarters. Recommended as the third course of the sequence. Key topics covered in this course include chemical statistics, kinetic theory, and reaction kinetics. 


CHEM 187. Foundations of Teaching and Learning Science (4)
 Chem 130 or 133, and Chem 131. (S) 


CHEM 188. Capstone Seminar in Science Education (4)
Time-dependent behavior of systems; interaction of matter with light; selection rules. Radiative and nonradiative processes, coherent phenomena, and the density matrices. Instrumentation, measurement, and interpretation. Prior or concurrent enrollment in Chem 105A recommended. 


CHEM 192. Senior Seminar in Chemistry and Biochemistry (1)
 Chem 133 and Math 20D. (S)


CHEM 194. Special Topics in Chemistry (2)
Introduction to organic chemistry, with applications to biochemistry. Bonding theory, isomerism, stereochemistry, chemical and physical properties. Introduction to substitution, addition, and elimination reactions. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 140A and Chem 140AH. 


CHEM 195. Methods of Teaching Chemistry (4)
 Chem 6B or Chem 6BH.  (F,W,S) 


CHEM 196. Reading and Research in Chemical Education (2 or 4)
Continuation of Organic Chemistry I, 140A. Methods of analysis, chemistry of hydrocarbons, chemistry of the carbonyl group. Introduction to the reactions of biologically important molecules. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 141B and Chem 140B. 


CHEM 197. Chemistry Internship (2 or 4)
 Chem 140A (a grade of C or higher in Chem 140A is strongly recommended). (F,W,S) 


CHEM 199. Reading and Research (2 or 4)
Rigorous introduction to organic chemistry, with preview of biochemistry. Bonding theory, isomerism, stereochemistry, physical properties, chemical reactivity. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 140AH and Chem 140A. 


CHEM 200B. Fundamentals of Instrumental Analysis (4)
 B+ or higher grade in Chem 6C or 6CH.


CHEM 204. Introduction to X-ray Crystallography (4)
Organic chemistry course for honors-level students with a strong background in chemistry. Similar to Chem 140B, but emphasizes mechanistic aspects of reactions and effects of molecular structure on reactivity. Students may not receive credit for Chem 140B and Chem 140BH. 


CHEM 207. Protein NMR (4)
 grade of B or higher in Chem 140A.


CHEM 209. Macromolecular Recognition (4)
Continuation of Organic Chemistry I (140A) and Organic Chemistry II (140B). Organic chemistry of biologically important molecules: carboxylic acids, carbohydrates, proteins, fatty acids, biopolymers, natural products. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 140C and Chem 141C. 


CHEM 210. Lipid Cell Signaling Genomics, Proteomics, and Metabolomics (2)
 Chem 140B (a grade of C or higher in Chem 140B is strongly recommended). (F,W,S) 


CHEM 213. Physical Chemistry of Biological Macromolecules (4)
Continuation of Organic Chemistry 140B or 140BH, at honors level. Chemistry of carbonylic acids, carbohydrates, proteins, lipids biopolymers, natural products. Emphasis on mechanistic aspects and structure reactivity relationships. 


CHEM 214. Molecular and Cellular Biochemistry (4)
 grade of B+ or higher in Chem 140B, or B– higher in Chem 140BH.


CHEM 215. Modeling Biological Macromolecules (4)
This course will provide an introduction to the physics and chemistry of soft matter, followed by a literature-based critical examination of several ubiquitous classes of organic nanomaterials and their technological applications. Topics include self-assembled monolayers, block copolymers, liquid crystals, photoresists, organic electronic materials, micelles and vesicles, soft lithography, organic colloids, organic nano composites, and applications in biomedicine and food science. 


CHEM 216. Chemical Biology (4)
 Chem 140C or 140CH. 


CHEM 217. RNA Structure, Function, and Biology (4)
Introduction to organic laboratory techniques.
				  Separation, and purification, spectroscopy, product analysis, and effects
				  of reaction conditions. 


CHEM 219. Special Topics in Biochemistry (4)
Chem 6BL or 7L, and Chem 140A or Chem 140AH. A materials fee is required.
				  A mandatory safety exam must be passed within the first two weeks. (


CHEM 220. Regulatory Circuits in Cells (4)
 students
				  may not receive credit for both Chem 143A and Chem 143AH.)



CHEM 221. Signal Transduction (4)
Organic chemistry laboratory for chemistry majors and other honors-level students with strong background in Chem 140A. Similar to Chem 143A, but emphasizes instrumental methods of product identification, separation, and analysis. A materials fee is required. A mandatory safety exam must be passed within the first two weeks. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 143A and Chem 143AH.


CHEM 222. Structure and Analysis of Solids (4)
 Chem 7L and B or better grade in Chem 140A. (W) 


CHEM 223. Organometallic Chemistry (4)
Continuation of Chem 143AH or 143A, emphasizing synthetic methods of
				  organic chemistry. 


CHEM 224. Spectroscopic Techniques (4)
 Chem 143AH or 143A,
				  Chem 140B (may be taken concurrently). Enrollment is limited
				  to majors in the Department of Chemistry and Biochemistry,
				  unless space is available. A materials fee is required for
				  this course. (W,S) 


CHEM 225. Bioinorganic Chemistry (4)
Identification of unknown organic compounds by a combination of chemical and physical techniques. This course is intended for chemistry majors only. Program or material fee may apply. 


CHEM 226. Transition Metal Chemistry (4)
 Chem 143 AH or 143A and Chem 140B. Must be chemistry major (CH25, CH28, CH31, CH32, CH33, CH34, CH35, CH36, CH37). (F) 


CHEM 227. Seminar in Inorganic Chemistry (2)
Advanced organic synthesis. Relationships between molecular structure and reactivity using modern synthetic methods and advanced instrumentation. Stresses importance of molecular design, optimized reaction conditions for development of practically useful synthesis, and problem-solving skills. 


CHEM 228. Solid State Chemistry (4)
 Chem 140C or 140CH and Chem 143B. A materials fee is required for this course. (S) 


CHEM 229. Special Topics in Inorganic Chemistry (2–4)
Fundamentals of the chemistry and biochemistry of petroleum and biofuel technologies. This course explores chemical identity and properties, metabolic pathways and engineering, refining processes, and analytical techniques related to current and future biofuels. 


CHEM 230A. Quantum Mechanics I (4)
 Chem 140C or 140CH.


CHEM 230B. Quantum Mechanics II (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 246.) Methodology of mechanistic organic
                  chemistry; integration of rate expression, determination of
                  rate constants, transition state theory; catalysis, kinetic
                  orders, isotope effects, solvent effects, linear free energy
                  relationship; product studies, stereochemistry; reactive intermediates;
                  rapid reactions. Chem 246 students will be required to complete
                  an additional term project beyond that expected of students
                  in Chem 146. 


CHEM 231. Chemical Kinetics and Molecular Reaction Dynamics (4)
 Chem 140C or
                  140CH (146) or graduate standing (246). (May not be offered
                  every year.)


CHEM 232A. Statistical Mechanics I (4)
A look at some of nature’s most intriguing molecules and the ability of man to discover, synthesize, modify, and use them. The role of chemistry in society, and how chemical synthesis—the art and science of constructing molecules—shapes our world. 


CHEM 232B. Statistical Mechanics II (4)
 Chem 140A or equivalent.


CHEM 235. Molecular Spectroscopy (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 252; formerly Chem
				  148.) A survey of reactions of particular utility in the organic
				  laboratory. Emphasis is on methods of preparation of carbon-carbon
				  bonds and oxidation reduction sequences. Chem 252 students will be required
				  to complete an additional paper and/or exam beyond that expected
				  of students enrolled in Chem 152. 


CHEM 239. Special Topics in Chemical Physics (2 or 4)
 Chem
				  140C or 140CH (152); or graduate standing (252). 


CHEM 240. Electrochemistry (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 254; formerly Chem 147.) A qualitative approach
				  to the mechanisms of various organic reactions; substitutions, additions,
				  eliminations, condensations, rearrangements, oxidations, reductions, free-radical
				  reactions, and photochemistry. Includes considerations of molecular structure
				  and reactivity, synthetic methods, spectroscopic tools, and stereochemistry.
				  The topics emphasized will vary from year to year. This is the first quarter
				  of the advanced organic chemistry sequence. Chem 254 students will be
				  required to complete an additional paper/exam beyond that expected of students
				  in Chem 154. 


CHEM 241. Organic Nanomaterials (4)
 Chem 140C or 140CH (154);
				  or graduate standing (254). 


CHEM 246. Kinetics and Mechanism (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 255; formerly Chem 144.) This course discusses planning economic routes for the synthesis of complex organic molecules. The uses of specific reagents and protecting groups will be outlined as well as the control of stereochemistry during a synthesis. Examples will be selected from the recent literature. Chem 255 students will be required to complete an additional paper/exam. (May not be offered every year.) 


CHEM 250. Seminar in Chemistry (2)
 Chem 152 or 252 or consent of instructor. 


CHEM 251. Research Conference (2)
(Conjoined with Chem 256.) Introduction to the measurement
				  and theoretical correlation of the physical properties of organic
				  molecules. Topics covered include molecular geometry, molecular-orbital
				  theory, orbital hybridization, aromaticity, chemical reactivity, stereochemistry,
				  infrared and electronic spectra, photochemistry, and nuclear magnetic resonance.
				  Chem 256 students will be required to complete an additional
				  paper and/or exam beyond that expected of students of Chem 156. 


CHEM 252. Synthetic Methods in Organic Chemistry (4)
 Chem
				  140C or 140CH (156); or graduate standing (256). 


CHEM 254. Mechanisms of Organic Reactions (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 257.) A comprehensive survey of modern bioorganic and natural products
				  chemistry. Topics will include biosynthesis of natural products, molecular
				  recognition, and small molecule-biomolecule interactions. For Chem 257,
				  students will be required to complete additional course work beyond that
				  expected of students enrolled in Chem 157.  


CHEM 255. Synthesis of Complex Molecules (4)
 Chem
				  140C or 140CH (157); or graduate standing (257). 


CHEM 256. Structure and Properties of Organic Molecules (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 258.) Intensive coverage of modern spectroscopic techniques used to determine the structure of organic molecules. Problem solving and interpretation of spectra will be strongly emphasized. 


CHEM 257. Biorganic and Natural Products Chemistry (4)
 Chem 140C or 140CH. 


CHEM 258. Applied Spectroscopy (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 261.) An introduction and survey of modern coordination chemistry. Topics will include structure and bonding of alkali, transition, lanthanide and actinide metals, with emphasis on the first row transition metals; stereochemistry, coordination clusters, molecular solids and nanoparticles. 


CHEM 259. Special Topics in Organic Chemistry (2–4)
 Chem 120A and 120B or equivalent. 


CHEM 260. Light and Electron Microscopy of Cells and Tissue (4)
(Cross-listed with BIMM 164.)
                  An introduction to virus structures, how they are determined,
                  and how they facilitate the various stages of the viral life
                  cycle from host recognition and entry to replication, assembly,
                  release, and transmission to uninfected host cells. (May not
                  be offered every year.) 


CHEM 261. Supramolecular Coordination Chemistry (4)
 Chem
                  114A or BIBC 100. Recommended: a basic course
                  in cell biology.


CHEM 262. Inorganic Chemistry and NMR (4)
(Conjoined with Chem 265; cross-listed with BIMM 162/BGGN 262.) Biological macromolecules and supramolecular complexes as well as organelles, and small cells are being examined in three dimensions by modern electron cryomicroscopy and image reconstruction techniques. The basic principles of transmission electron microscopy and 3D image reconstruction are discussed. Chem 265/BGGN 262 students will be required to complete an additional assignment/exam beyond that expected of students in Chem 165/BIMM 162. 


CHEM 264. Structural Biology of Viruses (4)
 Chem 114A or BIBC 100 or BIBC 110, and Phys 1A-B-C or Phys 2A-B-D.


CHEM 265. 3D Electron Microscopy of Macromolecules (4)
Basics of medicinal chemistry, emphasizing rigorous descriptions of receptor-protein structure, interactions, and dynamics; their implications for drug development; and an integrated treatment of pharmacodynamic and pharmacokinetic considerations in drug design. Treats computational approaches as well as practical experimental approaches. 


CHEM 270A-B-C. Current Topics in Environmental Chemistry (2-2-2)
 Chem140C or 140CH and Chem 114B and Chem 118.


CHEM 271. Special Topics in Analytical Chemistry (4)
Practical methods to make drugs currently in use and to design future drugs. Treats both chemical synthesis and biologics like monoclonal antibodies. Topics include fragment-based screening, solid phase synthesis, directed evolution, and bioconjugation as well as efficacy, metabolism, and toxicity. Recommended preparation: Chem 114C. 


CHEM 273. Atmospheric Chemistry (4)
 Chem140C or 140CH and Chem 114B. 


CHEM 276. Numerical Analysis in Multiscale Biology (4)
An introduction to chemical concerns in nature with emphasis on atmospheric issues like air pollution, chlorofluorocarbons and the ozone hole, greenhouse effects and climate change, impacts of radioactive waste, sustainable resource usage, and risks and benefits of energy sources. Students may not receive credit for both Chem 149A and Chem 171. 


CHEM 280. Applied Bioinformatics (4)
 Chem 6C or 6CH. (F) 


CHEM 283. Supramolecular Structure Determination Laboratory (4)
An introduction to chemical concerns in nature with emphasis on soil and water issues like agricultural productivity, biological impacts in the environment, deforestation, ocean desserts, natural and manmade disasters (fires, nuclear winter, volcanoes), and waste handling. Recommended preparation: Chem 171 (formerly 149A). Students may not receive credit for both Chem 172 and Chem 149B. 


CHEM 285. Introduction to Computational Chemistry (4)
 Chem 6C or 6CH. (W)


CHEM 294. Organic Chemistry Seminar (2)
(Conjoined with Chem 273.) Chemical principles
				  applied to the study of atmospheres. Atmospheric photochemistry, radical
				  reactions, chemical lifetime determinations, acid rain, greenhouse effects,
				  ozone cycle, and evolution are discussed. Chem 273 students will be required
				  to complete an additional assignment/exam beyond that expected of students
				  in Chem 173. 


CHEM 295. Biochemistry Seminar (2)
 Chem 171 and Chem 127 or 132(173); or graduate standing (273). 
				  (S)


CHEM 296. Chemical Physics Seminar (2)
(Cross-listed with SIO 141.) Introduction to the chemistry and distribution of the elements in seawater, emphasizing basic chemical principles such as electron structure, chemical bonding, and group and periodic properties and showing how these affect basic aqueous chemistry in marine systems. 


CHEM 297. Experimental Methods in Chemistry (4)
 Chem 6C with a grade of C– or better, or consent of instructor. (May not be offered every year.)


CHEM 298. Special Study in Chemistry (1–4)
(Cross-listed with BIMM 182/BENG 182/CSE 182.) This course provides an introduction to the features of biological data, how those data are organized efficiently in databases, and how existing data resources can be utilized to solve a variety of biological problems. Object oriented databases, data modeling, and description. Survey of current biological database with respect to above, implementation of database on a biological topic. 


CHEM 299. Research in Chemistry (1–12)
 CSE 100 or Math 176. Bioinformatics majors only. 


CHEM 500. Apprentice Teaching (4)
(Cross-listed with BIMM 184/BENG 184/CSE 184.)
				  This advanced course covers the application of machine learning and modeling
				  techniques to biological systems. Topics include gene structure, recognition
				  of DNA and protein sequence patterns, classification, and protein structure
				  prediction. Pattern discovery, Hidden Markov models/support vector machines/neural
				  network/profiles, protein structure prediction, functional characterization
				  or proteins, functional genomics/proteomics, metabolic pathways/gene networks. 


CHEM 509. Teaching Methods in Chemistry and Biochemistry (2)
 BIMM
				  181 or BENG 181 or CSE 181; BIMM 182 or BENG 182 or CSE 182 or Chem 182.
				  Bioinformatics majors only. 



http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/CHIN.html
CHIN 10AN. First Year Chinese—Non-native speakers I (5)
Introductory course of basic Chinese
            for students with no background in Chinese. First quarter of a one-year
            curriculum for entry-level Chinese in communicative skills. Covers
            pronunciation, fundamentals of Chinese grammar, and vocabulary. Topics
            include greetings, family affairs, numbers, and daily exchanges.
            Students may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 11 and CHIN 10AN.
          


CHIN 10AM. First Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers I (5)
 department approval.


CHIN 10AD. First Year Chinese—Dialect speakers I (5)
Introductory course of basic Chinese
            for students with background in Mandarin Chinese. First quarter of
            one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese in communicative skills.
            Covers pronunciation, fundamentals of Chinese grammar, and vocabulary.
            Topics include greetings, family affairs, numbers, and daily exchanges.
            Students may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 11 and CHIN 10AM.
          


CHIN 10BN. First Year Chinese—Non-native speakers II (5)
 department approval.


CHIN 10BM. First Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers II (5)
Introductory course of basic Chinese
            for students with background in a dialect of Chinese. First quarter
            of one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese in communicative skills.
            Covers pronunciation, fundamentals of Chinese grammar, and vocabulary.
            Topics include greetings, family affairs, numbers, and daily exchanges.
            Students may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 11 and CHIN 10AD.
          


CHIN 10BD. First Year Chinese—Dialect speakers II (5)
 department approval.


CHIN 10CN. First Year Chinese—Non-native speakers III (5)
Continuation of basic Chinese for students
            with no background in Chinese. Second course of one-year curriculum
            for entry-level Chinese communicative skills. Covers pronunciation,
            more elaborate grammar, and vocabulary. Focus on goal-oriented tasks:
            school life, shopping, and transportation. Students may not receive
            duplicate credit for CHIN 12 and CHIN 10BN. 


CHIN 10CM. First Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers III (5)
 CHIN 11,
          CHIN 10AN, or department stamp.


CHIN 10CD. First Year Chinese—Dialect speakers III (5)
Continuation introduction of basic
            Chinese for students with background in Mandarin Chinese. Second
            course of one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese communicative
            skills. Covers pronunciation, more elaborate Chinese grammar, and
            expanded vocabulary. Focus on goal-oriented tasks such as school
            life, shopping, and transportation. Students may not receive duplicate
            credit for CHIN 12 and CHIN 10BM. 


CHIN 20AN. Second Year Chinese—Non-native speakers I (4)
 CHIN 11, CHIN 10AM,
          or department stamp.


CHIN 20AM. Second Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers I (4)
Continuation introduction of basic
            Chinese for students with background in a dialect of Chinese. Second
            course of one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese communicative
            skills. Covers pronunciation, more elaborate Chinese grammar, and
            expanded vocabulary. Focus on goal-oriented tasks such as school
            life, shopping, and transportation. Students may not receive duplicate
            credit for CHIN 12 and CHIN 10BD.


CHIN 20AD. Second Year Chinese—Dialect speakers I (4)
 CHIN 11, CHIN 10AM,
          or department stamp.


CHIN 20BN. Second Year Chinese—Non-native speakers II (4)
Continuation course of basic Chinese
            for students with no background in Chinese. Third course of one-year
            curriculum for entry-level Chinese communicative skills. Expansion
            on pronunciation and more elaborate Chinese grammar and increasing
            vocabulary. Topics include dining, direction, and social life. Students
          may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 13 and CHIN 10CN. 


CHIN 20BM. Second Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers II (4)
 CHIN 12, CHIN 10BN, or department stamp.


CHIN 20BD. Second Year Chinese—Dialect speakers II (4)
Further continuation course of basic
            Chinese for students with background in Mandarin Chinese. Third course
            of one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese communicative skills.
            Expansion on pronunciation and more elaborate Chinese grammar and
            increasing vocabulary. Topics include dining, direction, and social
            life. Students may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 13 and CHIN
          10CM. 


CHIN 20CN. Second Year Chinese—Non-native speakers III (4)
 CHIN 12, CHIN 10BM, or department stamp.


CHIN 20CM. Second Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers III (4)
Further continuation course of basic
            Chinese for students with background in a dialect of Chinese. Third
            course of one-year curriculum for entry-level Chinese communicative
            skills. Expansion on pronunciation and more elaborate Chinese grammar
            and increasing vocabulary. Topics include dining, direction, and
            social life. Students may not receive duplicate credit for CHIN 13
          and CHIN 10CD. 


CHIN 20CD. Second Year Chinese—Dialect speakers III (4)
 CHIN 12, CHIN 10BD, or department stamp.


CHIN 100AN. Third Year Chinese—Non-native speakers I (4)
Second year of basic Chinese for students with no background. First
          course of second year of a one-year curriculum for Chinese in intermediate
          communicative skills. Covers sentence structure, idiomatic expression,
          development of listening, speaking, reading, and written competence
          in Chinese. Topics include sports, travel, and special events. Students
          may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 21 and CHIN 20AN. 


CHIN 100AM. Third Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers I (4)
 CHIN 13, CHIN 10CN, score of 3 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam,
          or department stamp.


CHIN 100BN. Third Year Chinese—Non-native speakers II (4)
Second year of basic Chinese for students with background in Mandarin.
          First course of second year of one-year curriculum for Chinese in intermediate
          communicative skills. Covers sentence structure and idiomatic expression,
          development of listening, speaking, reading, and written competence.
          Topics include sports, travel, and special events. Students may not
          receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 21 and CHIN 20AM.


CHIN 100BM. Third Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers II (4)
 CHIN 13, CHIN 10CM, score of 3 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam,
          or department stamp.


CHIN 100CN. Third Year Chinese—Non-native speakers III (4)
Second year of basic Chinese for students with background in a
            dialect of Chinese. First course of second year of one-year curriculum
            for Chinese in intermediate communicative skills. Covers sentence
            structure and idiomatic expression, development of listening, speaking,
            reading, and written competence in Chinese. Topics include sports,
            travel, and special events. Students may not receive duplicate credit
            for both CHIN 21 and CHIN 20AD. 


CHIN 100CM. Third Year Chinese—Mandarin speakers III (4)
 CHIN
          13, CHIN 10CD, score of 3 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam,
          or department stamp.


CHIN 160/260. Late Imperial and Twentieth-Century Chinese Historical Texts (4)
Continuation of second year of basic Chinese for students with
            no background. Second course of one-year curriculum for Chinese intermediate
          communicative skills. Covers sentence structure and idiomatic expressions,
          development of listening, speaking, reading and written competence
          in Chinese. Topics focus on China, population and other nationalities.
          Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 22 and CHIN
          20BN. 


CHIN 165A. Business Chinese (4)
 CHIN 21, CHIN 20AN, score
          of 4 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam or department stamp.


CHIN 165B. Business Chinese (4)
Continuation of second year of basic Chinese for students with
            background in a dialect of Chinese. Second course of one-year curriculum
            for Chinese intermediate communicative skills. Covers sentence structure
            and idiomatic expressions, development of listening, speaking, reading,
            and written competence in Chinese. Topics focus on China, population,
            and other nationalities. Students may not receive duplicate credit
            for both CHIN 22 and CHIN 20BD. 


CHIN 165C. Business Chinese (4)
CHIN 21, CHIN
          20AD, score of 4 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam, or department
          stamp.


CHIN 169A. Medical Chinese I (4)
Final course of second year Chinese for students with no background.
          Third course of a one-year curriculum for Chinese intermediate communicative
          skills. Expansion on pronunciation and more elaborate Chinese grammar
          and increasing vocabulary. Topics include food, physical actions, and
          culture. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 23
          and CHIN 20CN.


CHIN 169B. Medical Chinese II (4)
CHIN 22, CHIN
          20BN, score of 5 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam, or department
          stamp.


CHIN 182A. Introduction to Classical Chinese—Advanced I (4)
Final course of second year Chinese for students with background
            in Mandarin. Third course of one-year curriculum for Chinese intermediate
          communicative skills. Expansion on pronunciation and Chinese grammar
          and increasing vocabulary. Topics include food, physical actions, and
          culture. Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 23
          and CHIN 20CM. 


CHIN 182B. Introduction to Classical Chinese—Advanced II (4)
CHIN 22, CHIN
          20BM, score of 5 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam, or department
          stamp.


CHIN 182C. Introduction to Classical Chinese—Advanced III (4)
Final course of second year Chinese for students with background
            in a dialect of Chinese. Third course of one-year curriculum for
            Chinese intermediate communicative skills. Expansion on pronunciation
            and more elaborate Chinese grammar and increasing vocabulary. Topics
            include food, physical actions, and culture. Students may not receive
            duplicate credit for both CHIN 23 and CHIN 20CD. 


CHIN 185A-B-C. Readings in Chinese Culture and Society (4-4-4)
 CHIN 22, CHIN 20BD, score of 5 on AP Chinese Language and Culture Exam,
          or department stamp.


CHIN 186A-B-C. Readings in Chinese Economics, Politics, and Trade (4-4-4)
Intermediate
          course of Chinese for students with no background. First course of
          third year of one-year curriculum that focuses on listening, reading,
          and speaking. Emphasizing the development of advanced oral, written
          competence, and aural skills in Mandarin. Topics include education,
          literature, history of Chinese language and society. Students may not
          receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 111 and CHIN 100AN. 


CHIN 196. Directed Thesis Research (4)
CHIN 23, CHIN 20CN, or department stamp.


CHIN 198. Directed Group Study in Chinese Studies (2 or 4)
Intermediate course of Chinese for students with background in
            Mandarin and other dialects. First course of third year of one-year
            curriculum that focuses on listening, reading, and speaking. Topics
            include education, literature, history of Chinese language and society.
            Students may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 111 and CHIN
            100AM. 


CHIN 199. Independent Study in Chinese Studies (2 or 4)
 CHIN 23, CHIN 20CM or CHIN 20CD, or department
          stamp.


CHIN 260. Late Imperial and Twentieth-Century Chinese Historical Texts (4)
Intermediate course of Chinese for students with no background.
            Second course of third year of Chinese that emphasizes the development
            of advanced oral, written competence and aural skills in Mandarin.
            Topics include various cultural aspects of the Chinese language,
            additional family issues and society. Students may not receive duplicate
          credit for both CHIN 112 and CHIN 100BN. 


CHIN 269. Conversational Mandarin for Medical Students—Beginning (2)
 CHIN 111, CHIN 100AN or department stamp.


CHIN 296. Directed Thesis Research (2–12)
Intermediate course of Chinese for students with background in
            Mandarin and other dialects. Second course of third year of Chinese
            that emphasizes the development of advanced oral, written competence,
            and aural skills in Mandarin. Topics include cultural aspects of
            the Chinese language, additional family issues and society. Students
            may not receive duplicate credit for both CHIN 112 and CHIN 100BM.
          


CHIN 299. Independent Study in Chinese Studies (2–12)
 CHIN 111, CHIN 100AM, or department stamp.


CHIN 500. Apprentice Teaching (2–4)
Intermediate course of Chinese for students with no background.
            Third course of third year of one-year curriculum in Chinese language
            acquisition. Continue to develop proficiency at intermediate level.
            Improves students’ Chinese language skills and knowledge of the culture
            with an emphasis of reading and writing. Students may not receive
          duplicate credit for both CHIN 113 and CHIN 100CN. 



http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/CLAS.html
CLAS 196. Directed Honors Thesis in Classical Studies (4)
BA honors thesis research under the direction of a member of a Classical Studies Program faculty. 


Classics 200A. Contemporary Literary Theory and the Classics (4)
 acceptance into the Classical Studies Honors Program and consent of instructor.    


Classics 200B. Historical Perspectives on Classical Antiquity (4)
Covers various technical skills essential for research and pedagogy in classics, including use of digital resources (e.g., bibliographical databases). Provides an introduction to important disciplinary subfields, such as textual criticism and epigraphy. Selection of topics will be at instructor’s discretion. 


Classics 200C. Greece and Rome in Their Contemporary Cultural Contexts (4)
Concurrent enrollment with advanced undergraduate courses (either Greek 105 or Latin 105) with enhanced readings and separate examinations. May be repeated for credit as topics vary. 


Classics 201. Research and Pedagogical Tools for Classicists (4)
Supervised independent research. Subject varies. 


Classics 205. Concurrent Readings (2)
F,W,S. 


Classics 220. Classics Graduate Seminar (4)
F,W,S. May be repeated for credit. Satisfactory/Unsatisfactory
				  only. 


Classics 280. Independent Study (4)
F,W,S. Required of and limited to teaching
		  assistants. 


Classics 290. Research in Classics (4-4-4)
TKO 11.  Conversation Workshop I (1)
LTKO 21.  Conversation Workshop II (1)
LTKO 100. Readings in Korean Literature and Culture (4)
LTKO 149. Readings in Korean Language History and Structure (4)
LTLA 1. Beginning Latin (4)
LTLA 2. Intermediate Latin (I) (4)
LTLA 3. Intermediate Latin (II) (4)
LTLA 4. Intensive Elementary Latin (12)
LTLA 100. Introduction to Latin Literature (4)
LTLA 102. Latin Poetry (4)
LTLA 103. Latin Drama (4)
LTLA 104. Latin Prose (4)
LTLA 105. Topics in Latin Literature (4)
LTLA 198. Directed Group Study (4)
LTLA 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
LTRU 1A-B-C. First-Year Russian (5-5-5)
LTRU 2A-B-C. Second-Year Russian (5-5-5)
LTRU104A-B-C. Advanced Practicum in Russian (4-4-4)
LTRU 110A-B-C. Survey of Russian and Soviet Literature in Translation, 1800–Present (4-4-4)
LTRU 123. Single Author in Russian Literature in Translation (4)
LTRU 150. Russian Culture (4)
LTRU 198. Directed Group Study (4)
LTRU 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
LTSP 2A. Intermediate Spanish I: Foundations (5)
LTSP 2B. Intermediate Spanish II: Readings and Composition (5)
LTSP 2C. Intermediate Spanish III: Cultural Topics and Composition (4)
LTSP 2D. Intermediate/Advanced Spanish: Spanish for Bilingual Speakers (4)
LTSP 2E. Advanced Readings and Composition for Bilingual Speakers (4)
LTSP 21. Conversation Workshop I (1)
LTSP 31. Conversation Workshop II (1)
LTSP 41. Conversation and Orthography Workshop (1)
LTSP 50A. Readings in Peninsular Literature (4)
LTSP 50B. Readings in Latin American Literature (4)
LTSP 50C. Readings in Latin American Topics (4)
LTSP 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
LTSP 100. Major Works of the Middle Ages (4)
LTSP 116. Representations of Spanish Colonialism (4)
LTSP 119C. Cervantes: Don Quixote (4)
LTSP 123. Topics in Modern Spanish Culture (4)
LTSP 129. Spanish Writing after 1939 (4)
LTSP 130B. Development of Latin American Literature (4)
LTSP 133. Contemporary Latin American Literature (4)
LTSP 134. Literature of the Southern Cone (4)
LTSP 135A. Mexican Literature before 1910 (4)
LTSP 135B. Modern Mexican Literature (4)
LTSP 136. Andean Literatures (4)
LTSP 137. Caribbean Literature (4)
LTSP 138. Central American Literature (4)
LTSP 140. Latin American Novel (4)
LTSP 141. Latin American Poetry (4)
LTSP 142. Latin American Short Story (4)
LTSP 150A. Early Latino/a-Chicano/a Cultural Production: 1848 to 1960 (4)
LTSP 150B. Contemporary Chicano/a-Latino/a Cultural Production: 1960 to Present (4)
LTSP 159.  Methodological Approaches to the Study of History and Culture in Latin America and the Caribbean (4)
LTSP 160. Spanish Phonetics (4)
LTSP 166.  Creative Writing (4)
LTSP 171. Studies in Peninsular and/or Latin American Literature and Society (4)
LTSP 172. Indigenista Themes in Latin American Literature (4)
LTSP 174. Topics in Culture and Politics (4)
LTSP 175. Gender, Sexuality, and Culture (4)
LTSP 176. Literature and Nation (4)
LTSP 177. Literary and Historical Migrations (4)
LTSP 196. Honors Thesis (4)
LTSP 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
LTSP 224. Golden Age Studies (4)
LTSP 258. Spanish American Prose (4)
LTSP 272. Literature and Society Studies (4)
LTSP 297. Directed Studies: Reading Course (1–12)
LTSP 298. Special Projects: Writing Course (1–12)
LTSP 299. Dissertation (1–12)
LTTH 110. History of Criticism (4)
LTTH 115. Introduction to Critical Theory (4)
LTTH 150. Topics in Critical Theory (4)
LTTH 198. Directed Group Study (4)
LTTH 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
LTTH 200A. Text/Culture/Critical Practice (4)
LTTH 200B. Problems in Contemporary Literary Theory (4)
LTTH 200C. Cultural Perspectives and Cultural Criticism (4)
LTTH 201. Contemporary Theoretical Debates and Critical Discourses (4)
LTTH 250. Writing and Theory (4)
LTTH 255. Modern Art Movements and Aesthetics (4)
LTTH 298. Special Projects: Writing Course (1–12)
LTAF 110. African Oral Literature (4)
LTAF 120. Literature and Film of Modern Africa (4)
LTAM 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
LTAM 100. Latino/a Cultures in the United States (4)
LTAM 101. Early Latino/a-Chicano/a Cultures: 1848–1960 (4)
LTAM 105. Gender and Sexuality in Latino/a Cultural Production (4)
LTAM 106. Modern Chicana and Mexican Women Writings (4)
LTAM 107. Comparative Latino/a and US Ethnic Cultures (4)
LTAM 108. Chicano/a and Latino/a Cultures: Intellectual and Political Traditions (4)
LTAM 109. Cultural Production of the Latino/a Diasporas (4)
LTAM 110. Latin American Literature in Translation (4)
LTAM 111. Comparative Caribbean Discourse (4)
LTAM 120. Iranian-American Culture (4)
LTAM 130. Reading North by South (4)
LTAM 140. Topics in Culture and Politics (4)
LTEA 100A. Classical Chinese Poetry in Translation (4)
LTEA 100B. Modern Chinese Poetry in Translation (4)
LTEA 100C. Contemporary Chinese Poetry in Translation (4)
LTEA 110A. Classical Chinese Fiction in Translation (4)
LTEA 110B. Modern Chinese Fiction in Translation (4)
LTEA 110C. Contemporary Chinese Fiction in Translation (4)
LTEA 120A. Chinese Films (4)
LTEA 120B. Taiwan Films (4)
LTEA 120C. Hong Kong Films (4)
LTEA 132. Later Japanese Literature in Translation (4)
LTEA 138. Japanese Films (4)
LTEA 140. Modern Korean Literature in Translation from Colonial Period (4)
LTEA 141. Modern Korean Literature in Translation from 1945 to Present (4)
LTEA 142. Korean Film, Literature, and Popular Culture (4)
LTEA 143. Gender and Sexuality in Korean Literature and Culture (4)
LTEA 144. Korean American Literature and Other Literatures of Korean Diaspora (4)
LTEA 151. Readings in Tagalog Literature and Culture I (4)
LTEA 152A. Topics in Filipino Literature and Culture (Nineteenth Century–World War II) (4)
LTEA 152B. Topics in Filipino Literature and Culture (World War II–Present) (4)
LTEA 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
LTEU 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
LTEU 105. Medieval Studies (4)
LTEU 109. Studies in Eighteenth-Century European Literature (4)
LTEU 110. European Romanticism (4)
LTEU 111. European Realism (4)
LTEU 125. Faust in European Literature (4)
LTEU 130. German Literature in Translation (4)
LTEU 137. Seminars in German Culture (4)
LTEU 139. Marx/Nietzsche/Freud (4)
LTEU 140. Italian Literature in Translation (4)
LTEU 145. Studies in Modern Italian Poetry (4)
LTEU 147. Women in Italy (4)
LTEU 150A-B-C. Survey of Russian and Soviet Literature in Translation, 1800 to the Present (4-4-4)
LTEU 154. Russian Culture (4)
LTEU 158. Single Author in Russian Literature in Translation (4)
LTWL 4A-C-D-F-M. Film and Fiction in Twentieth-Century Societies (4)
LTWL 19A-B-C. Introduction to the Ancient Greeks and Romans (4-4-4)
LTWL 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
TWS 21-22-23-24-25-26. Third World Literatures (4-4-4-4-4-4)
LTWL 100. Mythology (4)
LTWL 106. The Classical Tradition (4)
LTWL 108. Words and Their Vicissitudes (4)
LTWL 110B. Folk and Fairy Tales (4)
LTWL 111. Medieval Studies (4)
LTWL 114. Children’s Literature (4)
LTWL 116. Adolescent Literature (4)
LTWL 120. Popular Literature and Culture (4)
LTWL 123. Vampires in Literature (4)
LTWL 124. Science Fiction (4)
LTWL 128. Introduction to Semiotics and Applications (4)
LTWL 129. Wisdom: The Literature of Authority (4)
LTWL 134. Cinema and Islam (4)
LTWL 135. The Buddhist Imaginary (4)
LTWL 136. Socially Engaged Buddhism (4)
LTWL 138. Critical Religion Studies (4)
LTWL 139. Gnosticism: The Religious Underground from Late Antiquity to the New Age (4)
LTWL 140. Novel and History in the Third World (4)
LTWL 141. Islam and Modernity (4)
LTWL 143. Arab Literatures and Cultures (4)
LTWL 144.  Islam and Cinema (4)
LTWL 150. Modernity and Literature (4)
LTWL 155. Gender Studies (4)
LTWL 157. Iranian Film (4)
LTWL 158A. Topics in the New Testament (4)
LTWL 158B. Topics in Early Christian Texts and Cultures (4)
LTWL 158C. Topics in Other Christianities (4)
LTWL 159. Digital Middle East: Culture, Politics, and Religion (4)
LTWL 160. Women and Literature (4)
LTWL 165. Literature and the Environment (4)
LTWL 168. Death and Desire in India (4)
LTWL 169. Yoga, Body, and Transformation (4)
LTWL 172. Special Topics in Literature (4)
LTWL 176. Literature and Ideas (4)
LTWL 180. Film Studies and Literature: Film History (4)
LTWL 181. Film Studies and Literature: Film Movement (4)
LTWL 183. Film Studies and Literature: Director’s Work (4)
LTWL 184. Film Studies and Literature: Close Analysis of Filmic Text (4)
LTWL 191. Honors Seminar (4)
LTWL 192. Senior Seminar in Literatures of the World (1)
LTWL 194. Capstone Course for Literature Majors (4)
LTWL 194A. Honors Practicum (1)
LTWL 196. Honors Thesis (4)
LTWL 198. Directed Group Study (4)
LTWL 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
LTWL 500. Apprentice Teaching in Literature (2 or 4)
LTWL 501. Apprentice Teaching in Humanities (2 or 4)
LTWL 503. Apprentice Teaching in Marshall College (2 or 4)
LTWL 504. Apprentice Teaching in Warren College (2 or 4)
LTWL 506. Apprentice Teaching in Roosevelt College (2 or 4)
LTWR 8A. Writing Fiction (4)
LTWR 8B. Writing Poetry (4)
LTWR 8C. Writing Nonfiction (4)
LTWR 100. Short Fiction Workshop (4)
LTWR 101. Writing Fiction in Spanish (4)
LTWR 102. Poetry Workshop (4)
LTWR 104A. The Novella I (4)
LTWR 104B. The Novella II (4)
LTWR 106. Science Fiction, Fantasy, and Irrealism Workshop (4)
LTWR 113. Intercultural Writing Workshop (4)
LTWR 114. Graphic Texts Workshop (4)
LTWR 115. Experimental Writing Workshop (4)
LTWR 119. Writing for Performance (4)
LTWR 120. Personal Narrative Workshop (4)
LTWR 121. Media Writing Workshop (4)
LTWR 122. Writing for the Sciences Workshop (4)
LTWR 124. Translation of Literary Texts Workshop (4)
LTWR 126. Creative Nonfiction Workshop (4)
LTWR 129. Distributing Literature Workshop (4)
LTWR 143. Stylistics and Grammar (4)
LTWR 144. The Teaching of Writing (4)
LTWR 148. Theory for Writers/Writing for Theory (4)
LTWR 194. Capstone Course for Writing Majors (4)
LTWR 195. Apprentice Teaching (4)
LTWR 196. Honors Thesis (4)
LTWR 198. Directed Group Study (2 or 4)
LTWR 199. Special Studies (2 or 4)
LTWR 200. Fiction Workshop (4)
LTWR 202. Poetry Workshop (4)
LTWR 215. Cross-Genre Workshop (4)
LTWR 220. Topics in Writing (4)
LTWR 295. MFA Thesis (1–12)
LTWR 298. Directed Studies: Writing Course (1–12)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/MMW.html
MMW 11. Prehistory and Ancient Foundations (4)
MMW 12. Classical and Medieval Traditions (6)
MMW 13. New Ideas and Cultural Encounters (6)                              
MMW 14. Revolution, Industry, and Empire (4)                       
MMW 15. Twentieth Century and Beyond (4)                          
MMW 121. Exploring the Premodern World (4)
MMW 122. Exploring the Modern World (4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/RSM.html
MGT 3. Quantitative Methods in Business (4) 
MGT 4. Financial Accounting (4)
MGT 5. Managerial Accounting (4)
MGT 12. Personal Financial Management (4) 
MGT 16. Personal Ethics at Work (4)
MGT 18. Managing Diverse Teams (4)
MGT 45. Principles of Accounting (4)
MGT 103. Product Marketing and Management (4)
MGT 105. Product Promotion and Brand Management (4)
MGT 106. Sales and Sales Management (4)
MGT 112. Global Business Strategy (4)
MGT 121A. Innovation to Market A (4)
MGT 121B. Innovation to Market B (4)
MGT 128. Innovation in Service Enterprises (4)
MGT 129. Topics in Entrepreneurship (2)
MGT 131A. Intermediate Accounting A (4)
MGT 131B. Intermediate Accounting B (4)
MGT 132. Auditing (4)
MGT 133. Advanced Cost Accounting (4)
MGT 134. Federal Taxation—Individuals (4)
MGT 135. Federal Taxation—Companies (4)
MGT 136. Advanced Accounting (4)
MGT 138. Information Technology and Accounting (4)
MGT 139. Accounting Information Systems (4)
MGT 153. Business Analytics (4)
MGT 162. Negotiation (2)
MGT 164. Business and Organizational Leadership (4)
MGT 166. Business Ethics and Corporate Responsibility (4)
MGT 167. Social Entrepreneurship (4)
MGT 172. Business Project Management (4)
MGT 173. Project Management: Health Services (4)
MGT 174. Supply Chain and Operations Management (4)
MGT 181. Enterprise Finance (4)
MGT 183. Financial Investments (4)   
MGT 184. Money and Banking (4) 
MGT 185. Investment Banking (4)   
MGT 187. New Venture Finance (4)
MGT 198. Directed Group Study (4)
MGT 199. Directed Independent Study (4)
MGT 401. Professional Seminar (1)
MGT 402. Management Communications (1)
MGT 403. Quantitative Analysis (4)
MGT 404. Accounting (4)
MGT 405. Managerial Economics (4)
MGT 406. Leadership Skills, Values, and Teamwork in Technology Firms (4)
MGT 407. Marketing (4)
MGT 408. Finance (4)
MGT 409. Organizational Strategy (4)
MGT 410. Strategy (4)
MGT 412. Lab to Market: Opportunity and Business Model Analysis (4)
MGT 413. Operations, Information Systems, and Data Analysis (4)
MGT 414A. Lab to Market Workshop I (4)
MGT 414B. Lab to Market Workshop II (4)
MGT 416. Readings in Management (1 or 2)
MGT 417. Current Business Law Issues (4)
MGT 419. Global Business Immersion (2)
MGT 420. Negotiation (4)
MGT 421. CEO, the Board of Directors, and Corporate Governance (4)
MGT 422. Creativity and Innovation (4)
MGT 426. Creating a High-Performing Workplace (2)
MGT 427. Decision Analysis (4)
MGT 429. Topics in Corporate Governance (2 or 4)
MGT 430. Biotechnology Industry, Structure, and Strategy (4)
MGT 439. Topics in Organizational Behavior (2 or 4)
MGT 442. Topics in Decision Sciences (2 or 4)
MGT 443. Topics in International Business (2 or 4)
MGT 444. Topics in Business Strategy (2 or 4)
MGT 447. Drug Discovery, Development, and Commercialization (3)
MGT 449. Topics in Operations and Technology (2 or 4)
MGT 450. Project Management (4)
MGT 451. Technology and Innovation Strategy (4)
MGT 452. New Product Development (4)
MGT 453. Supply Chain Management (4)
MGT 454. Disruptive Technologies for Health Care (4)
MGT 459. Topics in Innovation (2 or 4)
MGT 463. Projects in Technology Commercialization (4)
MGT 464. Projects in Business Innovation (4)
MGT 469. Topics in Accounting (2 or 4)
MGT 475. Research for Marketing Decisions (4)
MGT 476. Marketing Strategy (4)
MGT 477. Consumer Behavior (4)
MGT 478. Marketing Communications (4)
MGT 479. Pricing (4)
MGT 480. Sales and Sales Management (4)
MGT 489. Topics in Marketing (2 or 4)
MGT 491. Investments (4)
MGT 492. Financial Risk Management (4)
MGT 495. Topics in Finance (2 or 4)
MGT 496A. Venture Capital Management I (2)
MGT 496B. Venture Capital Management II (2)
MGT 497. Advanced Management Research Practicum (1)
MGT 499. Individual Directed Study (1-4)
MGTF 405. Business Forecasting (4)
MGTF 406. Behavioral Finance (4)
MGTF 407. Valuation in Corporate Finance (4)
MGTF 408. Real Estate Finance (4)
MGTF 409. Mergers, Acquisitions, and Corporate Restructuring (4)
MGTF 410. New Venture Finance (4)
MGTF 412. Financial Statement Analysis (4)
MGTF 432. Portfolio Theory in Practice (4)
MGTF 401. Financial Accounting (4)
MGTF 402. Investment Analysis (4)
MGTF 403. Advanced Financial Risk Management (4)
MGTF 404. Financial Econometrics and Empirical Methods (4)
MGTF 405. Business Forecasting (4)
MGTF 406. Behavioral Finance (4)
MGTF 407. Valuation in Corporate Finance (4)
MGTF 408. Real Estate Finance (4)
MGTF 410. New Venture Finance (4)
MGTF 411. Stochastic Calculus and Continuous Time Finance (4)
MGTF 412. Financial Statement Analysis (4)
MGTF 413. Computational Finance Methods (4)
MGTF 414. Analyzing Large Data (4)
MGTF 415. Collecting and Analyzing Financial Data (4)
MGTF 416. Professional Seminars in Finance (1)
MGTF 417. Professional Communications in Finance (1)      
MGTF 432. Portfolio Theory in Practice (4)
MGTF 490. Capstone: Applied Finance Project (4)
MGTA 401. Professional Seminar (1)
MGTA 451. Business Analytics in Marketing, Finance, and Operations (4)
MGTA 452. Collecting and Analyzing Large Data (4)
MGTA 453. Business Analytics (4)
MGTA 454. Business Analytics Capstone Project (2 or 4)
MGTA 455. Customer Analytics (4)
MGTA 456. Supply Chain Analytics (4)
MGTA 457. Business Intelligence Systems (2)
MGTA 458. Experiments in Firms (4)
MGTA 459. Managerial Judgment and Decision-Making (4)
MGTA 460. Business Analytics Project Management (2)
MGT 208A. Introduction to Management Research A (4)
MGT 208B. Introduction to Management Research B (4)
MGT 208C. Introduction to Management Research C (4)
MGT 225. Behavioral Economics (4)
MGT 226. Theory of Industrial Organization and Business Strategy (4)
MGT 245. Theory of Technology and Operations Management (4)
MGT 246. Research in Management and Technology Strategy (4)
MGT 255. Psychology and Decision Making (4)
MGT 256. Consumer Behavior Research (4)
MGT 257. Behavior in Organizations (4)
MGT 285. Financial Economics (4)
MGT 286. Continuous-Time Finance (4)
MGT 287. Empirical Finance (4)
MGT 293A. Literature Review and Critique Paper (4)
MGT 293B. Literature Review and Critique Presentation (4)
MGT 293C. Original Research Paper (4)
MGT 293D. Original Research Presentation (4)
MGT 296. Dissertation (4-12)
MGT 299. Advanced Field Advising (4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/MBC.html
SIO 286. Marine Science, Economics, and Policy (4)
SIO 295S. Introduction to Marine Biodiversity and Conservation—Seminar (8)
SIO 295LS. Introduction to Marine Biodiversity and Conservation—Lab (8)
MBC 258. Special Topics/Marine Biology–MAS-MBC Forum (1)
MBC 296. Capstone Independent Study Project (6)
Electives. Varies (8)
 

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/TMC.html
TMC 1. First Year Experience (2)
TMC 2. Transfer Year Experience (2)
TMC 10. Thurgood Marshall College Methods of Inquiry (2)
TMC 15. Introduction to Public Service in America (4)
TMC 20. Thurgood Marshall College Honors Seminar (1)
TMC 90. Undergraduate Seminar (1)
TMC 198. Thurgood Marshall College Directed Group Studies (4)
TMC 199. Marshall College Special Project (1–4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/MATS.html
MATS 200. Graduate Seminar (0)
MATS 201A. Thermodynamics of Solids (4)
MATS 201B. Solid State Diffusion and Reaction Kinetics (4)
MATS 201C. Phase Transformations (4)
MATS 205A. Imperfections in Solids (4)
MATS 213A. Dynamic Behavior of Materials I (4)
MATS 227. Structure and Analysis of Solids (4)
MATS 231. Mechanics of Soft Materials (4)
MATS 236. Advanced Ceramic (4)
MATS 243. Modern Materials Analysis (4)
MATS 251A. Electronic and Photonic Properties of Materials (4)
MATS 251B. Magnetic Materials: Principles and Applications (4)
MATS 252. Biomaterials and Medical Devices (4)
MATS 253. Nanomaterials and Properties (4)
MATS 254. Frontier Micro-Electro-Mechanical Systems (MEMS) Materials and Devices (4)
MATS 256. Energy Materials and Applications (4)
MATS 257. Polymer Science and Engineering (4)
MATS 259. Frontiers in Therapeutic and Diagnostic Delivery (1)
MATS 261A. Processing of Polymers and Composites (4)
MATS 261B. Mechanical Behavior of Polymers and Composites (4)
MATS 295. Research Conference (2)
MATS 296. Independent Study (4)
MATS 299. Graduate Research (1–12)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/MATH.html
MATH 3C. Precalculus (4)
MATH 4C. Precalculus for Science and Engineering (4)
MATH 10A. Calculus I (4)
MATH 10B. Calculus II (4)
MATH 10C. Calculus III (4)
MATH 11. Calculus-Based Introductory Probability and Statistics (5)
MATH 15A. Introduction to Discrete Mathematics (4)
MATH 18. Linear Algebra (4)
MATH 20A. Calculus for Science and Engineering (4)
MATH 20B. Calculus for Science and Engineering (4)
MATH 20C. Calculus and Analytic Geometry for Science and Engineering (4)
MATH 20D. Introduction to Differential Equations (4)
MATH 20E. Vector Calculus (4)
MATH 31AH. Honors Linear Algebra (4)
MATH 31BH. Honors Multivariable Calculus (4)
MATH 31CH. Honors Vector Calculus (4)
MATH 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
MATH 95. Introduction to Teaching Math (2)
MATH 96. Putnam Seminar (1)
MATH 99R. Independent Study (1)
MATH 100A. Abstract Algebra I (4)
MATH 100B. Abstract Algebra II (4)
MATH 100C. Abstract Algebra III (4)
MATH 102. Applied Linear Algebra (4)
MATH 103A. Modern Algebra I (4)
MATH 103B. Modern Algebra II (4)
MATH 104A. Number Theory I (4)
MATH 104B. Number Theory II (4)
MATH 104C. Number Theory III (4)
MATH 109. Mathematical Reasoning (4)
MATH 110A. Introduction to Partial Differential Equations (4)
MATH 110B. Elements of Partial Differential Equations and Integral Equations (4)
MATH 111A. Mathematical Modeling I (4)
MATH 111B. Mathematical Modeling II (4)
MATH 120A. Elements of Complex Analysis (4)
MATH 120B. Applied Complex Analysis (4)
MATH 121A. Foundations of Teaching and Learning Mathematics I (4)
MATH 121B. Foundations of Teaching and Learning Math II (4)
MATH 130A. Ordinary Differential Equations I (4)
MATH 130B. Ordinary Differential Equations II (4)
MATH 140A. Foundations of Real Analysis I (4)
MATH 140B. Foundations of Real Analysis II (4)
MATH 140C. Foundations of Real Analysis III (4)
MATH 142A. Introduction to Analysis I (4)
MATH 142B. Introduction to Analysis II (4)
MATH 150A. Differential Geometry (4)
MATH 150B. Calculus on Manifolds (4)
MATH 152. Applicable Mathematics and Computing (4)
MATH 153. Geometry for Secondary Teachers (4)
MATH 154. Discrete Mathematics and Graph Theory (4)
MATH 155A. Geometric Computer Graphics (4)
MATH 160A. Elementary Mathematical Logic I (4)
MATH 160B. Elementary Mathematical Logic II (4)
MATH 163. History of Mathematics (4)
MATH 168A. Topics in Applied Mathematics—Computer Science(4)
MATH 170A. Introduction to Numerical Analysis: Linear Algebra (4)
MATH 170B. Introduction to Numerical Analysis: Approximation and Nonlinear Equations (4)
MATH 170C. Introduction to Numerical Analysis: Ordinary Differential Equations (4)
MATH 171A. Introduction to Numerical Optimization: Linear Programming (4)
MATH 171B. Introduction to Numerical Optimization: Nonlinear Programming (4)
MATH 174. Numerical Methods for Physical Modeling (4)
MATH 175. Numerical Methods for Partial Differential Equations (4)
MATH 179. Projects in Computational and Applied Mathematics (4)
MATH 180A. Introduction to Probability (4)
MATH 180B. Introduction to Stochastic Processes I (4)
MATH 180C. Introduction to Stochastic Processes II (4)
MATH 181A. Introduction to Mathematical Statistics I (4)
MATH 181B. Introduction to Mathematical Statistics II (4)
MATH 181C. Mathematical Statistics—Nonparametric Statistics (4)
MATH 181E. Mathematical Statistics—Time Series (4)
MATH 183. Statistical Methods (4)
MATH 184A. Combinatorics (4)
MATH 185. Introduction to Computational Statistics (4)
MATH 186. Probability Statistics for Bioinformatics (4)
MATH 187. Introduction to Cryptography (4)
MATH 189. Exploratory Data Analysis and Inference (4)
MATH 190. Introduction to Topology (4)
MATH 191. Topics in Topology (4)
MATH 193A. Actuarial Mathematics I (4)
MATH 193B. Actuarial Mathematics II (4)
MATH 194. The Mathematics of Finance (4)
MATH 195. Introduction to Teaching in Mathematics (4)
MATH 196. Student Colloquium (1)
MATH 197. Mathematics Internship (2 or 4)
MATH 199. Independent Study for Undergraduates (2 or 4)
MATH 199H. Honors Thesis Research for Undergraduates (2–4)
MATH 200A-B-C. Algebra (4-4-4)
MATH 201A. Basic Topics in Algebra I (4)
MATH 202A. Applied Algebra I (4)
MATH 202B. Applied Algebra II (4)
MATH 202C. Applied Algebra III (4)
MATH 203A-B-C. Algebraic Geometry (4-4-4)
MATH 204A. Number Theory I (4)
MATH 204B. Number Theory II (4)
MATH 204C. Number Theory III (4)
MATH 205. Topics in Number Theory (4)
MATH 206A. Topics in Algebraic Geometry (4)
MATH 206B. Further Topics in Algebraic Geometry (4)
MATH 207A. Topics in Algebra (4)
MATH 209. Seminar in Number Theory (1)
MATH 210A. Mathematical Methods in Physics and Engineering (4)
MATH 210B. Mathematical Methods in Physics and Engineering (4)
MATH 210C. Mathematical Methods in Physics and Engineering (4)
MATH 217. Topics in Applied Mathematics (4)
MATH 220A-B-C. Complex Analysis (4-4-4)
MATH 221A. Topics in Several Complex Variables (4)
MATH 221B. Further Topics in Several Complex Variables (4)
MATH 231A-B-C. Partial Differential Equations (4-4-4)
MATH 237A. Topics in Differential Equations (4)
MATH 237B. Further Topics in Differential Equations (4)
MATH 240A-B-C. Real Analysis (4-4-4)
MATH 241A-B. Functional Analysis (4-4)
MATH 242. Topics in Fourier Analysis (4)
MATH 243. Seminar in Operator Algebras (1)
MATH 245A. Convex Analysis and Optimization I (4)
MATH 245B. Convex Analysis and Optimization II (4)
MATH 245C. Convex Analysis and Optimization III (4)
MATH 247A. Topics in Real Analysis (4)
MATH 247B. Further Topics in Real Analysis (4)
MATH 248. Seminar in Real Analysis (1)
MATH 250A-B-C. Differential Geometry (4-4-4)
MATH 251A-B-C. Lie Groups (4-4-4)
MATH 256. Seminar in Lie Groups and Lie Algebras (1)
MATH 257A. Topics in Differential Geometry (4)
MATH 257B. Further Topics in Differential Geometry (4)
MATH 258. Seminar in Differential Geometry (1)
MATH 259A-B-C. Geometrical Physics (4-4-4)
MATH 260A. Mathematical Logic I (4)
MATH 260B. Mathematical Logic II (4)
MATH 261A. Probabilistic Combinatorics and Algorithms (4)
MATH 261B. Probabilistic Combinatorics and Algorithms II (4)
MATH 261C. Probabilistic Combinatorics and Algorithms III (4)
MATH 262A. Topics in Combinatorial Mathematics (4)
MATH 262B. Further Topics in Combinatorial Mathematics (4)
MATH 264A-B-C. Combinatorics (4-4-4)
MATH 267A. Topics in Mathematical Logic (4)
MATH 267B. Further Topics in Mathematical Logic (4)
MATH 268. Seminar in Logic (1)
MATH 269. Seminar in Combinatorics (1)
MATH 270A. Numerical Linear Algebra (4)
MATH 270B. Numerical Approximation and Nonlinear Equations (4)
MATH 270C. Numerical Ordinary Differential Equations (4)
MATH 271A-B-C. Numerical Optimization (4-4-4)
MATH 272A. Numerical Partial Differential Equations I (4)
MATH 272B. Numerical Partial Differential Equations II (4)
MATH 272C. Numerical Partial Differential Equations III (4)
MATH 273A. Advanced Techniques in Computational Mathematics I (4)
MATH 273B. Advanced Techniques in Computational Mathematics II (4)
MATH 273C. Advanced Techniques in Computational Mathematics III (4)
MATH 274. Numerical Methods for Physical Modeling (4)
MATH 275. Numerical Methods for Partial Differential Equations (4)
MATH 276. Numerical Analysis in Multiscale Biology (4)
MATH 277A. Topics in Computational and Applied Mathematics (4)
MATH 278A. Seminar in Computational and Applied Mathematics (1)
MATH 278B. Seminar in Mathematical Physics/PDE (1)
MATH 279. Projects in Computational and Applied Mathematics (4)
MATH 280A-B-C. Probability Theory (4-4-4)
MATH 281A. Mathematical Statistics (4)
MATH 281B. Mathematical Statistics (4)
MATH 281C. Mathematical Statistics (4)
MATH 282A. Applied Statistics I (4)
MATH 282B. Applied Statistics II (4)
MATH 283. Statistical Methods in Bioinformatics (4)
MATH 284. Survival Analysis (4)
MATH 285. Stochastic Processes (4)
MATH 286. Stochastic Differential Equations (4)
MATH 287A. Time Series Analysis (4)
MATH 287B. Multivariate Analysis (4)
MATH 287C. Advanced Time Series Analysis (4)
MATH 287D. Statistical Learning (4)
MATH 288. Seminar in Probability and Statistics (1)
MATH 289A. Topics in Probability and Statistics (4)
MATH 289B. Further Topics in Probability and Statistics (4)
MATH 289C. Exploratory Data Analysis and Inference (4)
MATH 290A-B-C. Topology (4-4-4)
MATH 291A. Topics in Topology (4)
MATH 291B. Further Topics in Topology (4)
MATH 292. Seminar in Topology (1)
MATH 294. The Mathematics of Finance (4)
MATH 295. Special Topics in Mathematics (1 to 4)
MATH 296. Graduate Student Colloquium (1)
MATH 297. Mathematics Graduate Research Internship (2–4)
MATH 299. Reading and Research (1 to 12)
MATH 500. Apprentice Teaching (1 to 4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/MSED.html
MSED 290. Issues in Science Education Research (4)
MSED 294. Teaching Practicum (4)
MSED 295. MSED Orientation Practicum (1–3)
MSED 296A. Theories and Applications of Mathematics and Science Education (4)
MSED 296B. Theories and Applications of Mathematics and Science Education (4)
MSED 296C. Theories and Applications of Mathematics and Science Education (4)
MSED 297. Special Topics in Math and Science Education (1–4)
MSED 298. Research Project (2–12)
MSED 299. Reading and Research (1–12)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/MCWP.html
MUIR 1. First Year Experience (2)
MUIR 2. Transfer Year Experience (2)
MUIR 199. Muir Special Project (4–16)
MCWP 40. Critical Writing (4)
MCWP 50. Critical Writing (4)
MCWP 125. Argument and Analysis (4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/MUS.html
MUS 1A. Fundamentals of Music A (4)
MUS 1B. Fundamentals of Music B (4)
MUS 1C. Fundamentals of Music C (4)
MUS 2A-B-C. Basic Musicianship (4-4-4)
MUS 2AK-BK-CK. Basic Keyboard (2-2-2)
MUS 2JK. Jazz Keyboard (2)
MUS 4. Introduction to Western Music (4)
MUS 5. Sound in Time (4)
MUS 6. Electronic Music (4)
MUS 7. Music, Science, and Computers (4)
MUS 8. American Music (4)
MUS 9. Symphony (4)
MUS 11. Folk Music (4)
MUS 12. Opera (4)
MUS 13. Worlds of Music (4)
MUS 14. Contemporary Music (4)
MUS 15. Popular Music (4)
MUS 16. The Beatles (4)
MUS 17. Hip-Hop (4)
MUS 18. Klezmer Music (4)
MUS 20. Exploring the Musical Mind (4)
MUS 32. Instrumental/Vocal Instruction (2)
MUS 32G. Group Instrumental Instruction (2)
MUS 32V. Vocal Instruction (1)
MUS 32VM. Vocal Master Class (1)
MUS 33A. Introduction to Composition I (4)
MUS 33B. Introduction to Composition II (4)
MUS 33C. Introduction to Composition III (4)
MUS 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
MUS 95. Ensemble Performance (2)
VIS 41. Design Communication (4)
MUS 101A. Music Theory and Practice I (4)
MUS 101B. Music Theory and Practice II (4)
MUS 101C. Music Theory and Practice III (4)
MUS 102A. Music Theory and Practice IV (4)
MUS 102B. Music Theory and Practice V (4)
MUS 102C. Music Theory and Practice VI (4)
MUS 103A. Seminar in Composition I (4)
MUS 103B. Seminar in Composition II (4)
MUS 103C. Seminar in Composition III (4)
MUS 103D-E-F. Honors Seminar in Composition (4-4-4)
MUS 104. Jazz Transcription and Analysis (4)
MUS 105. Jazz Composition (4)
MUS 107. Critical Studies Seminar (4)
MUS 110. Introduction to Ethnomusicology Seminar (4)
MUS 111. Topics/World Music Traditions (4)
MUS 112. Topics in European Music Before 1750 (4)
MUS 113. Topics in Classic, Romantic, and Modern Music (4)
MUS 114. Music of the Twentieth Century (4)
MUS 115. Women in Music (4)
MUS 116. Popular Music Studies Seminar (4)
MUS 120A. History of Music in Western Culture I (4)
MUS 120B. History of Music in Western Culture II (4)
MUS 120C. History of Music in Western Culture III (4)
MUS 126. Blues: An Oral Tradition (4)
MUS 127A. Jazz Roots and Early Development (1900–1943) (4)
MUS 127B. Jazz Since 1946: Freedom and Form (4)
MUS 128. Principles and Practice of Conducting (4)
MUS 130. Chamber Music Performance (2–4/0)
MUS 131. Advanced Improvisation Performance (4/0)
MUS 132. Proseminar in Music Performance (4)
MUS 132C. Vocal Coaching (4)
MUS 132R. Recital Preparation (4)
MUS 132V. Proseminar in Vocal Instruction (3)
MUS 133. Projects in New Music Performance (4)
MUS 134. Symphonic Orchestra (4)
MUS 137A. Jazz Theory and Improvisation (4)
MUS 137B. Jazz Theory and Improvisation (4)
MUS 137C. Jazz Theory and Improvisation (4)
MUS 137D. Seminar in Jazz Studies I (4)
MUS 137E. Seminar in Jazz Studies II (4)
MUS 137F. Seminar in Jazz Studies III (4)
MUS 143. Department Seminar (1)
MUS 150. Jazz and the Music of the African Diaspora: Special Topics Seminar (4)
MUS 151. Race, Culture, and Social Change (4)
MUS 152. Hip Hop: The Politics of Culture (4)
MUS 153. African Americans and the Mass Media (4)
MUS 154. Black Music/Black Texts: Communication and Cultural Expression (4)
MUS 170. Musical Acoustics (4)
MUS 171. Computer Music I (4)
MUS 172. Computer Music II (4)
MUS 173. Electronic Music Production and Composition (4)
MUS 174A. Audio/MlDI Studio Techniques I (4)
MUS 174B. Audio/MlDI Studio Techniques II (4)
MUS 174C. Audio/MlDI Studio Techniques III (4)
MUS 175. Musical Psychoacoustics (4)
MUS 176. Music Technology Seminar (4)
MUS 177. Music Programming (4)
MUS 192. Senior Seminar in Music (1)
MUS 195. Instructional Assistance (2)
MUS 198. Directed Group Study (1–4)
MUS 199. Independent Study (1–4)
VIS 140. Digital Imaging: Image and Interactivity (4)
VIS 145A. Time- and Process-Based Digital Media I (4)
MUS 170. Musical Acoustics (4)
ICAM 110. Computing in the Arts: Current Practice (4)
ICAM 120. Virtual Environments (4)
VIS 149. Seminar in Contemporary Computer Topics (4)
VIS 159. History of Art and Technology (4)
ICAM 160A. Senior Projects in Computer Arts I (4)
ICAM 160B. Senior Projects in Computer Arts II (4)
192. Senior Seminar in Music (1)
ICAM 199. Special Studies (2/4)
MUS 200. Contemporary Chamber Opera Performance (4)
MUS 201A-B-C-D-E-F. Projects in New Music Performance (1–4, 1–4, 1–4, 1–4, 1–4, 1–4)
MUS 202. Advanced Projects in Performance (1–4)
MUS 203A. Advanced Projects in Composition (6)
MUS 203B. Advanced Projects in Composition (6)
MUS 203C. Advanced Projects in Composition (6)
MUS 203D. Advanced Projects in Composition (1–4)
MUS 204. Focus on Composition (2)
MUS 205. Focus on Integrative Studies (2)
MUS 206. Experimental Studies Seminar (4)
MUS 207. Theoretical Studies Seminar (4)
MUS 209. Advanced Music Theory and Practice (4)
MUS 210. Musical Analysis (4)
MUS 211. Introduction to Ethnomusicology (2)
MUS 212. Introduction to System Inquiry (2)
MUS 213. Introduction to Critical Studies (2)
MUS 214. Introduction to Creative Practices (2)
MUS 228. Conducting (4)
MUS 229. Seminar in Orchestration (4)
MUS 230. Chamber Music Performance (4)
MUS 232. Proseminar in Music Performance (1–4)
MUS 234. Symphonic Orchestra (4)
MUS 245. Focus on Performance (2)
MUS 251. Integrative Studies Seminar in Ethnomusicology (4)
MUS 252. Integrative Studies Seminar in Systems Inquiry (4)
MUS 253. Integrative Studies Seminar in Critical Studies (4)
MUS 254. Integrative Studies Seminar in Creative Practice (4)
MUS 267. Advanced Music Technology Seminar (4)
MUS 270A. Digital Audio Processing (4)
MUS 270B. Musical Cognitive Science (4)
MUS 270C. Compositional Algorithms (4)
MUS 270D. Advanced Projects in Computer Music (4)
MUS 271A. Survey of Electronic Music Techniques I (4)
MUS 271B. Survey of Electronic Music Techniques II (4)
MUS 271C. Survey of Electronic Music Techniques III (4)
MUS 272. Seminar in Live Computer Music (4)
MUS 296. Directed Group Research in Performance (4)
MUS 298. Directed Research (1–4)
MUS 299. Advanced Research Projects and Independent Study (1–12)
MUS 500. Apprentice Teaching (1–4)
MUS 501. Apprentice Teaching—Nondepartmental (4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/NEU.html
NEU 199. Independent Research (2 or 4)
NEU 200A-B-C. Basic Neuroscience (4-4-4)
NEU 210. Neurobiology Boot Camp (4)
NEU 221. Advanced Topics in Neurosciences (2)
NEU 225. Statistical Methods and Experimental Design (2)
NEU 241. Ethics and Survival Skills in Academia (3)
NEU 243. Physiological Basis of Human Information (2)
NEU 259. Workshop in Electron Microscopy (4)
NEU 260. Light and Electron Microscopy of Cells and Tissue (4)
NEU 265. Mechanisms of Pain (2)
NEU 266. Development of Neural Circuits (4)
NEU 268. Molecular and Cellular Neurobiology (4)
NEU 270. Neurobiology of Disease (4)
NEU 276. Neuroscience Research Rounds (1)
NEU 277. Neuropsychopharmacology (4)
NEU 280. Minor Proposition (4)
NEU 285. Clinical Trails: Issues and Dilemmas in Clinical Trials (2)
NEU 296. Neurosciences Research Rotation (1–12)
NEU 298. Neurosciences Independent Study Project (ISP) (1–12)
NEU 299. Neurosciences Research (1–12)
NEU 401. Neurology General Clinical Selective Clerkship (7)
NEU 426. Subintern Pediatric Neurology (7)
NEU 427. Neurology Outpatient (7)
NEU 496. Clinical Independent Study (1–21)
NEU 500. Apprenticeship Teaching (1–4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/PHIL.html
PHIL 1. Introduction to Philosophy (4)
PHIL 10. Introduction to Logic (4)
PHIL 12. Scientific Reasoning (4)
PHIL 13. Introduction to Philosophy: Ethics (4)
PHIL 14. Introduction to Philosophy: The Nature of Reality (4)
PHIL 15. Introduction to Philosophy: Knowledge and Its Limits (4)
PHIL 25. Science, Philosophy, and the Big Questions (4)
PHIL 26.  Science, Society, and Values (4)
PHIL 27. Ethics and Society (4)
PHIL 28. Ethics and Society II (4)
PHIL 31. Introduction to Ancient Philosophy (4)
PHIL 32. Philosophy and the Rise of Modern Science (4)
PHIL 33. Philosophy between Reason and Despair (4)
PHIL 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
PHIL 90. Basic Problem in Philosophy (4)
PHIL 100. Plato (4)
PHIL 101. Aristotle (4)
PHIL 102. Hellenistic Philosophy (4)
PHIL 105. The Empiricists (4)
PHIL 106. Kant (4)
PHIL 107. Hegel (4)
PHIL 108. Nineteenth-Century Philosophy (4)
PHIL 109. History of Analytic Philosophy (4)
PHIL 110. History of Philosophy: Ancient (4)
PHIL 111. History of Philosophy: Early Modern (4)
PHIL 112. History of Philosophy: Late Modern (4)
PHIL 115. Philosophical Methods Seminar (4)
PHIL 120. Symbolic Logic I (4)
PHIL 122. Advanced Topics in Logic (4)
PHIL 123. Philosophy of Logic (4)
PHIL 124. Philosophy of Mathematics (4)
PHIL 130. Metaphysics (4)
PHIL 131. Topics in Metaphysics (4)
PHIL 132. Epistemology (4)
PHIL 134. Philosophy of Language (4)
PHIL 136. Philosophy of Mind (4)
PHIL 137. Moral Psychology (4)
PHIL 138.  Responsibility (4)
PHIL 139. Global Justice (4)
PHIL 145. Philosophy of Science (4)
PHIL 146. Philosophy of Physics (4)
PHIL 147. Philosophy of Biology (4)
PHIL 148. Philosophy and the Environment (4)
PHIL 149. Philosophy of Psychology (4)
PHIL 150. Philosophy of the Cognitive Sciences (4)
PHIL 151. Philosophy of Neuroscience (4)
PHIL 152. Philosophy of Social Science (4)
PHIL 160. Ethical Theory (4)
PHIL 161. Topics in the History of Ethics (4)
PHIL 162. Contemporary Moral Issues (4)
PHIL 163. Biomedical Ethics (4)
PHIL 164. Technology and Human Values (4)
PHIL 165. Freedom, Equality, and the Law (4)
PHIL 166. Classics in Political Philosophy (4)
PHIL 167. Contemporary Political Philosophy (4)
PHIL 168. Philosophy of Law (4)
PHIL 169. Feminism and Philosophy (4)
PHIL 170. Philosophy and Race (4)
PHIL 173. Topics in Bioethics (4)
PHIL 175. Aesthetics (4)
PHIL 177. Philosophy and Literature (4)
PHIL 178. Topics in German Philosophy Translation—Intermediate (2)
PHIL 179. Topics in German Philosophy Translation—Advanced (2)
PHIL 180. Phenomenology (4)
PHIL 181. Existentialism (4)
PHIL 183. Topics in Continental Philosophy (4)
PHIL 185. Philosophy of Religion (4)
PHIL 191A. Philosophy Honors (4)
PHIL 191B. The Honors Essay (4)
PHIL 195. Introduction to Teaching Philosophy (4)
PHIL 199. Directed Individual Study (4)
PHIL 200. Proseminar (4)
PHIL 201A. Core Course in History (4)
PHIL 202. Core Course in Ethics (4)
PHIL 204A. Core Course in Philosophy of Science (4)
PHIL 205A. Core Course in Metaphysics (4)
PHIL 206A. Core Course in Epistemology (4)
PHIL 207. Core Course in Philosophy of Mind (4)
PHIL 208. Core Course in Philosophy of Language (4)
PHIL 209A. Introduction to Science Studies (4)
PHIL 209B. Seminar in Science Studies (4)
PHIL 209C. Colloquium in Science Studies (4)
PHIL 209D. Advanced Approaches to Science Studies (4)
PHIL 210. Greek Philosophy (4)
PHIL 214. Early Modern Philosophy (4)
PHIL 215. Eighteenth-Century Philosophy (4)
PHIL 218. Contemporary Analytical Philosophy (4)
PHIL 230. Metaphysics (4)
PHIL 232. Epistemology (4)
PHIL 234. Philosophy of Language (4)
PHIL 236. Philosophy of Mind (4)
PHIL 245. Philosophy of Science (4)
PHIL 250A. Philosophy of the Cognitive Sciences (4)
PHIL 260. Ethics (4)
PHIL 267. Political Philosophy (4)
PHIL 275. German Philosophy Reading Group (1–2)
PHIL 276. German Translation Workshop (1–2)
PHIL 277. Phenomenology Reading Group (1–2)
PHIL 278. Topics and Methods in Contemporary Philosophy (1–2)
PHIL 280. Philosophy of Science Topics and Methods (1–2)
PHIL 281. History of Philosophy Research and Methods (1–2)
PHIL 282. Topics and Methods in Ethics (1–2)
PHIL 284. Philosophy of Biology Research Group (1–2)
PHIL 285. Seminar on Special Topics (4)
PHIL 286. Philosophy of Physics Reading Group (1–2)
PHIL 287. Greek Reading Group (1–2)
PHIL 288. Latin Reading Group (1–2)
PHIL 290. Directed Independent Study (4)
PHIL 292. Writing Workshop (1–3)
PHIL 295. Research Topics (1–12)
PHIL 299. Thesis Research (1–12)
PHIL 500. Apprentice Teaching (1–4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/PHYS.html
PHYS 1A. Mechanics (3)
PHYS 1AL. Mechanics Laboratory (2)
PHYS 1B. Electricity and Magnetism (3)
PHYS 1BL. Electricity and Magnetism Laboratory (2)
PHYS 1C. Waves, Optics, and Modern Physics (3)
PHYS 1CL. Waves, Optics, and Modern Physics Laboratory (2)
PHYS 2A. Physics—Mechanics (4)
PHYS 2B. Physics—Electricity and Magnetism (4)
PHYS 2BL. Physics Laboratory—Mechanics (2)
PHYS 2C. Physics—Fluids, Waves, Thermodynamics, and Optics (4)
PHYS 2CL. Physics Laboratory—Electricity and Magnetism (2)
PHYS 2D. Physics—Relativity and Quantum Physics (4)
PHYS 2DL. Physics Laboratory—Modern Physics (2)
PHYS 4A. Physics for Physics Majors—Mechanics (4)
PHYS 4B. Physics for Physics Majors—Fluids, Waves, and Heat (4)
PHYS 4C. Physics for Physics Majors—Electricity and Magnetism (4)
PHYS 4D. Physics for Physics Majors—Electromagnetic Waves, Optics, and Special Relativity (4)
PHYS 4E. Physics for Physics Majors—Quantum Physics (4)
PHYS 5. Stars and Black Holes (4)
PHYS 7. Galaxies and Cosmology (4)
PHYS 8. Physics of Everyday Life (4)
PHYS 9. The Solar System (4)
PHYS 10. Concepts in Physics (4)
PHYS 11. Survey of Physics (4)
PHYS 12. Energy and the Environment (4)
PHYS 13. Life in the Universe (4)
PHYS 30. Poetry for Physicists (4)
PHYS 87. Freshman Seminar in Physics and Astrophysics (1)
PHYS 98. Directed Group Study (2)
PHYS 99. Independent Study (2)
PHYS 100A. Electromagnetism I (4)
PHYS 100B. Electromagnetism II (4)
PHYS 100C. Electromagnetism III (4)
PHYS 105A. Mathematical and Computational Physics I (4)
PHYS 105B. Mathematical and Computational Physics II (4)
PHYS 110A. Mechanics I (4)
PHYS 110B. Mechanics II (4)
PHYS 111. Introduction to Ocean Waves (4)
PHYS 120. Circuits and Electronics (5)
PHYS 122. Experimental Techniques (4)
PHYS 124. Laboratory Projects (4)
PHYS 130A. Quantum Physics I (4)
PHYS 130B. Quantum Physics II (4)
PHYS 130C. Quantum Physics III (4)
PHYS 133. Condensed Matter/Materials Science Laboratory (4)
PHYS 137. String Theory (4)
PHYS 139. Physics Special Topics (4)
PHYS 140A. Statistical and Thermal Physics I (4)
PHYS 140B. Statistical and Thermal Physics II (4)
PHYS 141. Computational Physics I: Probabilistic Models and Simulations (4)
PHYS 142. Computational Physics II: PDE and Matrix Models (4)
PHYS 151. Elementary Plasma Physics (4)
PHYS 152A. Condensed Matter Physics (4)
PHYS 152B. Electronic Materials (4)
PHYS 154. Elementary Particle Physics (4)
PHYS 160. Stellar Astrophysics (4)
PHYS 161. Black Holes (4)
PHYS 162. Cosmology (4)
PHYS 163. Galaxies and Quasars (4)
PHYS 164. Observational Astrophysics Research Lab (4)
PHYS 170. Medical Instruments: Principles and Practice (4)
PHYS 173. Modern Physics Laboratory: Biological and Quantum Physics (4)
PHYS 175. Biological Physics (4)
PHYS 176. Quantitative Molecular Biology (4)
PHYS 177. Physics of the Cell (4)
PHYS 178. Biophysics of Neurons and Networks (4)
PHYS 191. Undergraduate Seminar on Physics (1)
PHYS 192. Senior Seminar in Physics (1)
PHYS 198. Directed Group Study (2 or 4)
PHYS 199. Research for Undergraduates (2 or 4)
PHYS 199H. Honors Thesis Research for Undergraduates (2-4)
PHYS 200A. Theoretical Mechanics I (4)
PHYS 200B. Theoretical Mechanics II (4)
PHYS 201. Mathematical Physics (5)
PHYS 203A. Advanced Classical Electrodynamics I (5)
PHYS 203B. Advanced Classical Electrodynamics II (4)
PHYS 210A. Equilibrium Statistical Mechanics (5)
PHYS 210B. Nonequilibrium Statistical Mechanics (4)
PHYS 211A. Solid-State Physics I (5)
PHYS 211B. Solid-State Physics II (4)
PHYS 212A. Quantum Mechanics I (4)
PHYS 212B. Quantum Mechanics II (4)
PHYS 212C. Quantum Mechanics III (4)
PHYS 214. Physics of Elementary Particles (4)
PHYS 215A. Particles and Fields I (4)
PHYS 215B. Particles and Fields II (4)
PHYS 215C. Particles and Fields III (4)
PHYS 217. Field Theory and the Renormalization Group (4)
PHYS 218A. Plasma Physics I (4)
PHYS 218B. Plasma Physics II (4)
PHYS 218C. Plasma Physics III (4)
PHYS 219. Condensed Matter/Materials Science Laboratory (4)
PHYS 220. Group Theoretical Methods in Physics (4)
PHYS 221A. Nonlinear and Nonequilibrium Dynamics of Physical Systems (4)
PHYS 222A. Elementary Particle Physics (4)
PHYS 223. Stellar Structure and Evolution (4)
PHYS 224. Physics of the Interstellar Medium (4)
PHYS 225A-B. General Relativity (4-4)
PHYS 226. Galaxies and Galactic Dynamics (4)
PHYS 227. Cosmology (4)
PHYS 228. High-Energy Astrophysics and Compact Objects (4)
PHYS 230. Advanced Solid-State Physics (4)
PHYS 232. Electronic Materials (4)
PHYS 235. Nonlinear Plasma Theory (4)
PHYS 238. Observational Astrophysics Research Lab (4)

PHYS 239. Special Topics (4)
PHYS 241. Computational Physics I: Probabilistic Models and Simulations (4)
PHYS 242. Computational Physics II: PDE and Matrix Models (4)
PHYS 243. Stochastic Methods (4)
PHYS 244. Parallel Computing in Science and Engineering (4)
PHYS 250. Condensed Matter Physics Seminar (0-1)
PHYS 251. High-Energy Physics Seminar (0-1)
PHYS 252. Plasma Physics Seminar (0-1)
PHYS 253. Astrophysics and Space Physics Seminar (0-1)
PHYS 254. Biophysics Seminar (1)
PHYS 255. Biophysics Research Talks (1)
PHYS 256. Critical Reading in Quantitative Biology (1)
PHYS 257. High-Energy Physics Special Topics Seminar (0-1)
PHYS 258. Astrophysics and Space Physics Special Topics Seminar (0-1)
PHYS 260. Physics Colloquium (0-1)
PHYS 261. Seminar on Physics Research at UC San Diego (0-1)
PHYS 264. Scientific Method Seminar (1)
PHYS 270A. Experimental Techniques for Quantitative Biology (4)
PHYS 270B. Quantitative Biology Laboratory (4)
PHYS 273. Information Theory and Pattern Formation in Biological Systems (4)
PHYS 274. Stochastic Processes in Population Genetics (4)
PHYS 275. Fundamentals of Biological Physics (4)
PHYS 276. Quantitative Molecular Biology (4)
PHYS 277. Physics of the Cell (4)
PHYS 278. Biophysics of Neurons and Networks (4)
PHYS 279. Neurodynamics (4)
PHYS 281. Extensions in Physics (1-3)
PHYS 295. MS Thesis Research in Materials Physics (1-12)
PHYS 297. Special Studies in Physics (1-4)
PHYS 298. Directed Study in Physics (1-12)
PHYS 299. Thesis Research in Physics (1-12)
PHYS 500. Instruction in Physics Teaching (1-4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/POLI.html
POLI 10 or 10D. Introduction to Political Science: American Politics (4)
POLI 11 or 11D. Introduction to Political Science: Comparative Politics (4)
POLI 12 or 12D. Introduction to Political Science: International Relations (4)
POLI 13 or 13D. Power and Justice (4)
POLI 27. Ethics and Society (4)
POLI 28. Ethics and Society II (4)
POLI 30 or 30D. Political Inquiry (4)
POLI 40. Introduction to Law and Society (4)
POLI 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
POLI 90. Undergraduate Seminar (4)
POLI 99H. Independent Study (1)
POLI 100A. The Presidency (4)
POLI 100B. The US Congress (4)
POLI 100C. American Political Parties (4)
POLI 100DA. Voting, Campaigning, and Elections (4)
POLI 100E. Interest Group Politics (4)
POLI 100F. Social Networks (4)
POLI 100G. How to Win or Lose an Election (4)
POLI 100H. Race and Ethnicity in American Politics (4)
POLI 100J. Race in American Political Development (4)
POLI 100M. Political Psychology (4)
POLI 100O. Perspectives on Race (4)
POLI 100Q. Advanced Topics in Racial Politics (4)
POLI 100T. Business and Politics (4)
POLI 100U. Games, Strategy, and Politics (4)
POLI 102C. American Political Development (4)
POLI 102D. Voting Rights Act: Fifty Years Later (4)
POLI 102E. Urban Politics (4)
POLI 102F. Mass Media and Politics (4)
POLI 102G. Special Topics in American Politics (4)
POLI 102J. Advanced Topics in Urban Politics (4)
POLI 102JJ. Field Research in Urban Politics (2)
POLI 102K. The Urban Underclass (4)
POLI 102L. The Politics of Regulation (4)
POLI 103A. California Government and Politics (4)
POLI 103B. Politics and Policymaking in Los Angeles (4)
POLI 103C. Politics and Policymaking in San Diego (4)
POLI 104A. The Supreme Court and the Constitution (4)
POLI 104B. Civil Liberties—Fundamental Rights (4)
POLI 104C. Civil Liberties—The Rights of the Accused and Minorities (4)
POLI 104D. Judicial Politics (4)
POLI 104E. Environmental Law and Policy (4)
POLI 104F. Seminar in Constitutional Law (4)
POLI 104G. Election Law (4)
POLI 104I. Law and Politics—Courts and Political Controversy (4)
POLI 104L. Positive Political Theory of Law (4)
POLI 104M. Law and Sex (4)
POLI 104N. Race and Law (4)
POLI 105A. Latino Politics in the U.S. (4)
POLI 108. Politics of Multiculturalism (4)
POLI 110A. Citizens and Saints: Political Thought from Plato to Augustine (4)
POLI 110B. Sovereigns, Subjects, and the Modern State: Political Thought from Machiavelli to Rousseau (4)
POLI 110C. Revolution and Reaction: Political Thought from Kant to Nietzsche (4)
POLI 110DA. Freedom and Discipline: Political Thought in the Twentieth Century (4)
POLI 110EA. American Political Thought from Revolution to Civil War (4)
POLI 110EB. American Political Thought from Civil War to Civil Rights (4)
POLI 110EC. American Political Thought: Contemporary Debates (4)
POLI 110ED. Seminar in American Political Thought (4)
POLI 110G. International Political Thought (4)
POLI 110H. Democracy and Its Critics (4)
POLI 110J. Power in American Society (4)
POLI 110K. Liberty and Equality (4)
POLI 110M. Green Political Thought (4)
POLI 110T. Modern Political Ideologies (4)
POLI 111B. Global Justice in Theory and Action (4)
POLI 111D. Social Norms and Global Development (4)
POLI 112A. Economic Theories of Political Behavior (4)
POLI 112C. Political Theory and Artistic Vision (4)
POLI 113A. East Asian Thought in Comparative Perspective (4)
POLI 113B. Chinese and Japanese Political Thought I (4)
POLI 113C. Chinese and Japanese Political Thought II (4)
POLI 114B. Marxist Political Thought (4)
POLI 115A. Gender and Politics (4)
POLI 116A. Feminist Theory (4)
POLI 119A. Special Topics in Political Theory (4)
POLI 120A. Political Development of Western Europe (4)
POLI 120B. The German Political System (4)
POLI 120C. Politics in France (4)
POLI 120D. Germany: Before, During, and After Division (4)
POLI 120E. Scandinavian Politics (4)
POLI 120G. British Politics (4)
POLI 120H. European Integration (4)
POLI 120I. Politics in Italy (4)
POLI 120N. Contention and Conflict in Africa (4)
POLI 120P. Africa’s Success Stories (4)
POLI 120Q. Ethnic Politics (4)
POLI 121. Government and Politics of the Middle East (4)
POLI 121B. Politics in Israel (4)
POLI 122. Politics of Human Rights (4)
POLI 122D. Abuse of Power (4)
POLI 123. Politics of Empire in Comparative Perspective (4)
POLI 124. Israeli-Palestinian Conflict (4)
POLI 124A. Political Consequences of Electoral Systems (4)
POLI 125. Gender, Politics, and Globalization (4)
POLI 125A. Communities and the Environment (4)
POLI 125B. The Politics of Food in a Global Economy (4)
POLI 126. Political Economy of Development (4)
POLI 126AA. Fundamentals of Political Economy: Modern Capitalism (4)
POLI 126AB. Politics and Economics in Eastern Europe (4)
POLI 127. Politics of Developing Countries (4)
POLI 128. Autocracy, Democracy, and Prosperity (4)
POLI 129. How to Steal an Election (4)
POLI 130AD. The Politics of the Russian Revolution (4)
POLI 130B. Politics in the People’s Republic of China (4)
POLI 131. Muslim Integration and Exclusion (4)
POLI 131C. The Chinese Revolution (4)
POLI 132. Political Development and Modern China (4)
POLI 133A. Japanese Politics: A Developmental Perspective (4)
POLI 133D. Political Institutions of East Asian Countries (4)
POLI 133G. Postwar US-Japan Relations (4)
POLI 133J. Korean Politics (4)
POLI 134AA. Comparative Politics of Latin America (4)
POLI 134B. Politics in Mexico (4)
POLI 134D. Selected Topics in Latin American Politics (4)
POLI 134I. Politics in the Southern Cone of Latin America (4)
POLI 136. Religion and Politics (4)
POLI 136A. Nationalism and Ethnic Conflict (4)
POLI 137A. Comparative Political Parties and Interest Groups (4)
POLI 138D. Special Topics in Comparative Politics (4)
POLI 140A. International Law (4)
POLI 140B. Concepts and Aspects of Revolution (4)
POLI 140C. International Crisis Diplomacy (4)
POLI 140D. International Human Rights Law: Migrant Populations (4)
POLI 142A. United States Foreign Policy (4)
POLI 142D. Weapons of Mass Destruction (4)
POLI 142I. National and International Security (4)
POLI 142J. National Security Strategy (4)
POLI 142K. Politics and Warfare (4)
POLI 142L. Insurgency and Terrorism (4)
POLI 142M. US Foreign Policy/Regional Security (4)
POLI 142N. American Defense Policy (4)
POLI 142Q. Cold War (4)
POLI 143A. War and Society (4)
POLI 144. International Political Economy (4)
POLI 144AB. Selected Topics in International Political Economy (4)
POLI 144D. International Political Economy: Money and Finance (4)
POLI 144F. The Politics of International Trade and Finance (4)
POLI 145A. International Politics and Drugs (4)
POLI 145C. International Relations After the Cold War: Theory and Prospect (4)
POLI 146A. The U.S. and Latin America: Political and Economic Relations (4)
POLI 147B. Russian-American Relations (4)
POLI 150A. Politics of Immigration (4)
POLI 151. International Organizations (4)
POLI 153. The European Union in World Politics (4)
POLI 154. Special Topics in International Relations (4)
POLI 160AA. Introduction to Policy Analysis (4)
POLI 160AB. Introduction to Policy Analysis (4)
POLI 162. Environmental Policy (4)
POLI 163. Analyzing Politics (4)
POLI 165. Special Topic: Policy Analysis (4)
POLI 168. Policy Assessment (4)
POLI 170A. Introductory Statistics for Political Science and Public Policy (4)
POLI 191A–B. Senior Honors Seminar: Frontiers of Political Science (4-4)
POLI 192. Senior Seminar in Political Science (1)
POLI 194. Research Seminar in Washington, DC (4)
POLI 194RA. Research Apprenticeship Seminar (4)
POLI 194SD. Local Internship Research Seminar (4)
POLI 195. Apprentice Teaching (4)
POLI 197I. Political Science Washington Internship (6, 8)
POLI 197SD. Local Internship in Political Science (4)
POLI 198. Directed Group Study (2-4)
POLI 198RA. Research Apprenticeship (4)
POLI 199. Independent Study for Undergraduates (2 or 4)
POLI 200A. Foundations of Political Science (4)
POLI 200B. Democracy (4)
POLI 200C. States and Markets (4)
POLI 204A. Research Design (4)
POLI 204B. Quantitative Methods I (4)
POLI 204C. Game Theory 1 (4)
POLI 205. Game Theory II (4)
POLI 210AA. Systems of Political Thought: Thucydides to Rousseau (4)
POLI 210AB. Systems of Political Thought: Kant to Rawls (4)
POLI 212. Contemporary Sociological Theory (4)
POLI 213. Culture and Political Theory (4) 
POLI 214. Marxist and Post-Marxist Political Philosophy (4)
POLI 216. Contemporary Liberal and Democratic Theory (4)
POLI 219. Special Topics in Political Theory (4)
POLI 220A. Comparative Politics: State and Society (4)
POLI 220B. Comparative Politics: Institutions (4)
POLI 220C. Origins of the State (4)
POLI 223A. Comparative Parliamentary Studies (4)
POLI 224. The Politics of Democratization (4)
POLI 224A. Elections in Consolidating Democracies (4)
POLI 227. Comparative Political Economy (4)
POLI 229. Special Topics in Comparative Politics (4)
POLI 231E. Politics of Development (4)
POLI 232. International Organization (4) 
POLI 235A. Latin American Politics (4)
POLI 236. Immigration Policy and Politics (4)
POLI 240. International Relations Theory (4)
POLI 242. The European Union and Global Governance (4)
POLI 243. International Security (4)
POLI 244. International Institutions (4)
POLI 244A. European Integration (4)
POLI 245. International Political Economy (4)
POLI 245A. Political Economy of Regional Integration (4)
POLI 247A. Quantitative International Relations (4)
POLI 247B. Formal Models in International Relations (4)
POLI 247C. History of International Relations (4)
POLI 248. Special Topics in International Relations (4)
POLI 251. American Political Institutions (4)
POLI 252. American Politics: Behavior (4)
POLI 253. Research in State Politics (4)
POLI 254. American Political Development (4)
POLI 255. Urban Politics (4)
POLI 257. Voting and Elections (4)
POLI 259. Special Topics in American Politics (4)
POLI 270. Mathematical and Statistical Foundations (4)
POLI 271. Advanced Statistical Applications (4)
POLI 272. Bayesian Methods (4)
POLI 275. Interviews, Survey Design, and Sampling (4)
POLI 278. Political Economy Models of Elections (4)
POLI 279. Special Topics in Methodology (4)
POLI 280. Workshop: International Law and Regulation (4)
POLI 281. Workshop: American Politics (4)
POLI 282. Workshop: Comparative Politics (4)              
POLI 283. Workshop: International Relations (4)
POLI 285. Workshop: Political Theory (4) 
POLI 286. Workshop: Methodology (4) 
POLI 287. Multidisciplinary Methods in Political Science: Social Networks (4)
POLI 288. Multidisciplinary Methods in Political Science: Computational Social Science (4)
POLI 289. Multidisciplinary Methods in Political Science: Biology (4)
POLI 298. Directed Reading (1–12)
POLI 299. Dissertation Research (1–12)
POLI 500. Apprentice Teaching (1–4)
POLI 501. Seminar on Teaching Development—American Politics (1–4)
POLI 502. Seminar on Teaching Development—Comparative Politics (1–4)
POLI 504. Seminar on Teaching Development—Political Theory (1–4)
POLI 599. Teaching Methods in Political Science (2)  

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/PSYC.html
PSYC 1. Psychology (4)
PSYC 2. General Psychology: Biological Foundations (4)
PSYC 3. General Psychology: Cognitive Foundations (4)
PSYC 4. General Psychology: Behavioral Foundations (4)
PSYC 6. General Psychology: Social Foundations (4)
PSYC 7. General Psychology: Developmental Foundations (4)
PSYC 60. Introduction to Statistics (4)
PSYC 70. Research Methods in Psychology (4)
PSYC 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
PSYC 90. Undergraduate Seminar (1)
PSYC 93. Topics in Psychology (4)
PSYC 99. Independent Study (2 or 4)
PSYC 100. Clinical Psychology (4)
PSYC 101. Developmental Psychology (4)
PSYC 102. Sensory Neuroscience (4)
PSYC 104. Social Psychology (4)
PSYC 105. Cognitive Psychology (4)
PSYC 106. Behavioral Neuroscience (4)
PSYC 108. Cognitive Neuroscience (4)
PSYC 110. Juniors Honors Research Seminars (4)
PSYC 111A. Research Methods I (6)
PSYC 111B. Research Methods II (6)
PSYC 114. Laboratory in Psychophysiological Perspectives on the Social Mind (4)
PSYC 115A. Laboratory in Cognitive Psychology I (4)
PSYC 115B. Laboratory in Cognitive Psychology II (4)
PSYC 116. Laboratory in Clinical Psychology Research (4)
PSYC 117. Psychology Project Laboratory (4)
PSYC 119. Psycholinguistics/Cognition Laboratory (4)
PSYC 120. Learning and Motivation (4)
PSYC 121. Laboratory in Operant Psychology (4)
PSYC 122. Mechanisms of Animal Behavior (4)
PSYC 123. Cognitive Control and Frontal Lobe Function (4)
PSYC 124. Clinical Assessment and Treatment (4)
PSYC 125. Clinical Neuropsychology (4)
PSYC 128. Psychology of Reading (4)
PSYC 129. Logic of Perception (4)
PSYC 130. Delay of Gratification (4)
PSYC 132. Hormones and Behavior (4)
PSYC 133. Circadian Rhythms—Biological Clocks (4)
PSYC 134. Eating Disorders (4)
PSYC 136. Cognitive Development (4)
PSYC 137. Social Cognition (4)
PSYC 138. Sound and Music Perception (4)
PSYC 139. The Social Psychology of Sport (4)
PSYC 140. Human Behavior Laboratory (4)
PSYC 141. Evolution and Human Nature (4)
PSYC 142. Psychology of Consciousness (4)
PSYC 143. Control and Analysis of Human Behavior (4)
PSYC 144. Memory and Amnesia (4)
PSYC 145. Psychology of Language (4)
PSYC 146. Language and Conceptual Development (4)
PSYC 147. Gender (4)
PSYC 148. Psychology of Judgement and Decision (4)
PSYC 150. Cognitive Neuroscience of Vision (4)
PSYC 151. Tests and Measurement (4)
PSYC 152. Conceptions of Intelligence (4)
PSYC 153. Psychology of Emotion (4)
PSYC 154. Behavior Modification (4)
PSYC 155. Social Psychology and Medicine (4)
PSYC 156. Cognitive Development in Infancy (4)
PSYC 157. Happiness (4)
PSYC 158. Interpersonal Relationships (4)
PSYC 159. Physiological Basis of Perception (4)
PSYC 161. Engineering Psychology (4)
PSYC 162. Psychology and the Law (4)
PSYC 164. Criminology (4)
PSYC 166. History of Psychology (4)
PSYC 168. Psychological Disorders of Childhood (4)
PSYC 169. Brain Damage and Mental Functions (4)
PSYC 170. Cognitive Neuropsychology (4)
PSYC 171. Neurobiology of Learning and Memory (4)
PSYC 172. The Psychology of Human Sexuality (4)
PSYC 173. Psychology of Food and Behavior (4)
PSYC 176. Creativity (4)
PSYC 178. Industrial Organizational Psychology (4)
PSYC 179. Drugs, Addiction, and Mental Disorders (4)
PSYC 180. Adolescence (4)
PSYC 181. Drugs and Behavior (4)
PSYC 182. Illusions and the Brain (4)
PSYC 184. Choice and Self-Control (4)
PSYC 187. Development of Social Cognition (4)
PSYC 188. Impulse Control Disorders (4)
PSYC 189. Brain, Behavior, and Evolution (4)
PSYC 190. Parenting (4)
PSYC 191. Psychology of Sleep (4)
PSYC 192. Senior Seminar in Psychology  (1)
PSYC 193. Topics in Psychology (4)
PSYC 194A-B-C. Honors Thesis (4-4-4)
PSYC 195. Instruction in Psychology (4)
PSYC 196A-B-C. Research Seminar (4-4-4)
PSYC 198. Directed Group Study in Psychology (2 or 4)
PSYC 199. Independent Study (2 or 4)
PSYC 201A. Quantitative Methods in Psychology I (6)
PSYC 201B. Quantitative Methods in Psychology II (6)
PSYC 201C. Quantitative Methods in Psychology III (6)
PSYC 202. Writing and Presenting Academic Research Papers (4)
PSYC 205. Emotion (4)
PSYC 206. Mathematical Modeling (4)
PSYC 209. Judgment and Decision Making (4)
PSYC 212. Visual Science (4)
PSYC 213. Professional Procedures and Survival in Psychology (4)
PSYC 217. Proseminar in Developmental Psychology (5)
PSYC 218. Proseminar in Cognitive Psychology (5)
PSYC 220. Proseminar in Social Psychology (5)
PSYC 221. Proseminar in Sensation and Perception (5)
PSYC 222. Proseminar in Biological Psychology (5)
PSYC 223. Current Directions in Vision (1)
PSYC 224. Current Directions in Cognitive Neural Systems (CNS) (1)
PSYC 229. Happiness (4)
PSYC 231. Data Analysis in Matlab (4)
PSYC 232. Probabilistic Models of Cognition (4)
PSYC 233. Learning and Motivation (4)
PSYC 234. Evolution of Language (4)
PSYC 235. Semantic Development (4)
PSYC 236. Substance Abuse (4)
PSYC 237. Human Rationality (4)
PSYC 240. The Primate Brain (4)
PSYC 241. Programming Web-Based Experiments for Psychology Research (4)
PSYC 242. Current Directions in Developmental Psychology (1)
PSYC 243. Sound and Music Perception (4)
PSYC 244. Special Topics in Psycholinguistics (4)
PSYC 246. Emotion and Cognition (4)
PSYC 247. Learning by Thinking in Children (and Adults) (4)
PSYC 249A. Advanced Topics in Applied Behavior Analysis I (1)
PSYC 249B. Advanced Topics in Applied Behavior Analysis II (1)
PSYC 249C. Advanced Topics in Applied Behavior Analysis III (1)
PSYC 251. Advanced Topics in Learning and Motivation (1)
PSYC 252. Cognitive Neuroscience (4)
PSYC 255A. Advanced Topics in Biological Psychology I (1)
PSYC 255B. Advanced Topics in Biological Psychology II (1)
PSYC 255C. Advanced Topics in Biological Psychology III (1)
PSYC 257. Development and Neurobiology of Theory of Mind (4)
PSYC 258. Delay of Gratification (4)
PSYC 260. Language and Conceptual Development (4)
PSYC 262. Functional Construction of the Vertebrate Brain’s Social Behavior Network (4)
PSYC 263. Science of Mindfulness (4)
PSYC 264A. Advanced Topics in Language Processes I (1)
PSYC 264C. Advanced Topics in Language Processes III (1)
PSYC 265. Social Psychology and Medicine (4)
PSYC 266. Psychology of Reading (4)
PSYC 267A. Advanced Topics in Behavior Medicine I (1)
PSYC 267B. Advanced Topics in Behavior Medicine II (1)
PSYC 267C. Advanced Topics in Behavior Medicine III (1)
PSYC 270A. Introduction to Laboratory Experimentation I (4)
PSYC 270B. Introduction to Laboratory Experimentation II (4)
PSYC 270C. Introduction to Laboratory Experimentation III (4)
PSYC 271. Neurobiology of Learning and Memory (4)
PSYC 272. Selected Topics in Cognitive Psychology (3)
PSYC 273. Selected Topics in Quantitative Methods in Psychology (4)
PSYC 274. Current Directions in Social Psychology (1
)
PSYC 275. Current Directions in Cognitive Psychology (1)
PSYC 280. Seminar in Communication and Information Processing (1)
PSYC 282. Auditory Neuroscience (4)
PSYC 296. Research Practicum (1–12)
PSYC 299. Independent Research (1–12)
PSYC 500. Apprentice Teaching (4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/RELI.html
RELI 1. Introduction to Religion (4)
RELI 2. Comparative World Religions (4)
RELI 87. Freshman Seminar in Religion (1)
RELI 101. Tools and Methods in the Study of Religion (4)
RELI 134. Topics in American Religion (4)
RELI 141. Public Sphere and Religion (4)
RELI 143. Topics in Performing Religion (4)
RELI 144. Devils and Demons in Christianity (4)
RELI 145. Communication, Technology, and Religion (4)
RELI 146. Topics in the Religions of Antiquity (4)
RELI 147. Pagan Europe and Its Christian Aftermath (4)
RELI 148. Religion and Women’s Activisms (4)
RELI 149. Islam in America (4)
RELI 150. Religion and Cinema (4)
RELI 151. Deep Ecology: Knowing Place (4)
RELI 188. Special Topics in Religion (4)
RELI 189. Seminar in Religion (4)
RELI 192. Senior Seminar in Religion (1)
RELI 196AH. Honors Thesis in Religion (4)
RELI 196BH. Honors Thesis in Religion (4)
RELI 197. Directed Advanced Readings (4)
RELI 199. Independent Research Study for Undergraduates (2–4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/REV.html
Revelle 1. First Year Experience (2)
Revelle 2. Transfer Year Experience (2)
Revelle 20. Revelle Freshman Honors Program Seminar (0)
Revelle 110. Senior Honors Seminar: Thinking about Science (4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/ERC.html
ERC 1. First Year Experience (2)
ERC 2. Transfer Year Experience (2)
ERC 20. Freshman Honors Seminar: International Themes (1)
ERC 89. Practicum in Math Tutoring (2)
ERC 92. Honors Project (2)
ERC 188. Transfer Seminar: The Research University (1)
ERC 192A. Global Service Research Seminar (2)
ERC 192B. Global Service Research Seminar (2)
ERC 196. Honors Project (4)
ERC 199. ERC Independent Studies (4)
ERC 90. Undergraduate Seminar (1)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/SCIS.html
COGR 225A, HIGR 238, PHIL 209A, SOCG 255A. Introduction to Science Studies (4)
COGR 225B, HIGR 239, PHIL 209B, SOCG 255B. Seminar in Science Studies (4)
COGR 225C, HIGR 240, PHIL 209C, SOCG 255C. Colloquium in Science Studies (4)
COGR 225D, HIGR 241, PHIL 209D, SOCG 255D. Advanced Approaches to Science Studies (4)
HIGR 236A-B. Seminar in History of Science (4-4)
HIGR 242. Topics in the History of Earth and Life Sciences (4)
HISC 160. Historical Approaches to the Study of Science (4)
HISC 161/261. Seminar in Newton and Newtonianism (4)
HISC 163/263. History, Science, and Politics of Climate Change (4)
HISC 164/264. Topics in the History of the Physical Sciences (4)
HISC 165. Topics in Twentieth-Century Science and Culture (4)
HISC 166/266. The Galileo Affair (4)
HISC 167/267. Gender and Science (4)
HISC 170/270. Topics in the History of Science and Technology (4)
HISC 172/272. Building America: Technology, Culture, and the Built Environment in the United States (4)
HISC 180/280. Science and Public Policy (4)
PHIL 204A. Core Course in Philosophy of Science (4)
PHIL 245. Philosophy of Science (4)
PHIL 247. Philosophy of Biology (4)
PHIL 250A. Philosophy of the Cognitive Sciences (4)
PHIL 280. Philosophy of Science Topics and Methods (1–2)
SOCG 234. Intellectual Foundation of the Study of Science, Technology, and Medicine (4)
SOCG 247. Madness and Society (4)
SOCG 249. Technology and the Human (4)
SOCG 284. Contemporary Biomedicine (4)
SOCG 288. Knowledge Capitalism (4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/SIO.html
SIO 1. The Planets (4)
SIO 3. Life in the Oceans (4)
SIO 10. The Earth (4)
SIO 12. History of the Earth and Evolution (4)
SIO 15. Natural Disasters (4)
SIO 16. Geology of the National Parks (4)
SIO 20. The Atmosphere (4)
SIO 25. Climate Change and Society (4)
SIO 30. The Oceans (4)
SIO 35. Water (4)
SIO 40. Life and Climate on Earth (4)
SIO 45. Volcanoes (4)
SIO 50. Introduction to Earth and Environmental Sciences (6)
SIO 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
SIO 90. Undergraduate Seminar (1)
SIO 96. Frontiers in the Earth Sciences (2)
SIO 99. Independent Study (2 or 4)
SIO 100. Introduction to Field Methods (4)
SIO 101. California Coastal Oceanography (4)
SIO 102. Introduction to Geochemistry (4)
SIO 103. Introduction to Geophysics (4)
SIO 104/SIOG 255. Paleobiology and History of Life (6)
SIO 105. Sedimentology and Stratigraphy (4)
SIO 106. Introduction to Hydrogeology (4)
SIO 108. Introduction to Paleoclimatology (4)
SIO 110. Introduction to GIS and GPS for Scientists (4)
SIO 111. Introduction to Ocean Waves (4)
SIO 113. Introduction to Computational Earth Science (4)
SIO 115. Ice and the Climate System (4)
SIO 117. The Physical Basis of Global Warming (4)
SIO 119. Physics and Chemistry of the Oceans (4)
SIO 120. Introduction to Mineralogy (4)
SIO 123. Microbial Environmental Systems Biology (4)
SIO 125. Biomechanics of Marine Life (4)
SIO 126. Marine Microbiology (4)
SIO 126L. Marine Microbiology Laboratory (4)
SIO 127. Marine Molecular Ecology (4)
SIO 128. Microbial Life in Extreme Environments (4)
SIO 129. Marine Chemical Ecology (4)
SIO 130. Scientific Diving (4)
SIO 132. Introduction to Marine Biology (4)
SIO 133. Marine Mammal Biology (4)
SIO 134. Introduction to Biological Oceanography (4)
SIO 135/SIOG 236. Satellite Remote Sensing (4)
SIO 136. Marine Biology Laboratory (6)
SIO 138. The Coral Reef Environment (4)
SIO 139. Current Research in Marine Biology Colloquium (1)
SIO 141/CHEM 174. Chemical Principles of Marine Systems (4)
SIO 143. Ocean Acidification (4)
SIO 144/SIOG 252A. Introduction to Isotope Geochemistry (4)
SIO 147. Applications of Phylogenetics (6)
SIO 150. Physics and Chemistry of Planetary Interiors (4)
SIO 152. Petrology and Petrography (4)
SIO 154. Macroevolution (4)
SIO 155. Whole Earth Geochemistry (4)
SIO 160. Introduction to Tectonics (4)
SIO 162. Structural Geology (4)
SIO 170. Introduction to Volcanology (4)
SIO 170L. Introduction to Volcanology—Field Experience (1-4)
SIO 172. Physics of the Atmosphere (4)
SIO 173. Dynamics of the Atmosphere and Climate (4)
SIO 180/SIOB 292. Communicating Science to Informal Audiences (4)
SIO 181. Marine Biochemistry (4)
SIO 182. Environmental and Exploration Geophysics (4)
SIO 183. Phycology: Marine Plant Biology (5)
SIO 184. Marine Invertebrates (6)
SIO 186. Interactions Between Humans and the Natural Environment (4)
SIO 187. Statistical Methods in Marine Biology (4)
SIO 189. Pollution, Environment and Health (4)
SIO 190. Special Topics in Earth, Oceans, and Atmosphere (4)
SIO 192. Senior Seminar in Scripps Institution of Oceanography (1)
SIO 194. Research Seminar in Washington, D.C. (4)
SIO 195. Methods of Teaching Earth Sciences (4)
SIO 196. Honors Thesis Research (4)
SIO 197. Earth Science Internship (2 or 4)
SIO 198. Directed Group Study (2–4)
SIO 199. Independent Study for Undergraduates (4)
SIOG 228. Research Seminar (2)
SIOC 200A. Computational Ocean Acoustics and Signal Processing I (4)
SIOC 200B. Computational Ocean Acoustics and Signal Processing II (4)
SIOC 200C. Computational Ocean Acoustics and Signal Processing III (4)
SIOC 201. Geological Record of Climate Change (4)
SIOC 202A–B. Fundamentals of Wave Physics (4-4)
SIOC 203A. Introduction to Applied Mathematics I (4)
SIOC 203B. Introduction to Applied Mathematics II (4)
SIOC 203C. Introduction to Applied Mathematics III (5)
SIOC 204. Acoustics (4)
SIOC 206. Land Surface Hydrology (4)
SIOC 207A. Fundamentals of Digital Signal Processing (4)
SIOC 207B. Digital Signal Processing I (4)
SIOC 207C. Digital Signal Processing II (4)
SIOC 207D. Array Processing (4)
SIOC 208. Seminar in Applied Ocean Sciences (1)
SIOC 209. Special Topics (1–4)
SIOC 210. Physical Oceanography (4)
SIOC 211A. Ocean Waves I (4)
SIOC 211B. Ocean Waves II (4)
SIOC 212A. Geophysical Fluid Dynamics I (4)
SIOC 212B. Geophysical Fluid Dynamics II (5)
SIOC 213. Turbulence and Mixing (4)
SIOC 214A. Introduction to Fluid Mechanics (4)
SIOC 214B. Environmental Fluid Dynamics (4)
SIOC 215A. Applied Mathematics for Oceanographers I (4)
SIOC 215B. Applied Mathematics for Oceanographers II (4)
SIOC 215C. Applied Mathematics for Oceanographers III (4)
SIOC 216. Introduction to the Physics of Complex Systems (4)
SIOC 217A. Atmospheric and Climate Sciences I (4)
SIOC 217B. Atmospheric and Climate Sciences II (4)
SIOC 217C. Atmospheric and Climate Sciences III (4)
SIOC 217D. Atmospheric and Climate Sciences IV (4)
SIOC 218. Cloud Dynamics and Climate (4)
SIOC 218A. Observational Techniques in Oceanography (4)
SIOC 218B. Observational Techniques in Oceanography: At-Sea Practicum (4)
SIOC 219. Special Topics in Physical Oceanography (1–4)
SIOC 220. Observations of Large-Scale Ocean Circulation (4)
SIOC 221A. Analysis of Physical Oceanographic Data (A) (4)
SIOC 221B. Analysis of Physical Oceanographic Data (B) (4)
SIOC 221C. Data Analysis Laboratory (4)
SIOC 235. Ocean-Atmosphere Interaction and Climate (4)
SIOC 237A. Introduction to Ocean Optics (4)
SIOC 237B. Ocean Color Remote Sensing (4)
SIOC 237C. Optical-Biological Interactions in the Ocean (4)
SIOC 238. Sensor Networks (4)
SIOC 250. Advanced Atmospheric Dynamics (4)

SIOC 254. Science of Climate Change (4)
SIOC 267. Biogeochemistry (4)
SIOG 223A. Geophysical Data Analysis I (4)
SIOG 223B. Geophysical Data Analysis II (4)
SIOG 224. Internal Constitution of the Earth (4)
SIOG 225. Physics of Earth Materials (4)
SIOG 226. Introduction to Marine Geophysics (4)
SIOG 227A. Introduction to Seismology (4)
SIOG 227B. Advanced Seismology I (4)
SIOG 227C. Advanced Seismology II (4)
SIOG 229. Gravity and Geomagnetism (4)
SIOG 230. Introduction to Inverse Theory (4)
SIOG 231. Introduction to EM Methods in Geophysics (4)
SIOG 232. Ethical and Professional Science (2)
SIOG 233. Introduction to Computing at SIO (4)
SIOG 234. Geodynamics (4)
SIOG 236. Satellite Remote Sensing (4)
SIOG 239. Special Topics in Geophysics (1–4)
SIOG 240. Marine Geology (4)
SIOG 244. Shape and Structure of the Ocean Floor (4)
SIOG 245. Marine Sediments-Paleo Proxies (4)
SIOG 246. Global Tectonics and Basin Formation (4)
SIOG 247. Rock Magnetism and Paleomagnetism (4)
SIOG 249. Special Topics in Marine Geology (1–4)
SIOG 251. Whole Earth Geochemistry (4)
SIOG 252A. Introduction to Isotope Geochemistry (4)
SIOG 252B. Advanced Isotope Geochemistry I (4)
SIOG 252C. Advanced Isotope Geochemistry II (4)
SIOG 253. Interactions of Oceanic Plates and the California Margin (4)
SIOG 255. Paleobiology and History of Life (6)
SIOG 255A. Topics in Paleobiology and History of Life (3)
SIOG 257. Seminar in Petrology (4)
SIOG 260. Marine Chemistry (4)
SIOG 261. Introduction to Rheology of Solid Earth (4)
SIOG 263. Aqueous Chemistry (4)
SIOG 268. Seminar in Geochemistry and Marine Chemistry (1)
SIOG 269. Special Topics in Marine Chemistry (1–4)
SIOB 242A. Marine Biotechnology I: Tools and Methods (4)
SIOB 242B. Marine Biotechnology II: Applications (4)
SIOB 242C. Marine Biotechnology III: Introduction to Bioinformatics (4)
SIOB 262. Marine Chemical Biology Seminar (2)
SIOB 264. Special Topics in Marine Natural Products Chemistry (4)
SIOB 270. Pelagic Ecology (4)
SIOB 270A. Fisheries Oceanography (4)
SIOB 271. Marine Zooplankton (5)
SIOB 272. Advanced Statistical Techniques (4)
SIOB 273. Professional Ethics in Science (2–4)
SIOB 274. Natural History Below the Tides (4)
SIOB 275A. Benthic Ecology (4)
SIOB 275B. Natural History of Coastal Habitats (6)
SIOB 276. Quantitative Theory of Populations and Communities (4)
SIOB 276L. Quantitative Ecology Project Lab (4)
SIOB 277. Deep-Sea Biology (4)
SIOB 278. Seminar in Ocean Biosciences (2)
SIOB 279. Ecology Seminar in Biological Oceanography (1)
SIOB 280. Biological Oceanography (4)
SIOB 281. Marine Physiology (4)
SIOB 282. Phytoplankton Diversity (4)
SIOB 283. Phycology: Marine Plant Biology (5)
SIOB 284. Marine Invertebrates (6)
SIOB 285. Physical-Biological Interactions (4)
SIOB 286. Marine Science, Economics, and Policy (4)
SIOB 287A. Marine Microbial Ecology (4)
SIOB 287B. Microbial Physiology (4)
SIOB 289. Pollution, Environment, and Health (4)
SIOB 290. Marine Biology (4)
SIOB 291. Biology Graduate Research Presentations (2)
SIOB 292. Communicating Science to Informal Audiences (4)
SIOB 293. Applications of Phylogenetics (6)
SIOB 294. Biology of Fishes (5)
SIOB 296. Special Topics in Ocean Biosciences (1–5)
SIOB 297. Marine Biology Seminar (1)
SIOB 298. Special Studies in Marine Sciences (1–4)
SIO 295S. Introduction to Marine Biodiversity and Conservation—Seminar (8)
SIO 295LS. Introduction to Marine Biodiversity and Conservation—Lab (8)
SIO 299. Research (1–12)
SIO 500. Teaching Apprenticeship (1–4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/SXTH.html
SXTH 1. First Year Experience (2)
SXTH 2. Transfer Year Experience (2)
SXTH 20. Freshmen Honors Seminar (1)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/SOC.html
SOCI 1. Introduction to Sociology (4)
SOCI 2. The Study of Society (4)
SOCI 10. American Society: Social Structure and Culture in the U.S. (4)
SOCI 20. Social Change in the Modern World (4)
SOCI 30. Science, Technology, and Society (4)
SOCI 40. Sociology of Health-Care Issues (4)
SOCI 50. Introduction to Law and Society (4)
SOCI 60. The Practice of Social Research (4)
SOCI 70. General Sociology for Premedical Students (4)
SOCI 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
SOCI 98. Directed Group Study (4)
SOCI 99. Independent Study (4)
SOCI 100. Classical Sociological Theory (4)
SOCI 102. Network Data and Methods (4)
SOCI 103M. Computer Applications to Data Management in Sociology (4)
SOCI 104. Field Research: Methods of Participant Observation (4)
SOCI 104Q. Qualitative Interviewing (4)
SOCI 105. Ethnographic Film: Media Methods (6)
SOCI 106. Comparative and Historical Methods (4)
SOCI 106M. Holocaust Diaries (4)
SOCI 107. Epidemiological Methods: Statistical Study of Disease (4)
SOCI 108. Survey Research Design (4)
SOCI 109. Analysis of Sociological Data (4)
SOCI 110. Qualitative Research in Educational Settings (4)
SOCI 112. Social Psychology (4)
SOCI 113. Sociology of the AIDS Epidemic (4)
SOCI 115. Social Problems (4)
SOCI 116. Gender and Language in Society (4)
SOCI 117. Language, Culture, and Education (4)
SOCI 118. Sociology of Gender (4)
SOCI 118E. Sociology of Language (4)
SOCI 119. Sociology of Sexuality and Sexual Identities (4)
SOCI 120T. Special Topics in Culture, Language, and Social Interaction (4)
SOCI 121. Economy and Society (4)
SOCI 122. Social Networks (4)
SOCI 123 Japanese Culture Inside/Out: A Transnational Perspective (4)
SOCI 125. Sociology of Immigration (4)
SOCI 126. Social Organization of Education (4)
SOCI 127. Immigration, Race, and Ethnicity (4)
SOCI 129. The Family (4)
SOCI 130. Population and Society (4)
SOCI 131. Sociology of Youth (4)
SOCI 132. Gender and Work (4)
SOCI 133. Immigration in Comparative Perspective (4)
SOCI 134. The Making of Modern Medicine (4)
SOCI 135. Medical Sociology (4)
SOCI 136E. Sociology of Mental Illness: A Historical Approach (4)
SOCI 136F. Sociology of Mental Illness in Contemporary Society (4)
SOCI 137. Sociology of Food (4)
SOCI 138. Genetics and Society (4)
SOCI 139. Social Inequality: Class, Race, and Gender (4)
SOCI 140. Sociology of Law (4)
SOCI 140F. Law and the Workplace (4)
SOCI 141. Crime and Society (4)
SOCI 142. Social Deviance (4)
SOCI 143. Suicide (4)
SOCI 144. Forms of Social Control (4)
SOCI 145. Violence and Society (4)
SOCI 147. Organizations, Society, and Social Justice (4)
SOCI 148. Political Sociology (4)
SOCI 148E. Inequality and Jobs (4)
SOCI 149. Sociology of the Environment (4)
SOCI 150. Madness and the Movies (4)
SOCI 152. Social Inequality and Public Policy (4)
SOCI 153. Urban Sociology (4)
SOCI 154. Religious Institutions in America (4)
SOCI 155. The City of San Diego (4)
SOCI 156. Sociology of Religion (4)
SOCI 157. Religion in Contemporary Society (4)
SOCI 158. Islam in the Modern World (4)
SOCI 159. Special Topics in Social Organizations and Institutions (4)
SOCI 160. Sociology of Culture (4)
SOCI 160E. Law and Culture (4)
SOCI 161. Sociology of the Life Course (4)
SOCI 162. Popular Culture (4)
SOCI 163. Migration and the Law (4)
SOCI 165A. American News Media (4)
SOCI 166. Sociology of Knowledge (4)
SOCI 167. Science and War (4)
SOCI 168E. Sociology of Science (4)
SOCI 169. Citizenship, Community, and Culture (4)
SOCI 170. Gender and Science (4)
SOCI 171. Technology and Science (4)
SOCI 172. Films and Society (4)
SOCI 175. Nationality and Citizenship (4)
SOCI 177. International Terrorism (4)
SOCI 178. The Holocaust (4)
SOCI 179. Social Change (4)
SOCI 180. Social Movements and Social Protest (4)
SOCI 181. Modern Western Society (4)
SOCI 182. Ethnicity and Indigenous Peoples in Latin America (4)
SOCI 184. Gender and Film (4)
SOCI 185. Globalization and Social Development (4)
SOCI 187. African Societies through Film (4)
SOCI 187E. The Sixties (4)
SOCI 188D. Latin America: Society and Politics (4)
SOCI 188E. Community and Social Change in Africa (4)
SOCI 188F. Modern Jewish Societies and Israeli Society (4)
SOCI 188G. Chinese Society (4)
SOCI 188I. The Israeli-Palestinian Conflict (4)
SOCI 188J. Change in Modern South Africa (4)
SOCI 188K. American Society (4)
SOCI 188M. Social Movements in Latin America (4)
SOCI 188O. Settlements and Peacemaking in Israel (4)
SOCI 189. Special Topics in Comparative-Historical Sociology (4)
SOCI 192. Senior Seminar in Sociology (1)
SOCI 194. Research Seminar in Washington, DC (4)
SOCI 196A. Honors Seminar: Advanced Studies in Sociology (4)
SOCI 196B. Honors Seminar: Supervised Thesis Research (4)
SOCI 198. Directed Group Study (4)
SOCI 199. Independent Study (4)
Soc/G 201A. Classical Sociological Theory I (4)
Soc/G 201B. Classical Sociological Theory II (4)
Soc/G 202. Contemporary Sociological Theory (4)
Soc/G 203. Field Methods (4)
Soc/G 204. Text and Discourse Analysis (4)
Soc/G 205. Quantitative Methods I (4)
Soc/G 206. Quantitative Methods II (4)
Soc/G 207. Comparative-Historical Methods (4)
Soc/G 208. Faculty Research Seminar (2)
Soc/G 209. Social Networks (4)
Soc/G 211. Introduction to Computational Social Science (4)
Soc/G 212. Social Stratification (4)
Soc/G 214 Urban Sociology (4)
Soc/G 216. Sociology of Culture (4)
Soc/G 222. Social Movements (4)
Soc/G 226. Political Sociology (4)
Soc/G 227. Ethnographic Film: Media Methods (6)
Soc/G 232. Advanced Issues in the Sociology of Knowledge (4)
Soc/G 234. Intellectual Foundation of the Study of Science, Technology, and Medicine (4)
Soc/G 238. Survey of the Sociology of Scientific Knowledge (4)
Soc/G 243. Sociology of Social Control (4)
Soc/G 244. Sociology of Race and Ethnicity (4)
Soc/G 245. Gender, Work, and the Economy (4)
Soc/G 246. The Welfare State (4)
Soc/G 247. Madness and Society (4)
Soc/G 252. Research Practicum I (4)
Soc/G 253. Research Practicum II (4)
Soc/G 255A. Introduction to Science Studies (4)
Soc/G 255B. Seminar in Science Studies (4)
Soc/G 255C. Colloquium in Science Studies (4)
Soc/G 255D. Advanced Approaches to Science Studies (4)
Soc/G 258. Institutional Change in the Contemporary World; Latin American Societies in a Comparative Perspective (4)
Soc/G 263. Graduate Seminar in the Sociology of Art (4)
Soc/G 264. Economic Sociology (4)
Soc/G 267. Sociology of Gender (4)
Soc/G 269. The Citizenship Debates (4)
Soc/G 278. Immigration, Assimilation, and Identity (4)
Soc/G 282. Immigration and Citizen (4)
Soc/G 284. Contemporary Biomedicine (4)
Soc/G 288. Knowledge Capitalism (4)
Soc/G 290. Graduate Seminar (4)
Soc/G 298. Independent Study (1–8)
Soc/G 299. Thesis Research (1–12)
Soc/G 500. Apprentice Teaching (2–4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/THEA.html
TDAC 1. Introduction to Acting (4)
TDAC 101. Acting I (4)
TDAC 102. Acting II (4)
TDAC 103A.

Acting Intensive I (4)

TDAC 103B.

Acting Intensive II (4)
TDAC 104. Classical Text (4)
TDAC 105. Rehearing Shakespeare (4)
TDAC 106. Chekhov Acting (4)
TDAC 107. Improvisation for the Theatre (4)
TDAC 108. Advanced Topics (4)
TDAC 109. Singing for Actors (4)
TDAC 110. Acting for the Camera (4)
TDAC 111. Freeing the Voice (4)
TDAC 112. Major Seminar in Acting (4)
TDAC 115. Movement for Actors (4)
TDAC 120. Ensemble (4)
TDAC 122. Ensemble: Undergraduate Production (4)
TDAC 123. Advanced Studies in Performance (4)
TDCH 40. Principles of Choreography (4)
TDCH 140. Improvisation/Composition (4)
TDCH 142. Choreographic Workshop (4)
TDCH 143. Choreography and Dramatic Text (4)
TDCH 147. Choreography: Dance and Society (4)
TDCH 190. Major Project in Choreography (4)
TDCH 196A. Senior Honors Focus Choreographic (4)
TDCH 196B. Senior Honors Focus Choreographic (4)
TDDE 1. Introduction to Design for the Theatre (4)
TDDE 101. Theatre Process—Scenery (4)
TDDE 102. Advanced Scenic Design (4)
TDDE 111. Theatre Process—Costume Design (4)
TDDE 112. Advanced Costume Design (4)
TDDE 121. Theatre Process—Lighting Design (4)
TDDE 130. Assistant Designer (2–6)
TDDE 131. Special Topics in Theatre Design (4)
TDDE 132. Undergraduate Main Stage Production: Design (4)
TDDE 141. Theatre Process—Sound Design (4)
TDDE 142. Advanced Sound Design (4)
TDDE 151. Digital Video Design (4)
TDDE 169A. Digital Rendering for Theatre and Performance Design I (4)
TDDE 169B. Digital Rendering for Theatre and Performance Design II (4)
TDDE 190. Major Project in Design/Theatre Production (4)
TDDR 101. Stage Management (4)
TDDR 108. Text Analysis for Actors and Directors (4)
TDDR 111. Directing-Acting Process (4)
TDDR 190. Major Project in Directing (4)
TDDR 191. Major Project in Stage Management (4)
TDGE 1. Introduction to Theatre (4)
TDGE 3. Cultivating the Creative Mind (4)
TDGE 5. A Glimpse into Acting (4)
TDGE 10. Theatre and Film (4)
TDGE 11. Great Performances on Film (4)
TDGE 12. Topics in Cinema and Race (4)
TDGE 25. Public Speaking (4)
TDGE 50. Musical Theatre Chorus (2)
TDGE 87. Freshman Seminar in Theatre and Dance (1)
TDGE 89. Dance Movement Exploration (2)
TDGE 105. Exploring Acting (4)
TDGE 124. Cult Films: Weirdly Dramatic (4)
TDGE 125. Topics in Theatre and Film (4)
TDGE 126. Storytelling and Design in Animation (4)
TDGE 131. Playing Indian: Native American and First Nations Cinema (4)
TDGE 133. Visual Ideas (4)
TDGE 134. Disability and Performative Exploration: Struggle for Inclusion (4)
TDGE 192. Senior Seminar in Theatre and Dance (1)
TDGE 196A. Honors Study in Theatre (4)
TDGE 196B. Honors Study in Theatre (4)
TDGE 198. Directed Group Studies (0-2-4)
TDGE 199. Special Projects (0-2-4)
TDHD 171. Dance History I (Ancient to 1900) (4)
TDHD 172. Dance History II (1900 to 1960) (4)
TDHD 173. Dance History III (1960 to Present) (4)
TDHD 174. Dance Aesthetics and Criticism (4)
TDHD 175. Cultural Perspectives on World Dance (4)
TDHD 176. Dance History—Special Topics (4)
TDHT 10. Introduction to Play Analysis (4)
TDHT 21. Ancient and Medieval Theatre (4)
TDHT 22.

Theatre 1500–1900 (4)
TDHT 23. Twentieth-Century Theatre (4)
TDHT 101. Topics in Dramatic Literature and Theatre History (4)
TDHT 103. Asian American Theatre (4)
TDHT 104. Italian Comedy (4)
TDHT 105. French Comedy (4)
TDHT 107. American Theatre (4)
TDHT 108. Luis Valdez (4)
TDHT 109. African American Theatre (4)
TDHT 110. Chicano Dramatic Literature (4)
TDHT 111. Hispanic American Dramatic Literature (4)
TDHT 114. American Musical Theatre (4)
TDHT 115. History and Theory of Directing (4)
TDHT 119. Production Dramaturgy (4)
TDHT 120. Indigenous Theatre and Performance (4)
TDHT 190. The New York Theatre and Dance Scene (4)
TDMV 1. Beginning Ballet (2)
TDMV 2. Beginning Contemporary Dance (2)
TDMV 3. Beginning Jazz (2)
TDMV 11. Theatrical Tap (2)

TDMV 110. Intermediate Ballet (4)
TDMV 111. Advanced Ballet (4)
TDMV 112. Advanced Ballet for Contemporary Dance (4)
TDMV 120. Intermediate Contemporary Dance (4)
TDMV 122. Advanced Contemporary Dance (4)
TDMV 123. Contact Improvisation (4)
TDMV 130. Intermediate Jazz (2)
TDMV 133. Advanced Jazz Dance (4)
TDMV 138. Beginning Hip-Hop (2)
TDMV 140. Beginning Dances of the World (4)
TDMV 141. Advanced Dances of the World (4)
TDMV 142. Latin Dance of the World (4)
TDMV 143. West African Dance (4)
TDMV 144. Asian Dance (4)
TDMV 146. Intermediate Latin Dances of the World (4)
TDMV 148. Intermediate Hip-Hop (2)
TDMV 190. Major Project as Performer (4)
TDPF 160. Studies in Performance—Fall Production (2–4)
TDPF 161. Studies in Performance—Winter Production (2–4)
TDPF 162. Studies in Performance Spring Production (2–4)
TDPF 163. Dance Repertory (1–4)
TDPF 190. Major Project/Dance Production (4)
TDPR 6. Theatre Practicum (4–6)
TDPR 102. Advanced Theatre Practicum (4–6)
TDPR 104. Advanced Practicum in Stage Management (4–6)
TDPW 1. Introduction to Playwriting (4)
TDPW 101. Playwriting Workshop (4)
TDPW 102. Playwriting Workshop II (4)
TDPW 104. Screenwriting (4)
TDPW 190. Major Project in Playwriting/Screenwriting (4)
TDTR 10. Introduction to Dance (4)
TDTR 101. Dance Movement Analysis (4)
TDTR 103. Dance and Technology (4)
TDTR 104. Dance Theory and Pedagogy (4)
TDGR 200. Dynamics (1)
TDGR 201. Stage Combat (2)
TDGR 204A. Text Analysis (4)
TDGR 204B. Contemporary Theories of Theatre (4)
TDGR 204C. Collective Creation (4)
TDGR 206. Faculty Directed Production (4)
TDGR 207. Production (4)
TDGR 208. Dance Making Processes (4)
TDGR 210A. Process I—Part I (4)
TDGR 210B. Process I—Part II (4)
TDGR 210C. Process I—Part III (4)
TDGR 211. Choreography Seminar (4)

TDGR 211B. Speech for the Actor (2–4)
TDGR 211C. Speech for the Actor (2–4)
TDGR 212. Acting Practicum (2)
TDGR 213A-B-C. Movement for Theatre I (2-2-2)
TDGR 214. Dance Theatre Topics: Collaborative Processes (2)
TDGR 214A. Voice for Theatre I—Part I (3)
TDGR 214B. Voice for Theatre II—Part I (3)
TDGR 214C. Voice for Theatre I—Part III (3)
TDGR 215. Dance Theatre Seminar (2)

TDGR 216.

Principles of Curriculum Theory (2)

TDGR 217.

New Media and Technology (2)

TDGR 218.

Dance Theatre: Professional Practice (2)

TDGR 219. Directing Process Studio (4)
TDGR 220A. Process II: Classical Text I (4)
TDGR 220B. Process II: Classical Text II (4)
TDGR 220C. Process II: Classical Text III (4)
TDGR 221. Graduate Studio: Contemporary Movement Practices (2)
TDGR 221A-B. Speech for the Actor II (3-3)
TDGR 223. Improvisation Ensemble (2)
TDGR 223A-B. Movement for Theatre II (3-3)
TDGR 224A-B. Voice for Theatre II (3-3)
TDGR 225A-B. Singing for the Actor II (1-1)
TDGR 226. Stage Managing Assistantship (4–12)
TDGR 227. Dance Practicum (4)
TDGR 229. Theatre Externship (6–12)
TDGR 230. Acting Process III: Actors’ Studio (4)
TDGR 231A. Professional Preparation for the Actor (4)
TDGR 233. Acting for the Camera (1)
TDGR 235. Singing for the Actor III (1)
TDGR 239. Skills (4)
TDGR 240. Directing Seminar (1–6)
TDGR 243.

Director/Playwright/Choreographer Lab (4)

TDGR 244. New Plays Workshop (2)
TDGR 245. Directing Practicum (4)
TDGR 250. Playwriting Seminar (4)
TDGR 251. Playwriting Practicum (2)
TDGR 252. Dramaturgy Seminar (4)
TDGR 253. Dramaturgy Practicum (1–6)
TDGR 254. Television Writing (4)
TDGR 256. Contemporary Plays (1–4)
TDGR 257A-B. Screenwriting (4-4)
TDGR 258A. Dramatization and Adaptation (4)
TDGR 260. New-Play Festival (4)
TDGR 262. Crossing Boundaries: Design Improvisations (4)
TDGR 268. Storyboarding (4)
TDGR 269A. Photoshop I (4)
TDGR 269B. Photoshop II (4)
TDGR 270A. Design Studio I (4)
TDGR 270B. Design Studio I: Costume Design (4)
TDGR 270C. Design Studio I: Lighting Design (4)
TDGR 270D. Design Studio I: Sound Design (4)
TDGR 271. Design Seminar (2)
TDGR 273. Fashioning the Body (4)
TDGR 274. Advanced Scenic Design (4)
TDGR 275. Advanced Lighting Design (4)
TDGR 276. Advanced Costume Design (4)
TDGR 278. Special Topics in Theatre Design (1–6)
TDGR 279. Design Practicum (4)
TDGR 280A. Stage Management 1 (4)
TDGR 280B. Stage Management 2 (4)
TDGR 280C. Stage Management 3 (4)
TDGR 282. Advanced Sound Design (4)
TDGR 286. Special Topics in Stage Management (1–6)
TDGR 288. Stage Management Seminar (4)
TDGR 289. Introduction to Doctoral Studies (4)
TDGR 290. Dramatic Literature and Theatre History Prior to 1900 (4)
TDGR 291. Dramatic Literature and Theatre History 1900 to the Present (4)
TDGR 292. Cultural and Critical Theory (4)
TDGR 293. Directed Studies (4–12)
TDGR 294. Dissertation Research (4–12)
TDGR 295. Acting Practicum (2)
TDGR 296. Stage Management Practicum (4)
TDGR 297. Thesis Research (2–12)
TDGR 299. Thesis Project (2–12)
TDGR 500. Introduction to Apprentice Teaching (4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/TWS.html
TWS 21-22-23-24-25-26. Third World Literatures (4-4-4-4-4-4)
TWS 132. Literature and Third World Societies (4)
TWS 190. Undergraduate Seminars (4)
TWS 197. Fieldwork (4)
TWS 198. Directed Group Studies (2 or 4)
TWS 199. Independent Study (2 or 4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/USP.html
USP 1. History of US Urban Communities (4)
USP 2. Urban World System (4)
USP 3. The City and Social Theory (4)
USP 100. Introduction to Urban Planning (4)
USP 101. Introduction to Policy Analysis (4)
USP 102. Urban Economics (4)
USP 104. Ethnic Diversity and the City (4)
USP 105. Urban Sociology (4)
USP 106. The History of Race and Ethnicity in American Cities (4)
USP 107. Urban Politics (4)
USP 109. California Government and Politics (4)
USP 110. Advanced Topics in Urban Politics (4)
USP 111. Field Research in Urban Politics (4)
USP 113. Politics and Policymaking in Los Angeles (4)
USP 115. Politics and Policymaking in San Diego (4)
USP 116. California Local Government: Finance and Administration (4)
USP 120. Urban Planning, Infrastructure, and Real Estate (4)
USP 121. Real Estate Law and Regulation (4)
USP 122. Redevelopment Planning, Policymaking, and Law (4)
USP 123. Law, Planning, and Public Policy (4)
USP 124. Land Use Planning (4)
USP 125. The Design of Social Research (4)
USP 126. Comparative Land Use and Resource Management (4)
USP 129. Research Methods: Studying Racial and Ethnic Communities (4)
USP 130. Fieldwork in Racial and Ethnic Communities (4)
USP 132. African Americans, Religion, and the City (4)
USP 133. Social Inequality and Public Policy (4)
USP 134. Community Youth Development (4)
USP 135. Asian and Latina Immigrant Workers in the Global Economy (4)
USP 136. Collaborative Community Leadership (4)
USP 137. Housing and Community Development Policy and Practice (4)
USP 138. Urban Economic Development (4)
USP 139. Urban Design and Economic Development (4)
USP 143. The US Health-Care System (4)
USP 144. Environmental and Preventive Health Issues (4)
USP 145. Aging—Social and Health Policy Issues (4)
USP 146. Research Methods for Built Environment and Active Living (4)
USP 147. Case Studies in Health-Care Programs/Poor and Underserved Population (4)
USP 149. Madness and Urbanization (4)
USP 154. Global Justice in Theory and Action (4)
USP 168. History of Los Angeles (4)
USP 170. Sustainable Planning (4)
USP 171. Sustainable Development (4)
USP 173. History of Urban Planning and Design (4)
USP 174. Regional Governance and Planning Reconsidered (4)
USP 175. Site Analysis: Opportunities and Constraints (4)
USP 176. Binational Regional Governance (4)
USP 177. Urban Design Practicum (4)
USP 179. Urban Design, Theory, and Practice (4)
USP 180. Transportation Planning (4)
USP 186. Senior Sequence Research Proposal (6)
USP 187. Senior Sequence Research Project (6)
USP 189. Special Topics in Urban Planning (4)
USP 190. Senior Honors Seminar (4)
USP 191. GIS for Urban and Community Planning (4)
USP 193. San Diego Community Research (4)
USP 194. Research Seminar in Washington, DC (4)
USP 195. Teaching Apprentice—Undergraduate (2–4)
USP 198. Directed Group Study (2–4)
USP 199. Independent Study (2–4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/VIS.html
VIS 1. Introduction to Art Making: Two-Dimensional Practices (4)
VIS 2. Introduction to Art Making: Motion and Time Based Art (4)
VIS 3. Introduction to Art Making: Three-Dimensional Practices (4)
VIS 20. Introduction to Art History (4)
VIS 21A. Introduction to the Art of the Americas or Africa and Oceania (4)
VIS 21B. Introduction to Asian Art (4)
VIS 22. Formations of Modern Art (4)
VIS 23. Information Technologies in Art History (4)
VIS 30. Introduction to Speculative Design (4)
VIS 40. Introduction to Computing in the Arts (4)
VIS 41. Design Communication (4)
VIS 60. Introduction to Digital Photography (4)
VIS 70N. Introduction to Media (6)
VIS 80. Introduction to the Studio Major (4)
VIS 84. History of Film (4)
VIS 87. Freshman Seminar (1)
VIS 100. Introduction to Public Culture (4)
VIS 100A. Design of Public Culture (4)
VIS 101. Introduction to Urban Ecologies (4)
VIS 101A. Designing Urban Ecologies (4)
VIS 102. Cross-Border Urbanizations (4)
VIS 105A. Drawing: Representing the Subject (4)
VIS 105B. Drawing: Practices and Genre (4)
VIS 105C. Drawing: Portfolio Projects (4)
VIS 105D. Art Forms and Chinese Calligraphy (4)
VIS 105E. Chinese Calligraphy as Installation (4)
VIS 106A. Painting: Image Making (4)
VIS 106B. Painting: Practices and Genre (4)
VIS 106C. Painting: Portfolio Projects (4)
VIS 107A. Sculpture: Making the Object (4)
VIS 107B. Sculpture: Practices and Genre (4)
VIS 107C. Sculpture: Portfolio Projects (4)
VIS 108. Advanced Projects in Art (4)
VIS 109. Advanced Projects in Media (4)
VIS 110A. Contemporary Issues and Practices (4)
VIS 110C. Proposals, Plans, Presentations (4)
VIS 110D. Visual Narrative/Tableau (4)
VIS 110E. Art in Public Space/Site-Specific Art (4)
VIS 110F. Installation: Cross-Disciplinary Projects (4)
VIS 110G. The Natural and Altered Environment (4)
VIS 110J. Ritual Performance (4)
VIS 110M. Studio Honors I (4)
VIS 110N. Studio Honors II (4)
VIS 111. The Structure of Art (4)
VIS 112. Art Historical Methods (4)
VIS 113AN. History of Criticism I: Early Modern (4)
VIS 113BN. History of Criticism II: Early Twentieth Century (1900–1950) (4)
VIS 113CN. History of Criticism III: Contemporary (1950–Present) (4)
VIS 114A. Landscape and Memory (4)
VIS 114B. The Fragment: Uses and Theories (4)
VIS 114GS. Arts and Visual Culture in China (4)
VIS 117E. Problems in Ethnoaesthetics (4)
VIS 117F. Theorizing the Americas (4)
VIS 117I. Western and Non-Western Rituals and Ceremonies (4)
VIS 120A. Greek Art (4)
VIS 120B. Roman Art (4)
VIS 120C. Late Antique Art (4)
VIS 121AN. Art and Experience in the Middle Ages (4)
VIS 121B. Church and Mosque: Medieval Art and Architecture between Christianity and Islam (4)
VIS 122AN. Renaissance Art (4)
VIS 122CN. Leonardo da Vinci in Context (4)
VIS 122D. Michelangelo (4)
VIS 122F. Leonardo’s
La Gioconda
(4)
VIS 122GS. The City in Italy (4)
VIS 124BN. Art and the Enlightenment (4)
VIS 124CN. Nineteenth-Century Art (4)
VIS 125A. Twentieth-Century Art (4)
VIS 125BN. Contemporary Art (4)
VIS 125DN. Marcel Duchamp (4)
VIS 126AN. Pre-Columbian Art of Ancient Mexico and Central America (4)
VIS 126BN. The Art and Civilization of the Ancient Maya (4)
VIS 126C. Problems in Mesoamerican Art History (4)
VIS 126D. Problems in Ancient Maya Iconography and Inscriptions (4)
VIS 126HN. Pacific Coast American Indian Art (4)
VIS 126I. Southwest American Indian Art (4)
VIS 126K. Oceanic Art (4)
VIS 126P. Latin American Art: Modern to Postmodern, 1890–1950 (4)
VIS 126Q. Latin American Art: Modern to Postmodern, 1950–Present (4)
VIS 127A. Contemporary Arts in South Korea (4)
VIS 127B. Arts of China (4)
VIS 127C. Arts of Modern China (4)
VIS 127GS. Issues in Modern and Contemporary Chinese Art (4)
VIS 127N. Twentieth-Century Art in China and Japan (4)
VIS 127P. Arts of Japan (4)
VIS 128A–E. Topics in Art History and Theory (4)
VIS 128A. Topics in Premodern Art History (4)
VIS 128C. Topics in Modern Art History (4)
VIS 128D. Topics in Art History of the Americas (4)
VIS 128E. Topics in Art History of Asia (4)
VIS 129A–F. Seminar in Art Criticism and Theory (4)
VIS 129A. Seminar in Premodern Art History (4)
VIS 129C. Seminar in Modern Art History (4)
VIS 129D. Seminar in Art History of the Americas (4)
VIS 129E. Seminar in Art History of Asia (4)
VIS 129F. Seminar in Art Theory and Criticism (4)
VIS 129G. Art History Honors Seminar (4)
VIS 129H. Art History Honors Directed Group Study (4)
VIS 130. Special Projects in Visual Arts (4)
VIS 131. Special Projects in Media (4)
VIS 132. Installation Production and Studio (4)
VIS 140. Digital Imaging: Image and Interactivity (4)
VIS 141A. Computer Programming for the Arts I (4)
VIS 141B. Computer Programming for the Arts II (4)
VIS 145A. Time- and Process-Based Digital Media I (4)
VIS 145B.Time- and Process-Based Digital Media II (4)
VIS 147A. Electronic Technologies for Art I (4)
VIS 147B. Electronic Technologies for Art II (4)
VIS 149. Seminar in Contemporary Computer Topics (4)
VIS 151. History of the Experimental Film (4)
VIS 152. Film in Social Context (4)
VIS 152D. Identity through Transnational Cinemas (4)
VIS 154. Hard Look at the Movies (4)
VIS 155. The Director Series (4)
VIS 156. Latino American Cinema (4)
VIS 158. Histories of Photography (4)
VIS 159. History of Art and Technology (4)
VIS 161. Systems and Networks at Scale (4)
VIS 162. Speculative Science and Design Invention (4)
VIS 164. Photographic Strategies: Art or Evidence (4)
VIS 165. Camera Techniques: Analog Futures (4)
VIS 167. Social Engagement and Photography (4)
VIS 168. Pictorialism and Constructed Reality (4)
VIS 171. Digital Cinema—Theory and Production (4)
VIS 174. Media Sketchbook (4)
VIS 175. Editing—Theory and Production (4)
VIS 176. 16mm Filmmaking (4)
VIS 177. Scripting Strategies (4)
VIS 178. Sound—Theory and Production (4)
VIS 180A. Documentary Evidence and the Construction of Authenticity in Current Media Practices (4)
VIS 180B. Fiction and Allegory in Current Media Practices (4)
VIS 181. Sound and Lighting (4)
VIS 182. Advanced Editing (4)
VIS 183A. Strategies of Self (4)
VIS 183B. Strategies of Alterity (4)
VIS 184. Advanced Scripting (4)
VIS 185. Senior Media Projects (4)
VIS 194S. Fantasy in Film (4)
VIS 197. Media Honors Thesis (4)
VIS 198. Directed Group Study (2–4)
VIS 199. Special Studies in the Visual Arts (4)
ICAM 103. Musical Acoustics (4)
ICAM 110. Computing in the Arts: Current Practice (4)
ICAM 120. Virtual Environments (4)
ICAM 160A. Senior Project in Computer Arts I (4)
ICAM 160B. Senior Project in Computer Arts II (4)
VIS 201. Contemporary Critical Issues (4)
VIS 202. Art Practice (4)
VIS 203. Working Critique (4)
VIS 204. Rethinking Art History (4)
VIS 205. Introduction to Graduate Studies in Art Practice (4)
VIS 206. Seminar in Art Practice Research (4)
VIS 207. Working Practice for Art Practice PhDs (4)
VIS 211. Fact and Fiction (4)
VIS 212. History and Memory (4)
VIS 213. Public Space (4)
VIS 215. Human Interface (4)
VIS 216. The Object (4)
VIS 217. Communities and Subcultures (4)
VIS 219. Special Topics in Art Practice/Theory (4)
VIS 234N. Frames of View (4)
VIS 242. Theories of Media and New Media (4)
VIS 243. Aesthetic Theory (4)
VIS 244. Studies in the Relationship of Theory and Practice (4)
VIS 251. Seminar in Medieval Art (4)
VIS 252. Seminar in Renaissance Art (4)
VIS 254. Seminar in Modern Art (4)
VIS 255. Seminar in Contemporary Art (4)
VIS 256. Seminar in Media and New Media (4)
VIS 257. Seminar in Meso-American Art (4)
VIS 258. Seminar in Chinese Art (4)
VIS 259. Seminar in Latin American Art (4)
VIS 260. Seminar in North American Indian Art (4)
VIS 280. Workshop in Critical Writing (4)
VIS 281. Curatorial Practice (4)
VIS 295. Individual Studies for Graduate Students (1–12)
VIS 298. Directed Group Study (1–12)
VIS 299. Graduate Research (1–4)
VIS 500. Apprentice Teaching (1–4)

http://ucsd.edu/catalog/courses/WARR.html
WARR 1. First Year Experience (2)
WARR 2. Transfer Year Experience (2)
WCWP 10A. The Writing Course A (4)
WCWP 10B. The Writing Course B (4)
WARR 11A. Warren Scholars Seminar A (4)
WARR 11B. Warren Scholars Seminar B (4)
WCWP 100. Academic Writing (4)
WARR 189. Academic Mentoring and the Writing Process (2)
WCWP 500. Apprentice Teaching in WCWP (2 or 4)

